Vol. II.1
CLASSIC RHAPSODIES.
NO. I.
THE RAPTURE OF PROSERPINE.
A RHAPSODY, FROM OVID.
THE INFLICTION.
The
thunderbolts of Jove had triumphed, and impious
Typh
us
stretched his prostrate length along the groaning earth.
Glad Sicily was laid upon the conquered monster, to keep
him down; for Jupiter knew well enough there 'd be another
bloody fight, if ever he got up. Upon his hundred heads
rested alarmed old tna, covering all save a few long
straggling
locks. The imposition of such heavy weight, of stone,
and wood, and water, bore not the vanquished foe, with
dutiful
submission; bore not the inhumation, and thanked the
hand that buried him; but up against the blackened sky,
ingrate
,
from his rebellious bowels, belched such showers of
ashes, and clouds of smoke, mixed up with lava and lumps of
coke, that Ocean roared with fear, and tna's peaceful seats
reeled, and rolled, to and fro, with terror and dismay.
The God of Tartarus upstarted at the din, heard in his
house profound, all trembling, lest his roof should suddenly
be cracked, and dayling enter, and the ghosts get out, and he
be overwhelmed with suits for the escape. Up! up! thou
wary jailor! He harnessed his black steeds, into his chariot
sprang, shook the loose reins, cracked his long lash,of cast
off secondary lightning, twisted, his brother Jove's last
new-year's
present,and drove, impetuous, up to earth, to see
what in the dl's name could be to pay.
Up to the regions of sunshine and day his coursers soon
galloped, running, with reckless leaps, their rude, rough way.
And now they stamp Trinacrian ground, and climb old tna's
dizzy steep, and snuff the tainted air, and paw the yet warm
sulphur, wandering at will; while Pluto, far aloft, from peak
to peak springs anxious, thoughtful, surveying cracks, chasms,
and craters.
Within a bower, on Ida's side, the Cytherean goddess slept
her cherished trysting place of old, when good Anchises
was a juvenal. The dusky form of Pluto, leaping over the
hills, threw its long shadow on the peaceful grove. The
shadow, and the form, dismal, and cold, and grim, awoke the
jealous queen, awoke to call her archer boy, with summons
quick and shrill. Eros! my son! Cupid! fly quick!
Hither! come hither!
Cupid was frolicking, down in a vale, busy, as usual,
sticking
a pin in the breast of a captive beetle. He ran to his
mother, and buried his head in her bosom.
If ever thou did'st love me, boy; if in thy gentle
mother's
breast thou hast delight, and dreamy joy, pillowed, in
deep and balmy rest; be now my grateful Eros, my darling
avenger; our long insulted shrines are thirsting for vengeance
on Pluto's chill philosophy,his haughty heart,his
stubborn
knee, that bends notowns not woman, nor me;thine
is the grace, to bring you reprobate to know, redeemed, a
Benedict's condition; to bid him at my footstool kneel, the
pangs of torturing love to feel, fearing, hoping, wishing. But
now, he treads the withering earth, secure in pride of regal
birth, and spurns the joys of woman's arms, rejects her love,
1*
derides her charms; the murky craven! By Styx! the old
cold-hearted rip deserts for whiskey, rum, and flip, the eye,
the brow, the cheek, the lip, replete with happy heaven!
And shall we then confess, conquered, despised, our power is
less than haughty Pluto's? What! has high heaven
confessed
a rape, and shall low Erebus escape, and we excuse
the duty which the brute owes! No! bring your bow and
arrows!
It was a goodly sight to see the queen of beauty, with
flushed and anxious face, hurry and help the god of love. It
was a goodly sound to hear, with voice subdued, but accents
clear, queen Venus cheer her son. Shoot! till he feels
the glowing flame; shoot! for your mother's glorious fame;
shoot! for the honor of your name, love, and love's archery.
Your word is law, good mother, said fun-loving Cupid,
unbuckling his quiver. Your breath upon this arrow. I'll
do the business for the old bachelor in a twinkling. Speak
softly, on this barb, her name whom he shall love.
The goddess kissed its pointthe
pain-and-pleasure-bearing
weaponand smoothed its plume upon her billowy bosom.
The dart was keen, and strait, and truly balanced, and Paphia
approved it, and whispered, on its edge, the name of
Proserpine
,
and laid it in the rest.
There was a fixing, a bending, a tension, a pulling of a
bowstring, a twang, a slip, and a whiz through the air, and it
straight was all over with Pluto.
Ha! ha! look! look! mamma, ha! ha! Cupid laughed
heartily, seeing the arrow quivering in Pluto's heart, and
hearing him swear, By Orcus! what a sudden stitch I've
got in my left side! The gentleman from Styx is stuck,
pursued my lord of love, merry as a cricket; the judge of
Tartarus has caught a Tartar. Charon's old master has a
new care on his royal hands to manage.
Stop your nonsense, you monkey! said Venus, hitting
the boy with her fan, and bend your saucy knees, in
love-suits
ever suppliant and successful, and wrestle with Olympus,
and move all gods to send the daughter of the
wheat-and-indian
lady before his lovesick eyes? for if she be not seen,
our vengeance half is lost, and your great-uncle, there, will
soon go down to Erebus, not knowing whence or what the
pains that rack his frame.
This cursed climate, Pluto cried, deep sighing, to
himself
,
delights not our condition; so rough, so raw, so cold,
and soon, again, so hot. I must be off, and seek in regions
more congenial, a steadier sky and heat more equable. This
long old giant here lies quietly enough, and I hope he'll not
raise such a rumpus again.Alas! my side! my side!
With such soliloquy, he nourished his deep wound, nor
knew the secret cause of his distress; knew not the subtle
venom that swelled his starting veins; knew not the glorious
agony from ordinary pains. His coursers feel the lash,
burning
their trembling flanks. Now, onward, and away!they
spring, they rear, they rush, bearing their sorrowful master.
And soon, before his wonder-smitten eyes, deep, dimpling,
pure, and cool, old Pergus lies, and lifts, upon his silver,
crystal
wave, the songs of snowy swans, that wanton, lave their
spotless plumes, and swim, and swimming, sing, arch the
the proud neck, and curve the sounding wing. A grove,
impervious
,
crowns the lake, hanging above the cherished water,
and, sacred, guards with veil opaque the virgin revelry of
Ceres' daughter. There is she now, with her maidens,
adjusting
her long hair, gazing into the mirror of that lake, and
humming to herself a sweet low tune. Her maidens, all
around, are gathering fragrant flowers; and flowers, and girls,
and buds, and blossoms, are mingled all together, in a
confused
perplexing mass of beauty.
But O!the m istress of that troupe, how beautiful was she!
And that strange gazer on the group, how suddenly crazed
was he! Young Proserpine was flattered by Pluto's wild
confusion, and moved with more coquettish grace, and from
her eyes shot rays more brilliant, when, with half averted
head, she saw the royal stranger, bewildered by swans' songs,
and maidens' voices, rein up his coursers with a sudden
jerk, that brought them on their haunches. The dallying
breeze blew back the light transparent folds of her thin stola,
and played with her brown ringlets, and lifted up her
necker-chief
from off her full deep bosom; up and down, up and
down, how heaved that beautiful bosom!
The kingly lover gazed, and drank the subtle poison;
drank and gazed, gazed and drank, and gazed and drank on
still. His parched tongue and lips refuse their usual function;
staring he sat, and dumb. So, bloodless, sits and stares, torn
from his ancient catacomb, the cold Egyptian mummy,
uplifted
in his coffin, at feminine admirers at Scudder's, all
speechless, and dried up. His reins are on the grass, his
hands hang at his side, his eyes are dimmed and dark, his
mouth is stretched wide open, his head droops on his
shoulder
.
Strange languor o'ercomes him, fierce weakness
consumes
him,he wishes he was in Hell.
THE ABDUCTION.
Proserpine! Proserpine! hold! beware! temptation may
be too tempting! She little heeds the warning which
Prudence
,
in her ears, whispers and urges; but cheek, and eye,
and tongue, and hand, are busy all coquetting. She gathers
up her flowers, and presses them closely together, and binds
them with the ends of her long flowing hair. And often, as
she binds them, she looks, with half shut eye, through the
meshes of her locks; and through her long, dark eyelashes,
the beams of a mellow dreamy eye, fall, broken, upon Pluto.
So, moonlight rays, through intertwining trees, sprinkle the
leafy ground, in yellow autumn. And now she scatters them
to the winds, and claps her empty hands, bending her bare
white arms; and now she gathers the woodrose gay, and
snatches the pale lily, and winds them with a willow wreath,
and presses them, all trembling, against her leaping heart,
and fawn-like, startled, flies, but archly she looks back and
peals in Pluto's ear a merry laugh. Her maidens, delighted,
encourage the flirtation, rejoicing in the grace and beauty of
their mistress.
His majesty looked like a natural fool, while loud the
echoed joy rang through the sacred grove. I am seduced,
thought he, from principle and promise; from all my vows
of single blessedness; from my course of life, and love of
business! alas! I am seduced! She must go down to
Erebus
with me, for certain.
Will you accept a violet, sir? said Proserpine, O, how
meekly! and curtesying with well-put-on solemnity, as
she stood by the chariot, and lifting up the flower, exposed
her upturned throat, and deep, full, swelling bust, to Pluto's
glowing gaze. Will you accept a violet, good sir?
Violate? gasped the king of night, not knowing what
he said. Yes, yes, my angel, yes, jump in; and Pluto's
iron arm was on the maiden's cestus, and into the chariot
lifted her.
Away!away!What voice is that, shaking the
trembling
air, and urging Pluto's steeds! Alas! alas! what grief
is that, so long, so loud, so bitter? What goddess pleads
so piteously, and who is deaf to her prayer? Ye maidens
at Pergus, say, why do ye weep, beating your breasts, and
tearing your hair! Where, where is your mistress?
Lost Proserpina's shrieks no gentle pity moved in her
immortal ravisher. Upon his coursers' necks, abandoned,
lie the reins, for both his hands are needed, the maiden's cries
to stifle, and bind her active arms down, and keep her in
the chariot. The steeds dash on the accustomed way,
o'er hill and dale, swamp and marsh, rocks, caves, lakes,
fens, bogs, dens, and shades of death, the dreary road to
Tartarus.
Oh! mother! mother! goddess Ceres! besought the
struggling girl; save your unhappy daughter.
Be quiet, love, you shall be queen of Hell, my bride, my
wife, said Pluto, bending upon one knee, and still, with
equal zeal, encouraging his horses, each by name;To
reign is worth ambition, though in Hell; `better to reign in
Hell, than serve in Heaven,'  pursued the seducer, quoting
his old friend Orpheus. People may talk of the need of a
minister, Hymen, or flamen, to sanction a match, but believe
me, the doctrine's suspicious and sinister. A license to
marry? It is a mere catchit's all in my eyeand so
says Fanny Wrightnay, Proserpine, I prithee, do not cry
so bitterly; these tears fall worse than idly.
Tears, promises, and prayers, threats, flattery, and
protestations
how
mingled all, and all how vain! The raptured
bride no consolation knew, for being made a queen against her
virgin willnone but the old man's wealth and extensive
dominion
what
goddess or woman was ever so foolish but that
she would listen to reason?
O! what a horrid beard! said Proserpine, quite faintly
and thenyour breath is so sulphureous,
Fear not, my dearest, Saunders has just new honed my
razors* * * * *and then your majesty may rest
assured
,
there is no better seidlitz in the world than a good
draught of Lethe.
But now they reached the realms of modest Cyane, cool,
chaste, immaculate nymph; the coursers' heated hoofs hiss
in her sacred fountain. An ancient nymph was she, of
puritan
extraction, a rigid methodist, and censor stern of fleshly
weaknesses. Three thousand years had rolled over her
virgin
head, yet had no wanton lip tasted her withered cheek.
Up, from the parting waves, ascended the cold nymph, and
chilled the raging team with sudden frost. The chariot stood
still.
Who bars our way? cried the imperial loverand stays
our happy nuptials?
'T is I forbid the banns, said the lady of the lake, putting
her arms akimbo. Have you never yet heard of an action
per quod
, for running away with a woman? By Gd! This
is too much, a veteran monarch like you, not waiting to ask
for permission to sue, leaving old tna, and steering for
Gretna, you, surely, are crazy, or else you are blue. Ah! my
poor girl, I pity your unhappy
Pray, mind your own business, good madam, said
Proserpine
,
sharply, but hiding her face with her hands.
The king of Orcus waited for no more, hearing with grim
delight the words of spite and passion blended. Upon the
yielding earth, with fierce and violent strength, he smote his
whipstock. Straightway there lay disclosed, precipitous, but
smooth, a turnpike new macadamised, leading down to the
kingdom. The adamantine gates shone dimly through the
shades, in dusky brightness, and on his eager ear, glad in the
welcome sound, fell the accustomed bark of trusty Cerberus.
We'll soon be home, my love.
O! whither do you bear me? stay! curb your rushing
steeds! How dark!stay!stay!I faint!the air!
release
me!in pity let me go!let me go home to my
mother!
Not to-night, Proserpine, not to-night.
When, when, in mercywhen? shrieked the lost
penitent
.
Never, Proserpine, never.
THE INTRODUCTION.
Infernal world, and thou, profoundest hell,
Receive thy new possessor,
said the happy Pluto, bowing reverentially, as he drove through
the everlasting portals. Down Cerberus, down. I give you
welcome, Proserpine, and joy, in your new dominionback,
you bloody three mouthed curdroop not, my gentle queen,
you will soon become accustomed to the change of airwe
are populous here, you see, but not crowded. This is the
Styx, and that little murmuring stream on the right, is Acheron.
The people down the river to the left, are ghosts waiting to
cross the ferry; but we, you perceive, dash right ahead,
through fire and water, without stopping for the boat. Here
we are in Tartarus proper. The individuals you see engaged
in different employments, are all persons of the highest
consideration
I'll
soon introduce youyou'll be delightedah!
allow me to present to you Mr. Tantalus, the president of our
infernal Temperance Societya very abstemious, self-denying
gentlemandrinks nothingMr. Tantalus, the queen of
Orcus
you
look thirsty, sirsteady, you fiery colts
Proserpine
,
the Misses Danaidesdaughters of a king, my dear, and
eminent collaborators with Tantalus, in the liquid causedeep
in the science of water powerLadies, our new queen will
give out cards for a ball, as soon as she is rested from her
journey. Lord Sysiphus, my lovea great mineralogist.
Hippodamia, we must tax thy dutiful loyalty to set down that
water pitcher, and do us a few errands. Let our people hear
the news, and share their sovereign's joy. First see chief
justice
Minos, and desire him to hasten to the palace to draw a
marriage settlementcarry Mr. Tantalus a bottle of hock
tell him, I say he
must
drink itset Ixion's wheel turning the
other waydrive the vultures from off old Tityus, and tell all
the souls to rest themselves and be happy; this is our royal
wedding-day, and our bridal shall be a jubilee, by the Styx!
Smack, went the whip, and on dashed the royal vehicle,
burning the tracks of its rapid course in lines of vivid
lightning
.
THE SUBMISSION.
Within an iron chamber, deep in the sombre palace, were
crouching three old women, sitting and spinning, sad, solemn,
sullen, sulky, scandalous. The threads those women spun,
were of no earthly texture; the hands that held that distaff,
were of no terrene mould, no mortal fingers they that shut
those bright edged scissors, opened and shut, and cut the
fated thread of human life. Mournfully, mysteriously, went
round your magic wheel, ye priestesses of Destiny, when Hell
received your mistress, rival, and queen. Why should
gangrenous
jealousy corrupt the eternal Parc? Why pales their
sinking cheek, why fades their ancient eye, why falls their
Vol. II.2
thin red hair, all matted on their bony necks, reeking with
proofs of recent lack of combs, and clean rain water!
Proserpine sleeps on Pluto's neck, and Erebus rejoices.
Now haste, the bridal bed bedeck, ye ghosts lift up your
voices; fill high with vinum Samium, and swell the glad
Epithalamium.
High on a throne, which carpenters far famed, on earth, of
yore, but now mechanic ghosts, had temporary raised upon a
hill, covered with carpets, Brussels and Ingrain, Pluto exalted
sat; by twelve steps raised to that good eminence; and,
from his seat, the summoned myriads of his realm surveyed,
Tartarean and Elysian. By his side, queenly, his bride sat
wondering at the shades, jostling, and for good places cager
pressing. As, when from senior's pews, the silken gowned
step glorious, and o'erspread the covered stage, on glad
commencement-day
day
of relief from board with circles chalked,
and conic sectionssolemn, grave Prses sits, and Latin
talks, and morals; in the body of the church, sound fans
incessant, beating the hot air; while youth, ingenuous, plies
the elbow.
The monarch, by the sight uplifted, slowly rose, and
murmuring
plaudits rumbled through the crowd as he began to
speak. Spirits and ghosts, our subjects dutifulbut here,
a sudden clap of interposing thunder stopped the begun
infliction
,
announcing unexpectedly, a messenger from Jove.
Mercury knelt at the feet of the king, and handed him a
letter
.
Pale Proserpine trembled, while Pluto, muttering, broke
the seal, and swore, in a low toneand loud Alecto laughed,
shaking her tied up snakes,tied with white ribbons, for
the bridalas o'er his royal shoulder, bending joyous, she
read the following epistle.
THE SUBMISSION.
Dear Plute,
This a cursed bad business of yours about Proserpine.
Ceres is raising the very Old Nick, up here, and we shall
have no quiet until you let the girl go. I have had to
promise
the old woman, that if her daughter has not eaten, since
you have had her,you know what that meansyou shall give
her up entirely, but if she has tasted food on your premises,
thatthenthen she shall divide her time, half yearly,
between
you and her mother. Come, now, that's an equitable
decisiondon't appeal, you shall have the first six months,
my boy
Thy affectionate brother,
Jove Omnip
.
THE SUBMISSION.
P. S. Send me a box of good pocket matchesI'm quite
outhow are you off for nectar? J.
She has eaten, she has eaten, blabbed mean Ascalaphus,
young grey-eyed imp, delighted at the chance to do his
master
service. She has eaten, she has eaten, within the
Elysian fields; in the shadow of an arbor I was sitting,
when the queen, on her tiptoe stretching up, plucked a
nectarine
,
and ate it!
Another peal of thunder! The snakes upon the heads of
the furies hissed and grinned, and Mercury flew back to
heaven
.
NO. II.
A ROMAN CHARIOT RACE.
BY M. T. CICERO.
To the Spirit of the Turf and Soul of the Times.
I send
the enclosed with an apology for not translating ALL
the Latin. My plea is, that some friend has miscellaneously
borrowed my dictionary. Don't expect, however, to be
troubled
again, in this way, for I have written to Tully that he has
more time to study the people's American than I have to
figure out the Consul's Latin, and that the next chapter be all
in our vernacular.
[1]
[1]
That is rather a lame excuse for a man who means to trot fair. What
is it but saying my groom left the stable door open and somebody stole
my saddle?But what can WE do? will some of the legal branches of
our tree of knowledge let a small apple of advice fall into our lap? Seven
and sixpence we paid to a night-school-teacher to dig into one of our
ministerial
imps, how to render an account current of the stuff into our
vernacular
.
We forbear to do more than to add the renderthe get.
Here it is!
Cicero in Elysiumheathen Enext door tovide Virgil:
Taking his comfort,
To
Porter, of all joys the gentle guardian,
Times chronicler; magnificent and Spirit dear:
Court, Chief, of Wagner and Old Whitenose, Justice of,
Master of horse, head Register of Turf,
And Jove knows what else not * * * * *
Taking the shine off every common chariot
With such a drive
L. L. D.O. K., &c. &c. &c.
Respectfully and profoundly,
With sentiments of the highest consideration,
Have the honor to be, &c.
How much grief I have been cursed with, and how much enjoyment I
have been deprived of, both domestic and forensicthen comes some
Englishafter thatby that infernal break down of Grey Eagle on the
third heat, you being present and weepingmore Latin`stadii functus
offico'used upthen a little more English, to the word `course'
inclusive
,
then, in the first place read `IMPRIMIS'which every body knows by
heart:go on`according to our fashion, my dear fellow.' The rest is
easy as losing a bet. Do you want to go on any thing privately? Put
up your currency. The dew will rust it. Peace, the swifest kind of horses
a Westly Richards fowling piece of the last and most ample build, rod
and hooks lucky, and most of all a mistress true and beautiful be with you.
That's pretty much the story. The note is rather familiar than modest.
But, as we said before, what
can
we do? Cicero writes, and we can't
lose a word of the letter. We shall call our next colt
Atticus
, after
ourselves.
Editors
.
Yours respectfully,
J. Cypress
, Jr.
Cicero
, in Elysio, jucunditatem imbibens,
Portero, gaudiorum janitori
Temporum spiritui, magnifico, carissimo,
Stadiorum, Wagnerorum, Bostonium, gubernatori,
Equitum omnium magistro registroque
Splendorem abstrahenti omnibus loaferibus ordinariis
L. L. D.O. K.&c. &c. &c.
Salutem
.
Quantum dolorem acceperim, et quanto fruetu sim privatus
et forensi et domestico,Cato and Socrates who room with
me take on dreadfully about it,Aquil can ab illa dirutione
infelicissima, tertio cursu, te prsente flenteque, besides the
burst up of the match between Wagner and Boston, and old
Eclipse colting on his former laurels as though he was stadii
functus officio;and not a heroic stallion to adjure by, on the
course, imprimis, pro nostra consuetudine existimare potes.
Next, all that I have to say, is, that I send you an account of
an old race that was run a little way out of town when I
practised
law in Rome. It was just before Cataline abused my
patience so that I had to kick him out of the house.
Sceleratus
!
Snakes! Infernissimus! Fire and tow! Inter infernos!
I won seven thousand Aurei Denariinone of your patent
2*
shinplastersfrom him upon that race, and the false wretch
refused to fork up. [Between you and me, that was the
reason
I came down upon him in that
Quosque-TANDEM
style so fulguriously. I rather used him up there. If Pluto
will let him come out, I'll go the same team against him again.
But he must plank the cash.]
Pignus deponere
, and then
back out or forget the name of the horse you bet on, and
refuse
to let the stake-holder pay overthat's almost as bad as
goingthrough a friendagainst your own nagcall him
Deafawayand hammering a tack into his hip bone on the
morning he is to start, and swearing at your trainer for letting
the nails fall out of his shoes upon the stable floor. Pax, equi
perceleririssimi, Westlei Ricardi ultim amplisimque
structur
bombarda, arundo, hami que fausti, et, maxime, amica
sincera
et alma, tecum.
P.S. I have enclosed the documents, I speak of, to my
friend, J. Cypress, Jr., to translate for you. He knows my
p's and q's, and I don't want my hand to get familiar with
your devils.
P.P.S. Your Spirit comes here very irregularly. I wish
you would write a letter to the C. and Enquirer, and blow up
Amos Kendall, that Loco Foco postmaster. Pretty loconot
to know better
our locus
in quo. If existing contracts go on
much more, I shall abandon all hopes of your ever getting a
permanent foothold on Elysian Turf.
[2]
[2]
Amos has since resigned.
Ed
.
Cato sends his best
respects. If you see Colonel Johnson, tell him I've got a new
white hat that I want to bet on against any
trifle
that he will
run
against its
fly
in a thunder-squall. Why don't he bring
out something? Are American horses good for nothing but
to make smoked beef for soldiers in Florida?Pax, again,
tecum, et tuo Spiritu. Sing now this.
PSALMODIC SERVICE.
Air
Nonne vides!
Hast thou beheld, when from the goal they start,
The youthful charioteers with beating heart
Rush to the race; and panting scarcely bear
Th' extremes of feverish hope, and chilling fear;
Stoop to the reins, and lash with all their force;
The flying chariot kindling in its course.
And now alow and now aloft they fly,
As borne thro' air, and seem to touch the sky;
No stop; no stay; but clouds of dust arise
Spurned and cast backward on the followers' eyes;
The hindmost blows the foam upon the first.
Such is the love of praise, and honorable thirst.
The Lupercal was past
. The solemn priests, with
vestals
bearing torchesfed from the flame that burned young
Romulus a king, swift rushing from a lupine mother
majestic, paced the stones of Rome, that sang beneath their
glad retiracy, and, thirsty, sought the secret places of their
temples. We've had enough of such revivals, now quoth
youthful Curtius, descendant he directso his blood showed
forth, rich swelling in his neck veinsfrom him who leaped
his horse into that horrid gulf to save his country, filling the
gaping ditch, not with his body juvenile, but with his glowing
soul. Deep from his mother's breast, and pure, he sucked the
essence of the noble soul of daring Scvola. Mutius she called
him, as she staunched the crimson glory of his severed arm, the
hand cut off to throw into the teeth of a besieger of the walls
that held his Love.
Mount Palatine, Tarpeian Hill, Curia Hostilia, Esquiline
Place, Aventine Row, Viminal Square, and all the other
building
lots laid out for private use at public expense, from
Battery
to Tauri Caput, exjected their eye-rubbing sun-rivals.
Apollo laid the string on, and whipped his steamy
dawn-dancers
into foam, so that he might see the race, and hold back
Sol at least two heats, and then have time to cool an easy jog
by nightfall, and light fierce Peleus down to the barnacled
bedchamber
of expecting Thetis.
Forum boariumFly-market,Forum piscarium
Catharine-slip,all punctured mutton, and flounders fast
decaying
smiling
in death, like Patience on a monument, in
hope long lingering, for a Five-point bidderthrew out their
tainted stock, and in the dock most merciful, full fed the
doubtful
eels. No proud Basilica contained a solitary dandy, in a
new coat unpaid for, strutting. No safe Comitium, with
threatened vengeance of contempt of court, held a pert
lawyer
,
boring the sick Subsellia. No Rostrum breasted out the
figure-head of orators. No bullock died, no dove was
sacrificed
with riteful ceremonies. The fanes, altars, temples all,
and theatres were silent. The sacred groves let loose their
grasshoppers. Glad pedagogues discharged their scholars
alphabetic
,
and horse-hide flogged, in extacies, preferred to joy
of human flesh-cuts. Plebeians, patrons, orators, patricians,
knights, poets, freedmen, loafers, and logicians, homeborn,
Gallician, British slaves, and Africthe city Prtor, the
newly
appointed sub-treasury Qustor, the tribunes of the
people
office
seekersand of the seven-hilled tyrant every
scrub shoemaker was afoot, and for the stadium panting. It
was a race-day, and notes were not protested. Every body
rose before daylight to be happy. Two
capiases
only were
issued to the Sheriff during twenty-four hours. Both of these,
however, were in actions on the case for felonious insinuation
by German
liberti
in paying bills of a fraudulent banking
incorporation
,
which Cataline had
dinnered and suppered and drunk
through the Senatefor the amount of their by-bets as to who
would take the lead. They were held to bail. I would
rather be a bale of cotton, and walked over by all the niggers
in Louisiana, than to be handled and footed as they were
after
the go was done
On sharp-cuf rails their ragged corduroy sat,
The conscious chesnut smoking with their fat.
The ladies' stand was gemmed with pearls and brilliants,
early. Brightly Metella sparkled, lip-love full. Gently, with
languid goodness, fainting, repulsing, seemingly, with
half-forgiving
,
half-inviting eye-lashes, that fanned the air into a
poisonous deliciousness of agony, as it blew death of Love,
and love of Death, upon the unaccustomed eye-ball of the
long-locked
,
yellow-curled Ascanius in the next boxwho dared
to bet a pair of gloves against hersat, shone, killedO!
sweetest murder!the terrible Lueretia;omnipotent in
Beauty, cruel Victress! gentle Tyrant! merciless happiness!
wearing Grief in one pitying ear, Heaven haughty in the
other!ringsringsLorenzo;everlasting circles of mad
idolatry, half hidden by careless tresses;no other jewel
showing but a breast-bound ruby, that swelled out upon her
partlyby accidentunkerchiefed bosom, in the excitement
of the race;nothing mucha strawberrya rosebud. Proud
was the eye that on
her
bust might look and blench not.
He
might gaze into the sun by summer noondayEagle
challenger
.
Such was a
Roman's
daughterWoman and
Goddess
mixed. Is the blood all lost? Are there no Deities
whom we of modern years may love and worship too. Is it
all
[3]
[3]
I can't make this sentence out; Cicero must come up and explain
himself.J. C. Jr.
The eternal city gasped with hot anxiety. Not a
newspaper
was published on that morn, except the Bona Dea Ob
server. The ode to Hiero, done into smooth Iambies by the
club laureate, was in the mouths of all, excluding thoughts of
trade in sugar and tobacco.
[4]
[4]
Pindar, the best poet in the worldwhom Horace calls inimitable
wrote his poems in praise of swift horses, and victorious riders. Hiero
was a king, and a gentleman, but he was not too proud to ride his own
matches. The first Olympic is addressed to him as a horseback-man, the
second to him as a charioteer. Quinctilian goes the craziest nonsense about
the Poet's UnionOlympicBeaconPythianCamdenNemeanand
TrentonIsthmiancourse outpourings. Some of them are fair, that's a
fact. But I can't find the time set down in a single report. Time, or no
time, however, it would make some of our nags grit their teeth, to read the
odes in the original Greek.
One principal reason why our turf is so quiet, so deathlike, is that the
club dont elect a poet laureate, and people are ashamed, or dare not, mount
their own steeds.The only exceptions are in the cases of an English
steeple-chase, and an Irish fox-hunt.Let somebody come out with
something
in the style of
Quadrupedante putrem sonitu quatit ungula campum
and the very dust upon the track will turn into India Rubber, and pitch the
horses onward, as though Burns' witches were after them. Then, then we
might be able to come home and say
There was mounting 'mong boys of the Netherby clan
Fosters, Fenwicks, and Musgraves, they rode and they ran;
and remember how bright and brave was the gallant cavalier who so
gracefully
reined back his curving charger, before the admiring ladies, up to taw,
in front of the Judges' Stand. Now, instead of a chivalrous knight willing
to do to death for the cross that hangs upon his ladye-love's forehead, we
look upon the ghastly face of some pale boy, consumptive, blanket-sweated,
to bring him down to weight; or upon the black
eye
-very, and the white ivory
of an Abyssinian baboon licked into the shape of humanity, and pivotted
with tiny feet upon the back of a steed who neighs for a master. What
pretty execution would that babe do against helmet, cuirass and slashing
battle-axe! Knighthood! horsemanship! Bring up your horses! That's
a good cry, and enables one to say a thing or two in favor of modern racing.
It sounds like that
Quadrupedante
sentence I just now quoted from
Virgil
.
I heard it when Eclipse lost the first heat, and
a man
mounted him.
I knew that Purdy would win. I saw his eye. It was like a conqueror's.
I saw his seat. It was firm as Roman cement ten years old. He was
glued to the saddle. He was part of the horse. I saw a centaur that
once. His legs added two ribs to the glorious steed, but were adopted and
formed a happy strengthening plaster to the whole family circle. His left
hand felt the bit, and Eclipse looked back. His eyes, at a glance, told him
there was no mistake about that feel. Then there walked up to the
starting
post, a dignified, fleet, and certain nag, as ever retrieved begun defeat,
bearing upon his back one whom we might have wished to have lived in
Pindar's time, but for the hope he will yet contrive to bring the Sun and
Moon together, get up a new Eclipse, and ride a triumph again.
Printcr's
Asmodeus
.
The
laticlavium
ruffled its broad
folds alongside the humble
angusti
work of sixpenny tailors.
The
Plebs communis
, and the
Turba sine nomine
of sleepers
under stoops, communed with senators and knights, and eased
nobility of quickly bagged sestertia, by honest thimble-riggery.
Jove! how full the air and roads were! Bacchus turned out
his tigers before a pearl-silvered wagonett, built by Opifex &
Co., out of a monster oyster-shell, fresh captured from the
Lucrine lake. Not a horse was left in Rome. The lady
Abbess of the Convent of the Delphic oracle, drove,
four-in-hand
,
a team of wild-cats. Mercury lit upon an oak that
over-looked
the course. Iris got up a shower and sat upon a
rainbow
.
Vulcan smuggled himself inside the track, under
pretence
that he was a blacksmith, sent to shoe a colt who had
lost his slipper. Mars was seen fighting an Irishman, who
had got drunk on bad liquor. Ceres stretched up her auburn
flowing tresses in a neighboring corn-field on the hill-side.
Pan was pointing out the nags to her. Allaye, allwere
there; Gods, Mortals, and Infernals. Happy, happy Rome!
sole city worthy of such glorious company!
CHAPTER II.
palmaque nobilis
Terrarum dominos evehit ad Deos.
Horace
, Ode 1.
Few people ritely estimate the furious luxuriaunce of an old fashioned
Romanne Course. Pitie 'tis, no Turffe Registrar chronicled the glorious
height of heates of those braue ages. Saue only the poetts did record
evehit ad Deos, or some suche loose reporte. Time, pedigree,
enduraunce
,
speede, be mostlie lost. Muche 'tis to be feared the begarlie
Monkes who should haue been burned wh hotte fire, haue erasede out
manie choice accomptes from the parchmente scroules of the triumphs at
the Campus Martius, whereon to rite their stupide missals, and haue little
lefte behinde saue imperfecte legendes. Yet euen from wolves, the halfe
eaten lambe torne, wh violent force uppone their guashing teeth dothe to
the hungrie exploarer of antique fatherre-lands taste like manna to a
wandering
sinnere of Israel in the wilderness. Soe to a trew louer of a good
horse raice dothe fashion forthe for itsuelf a noble grace an auncieute
charriott
struggle, albeit Monkish Latinne roll between, being, so to speeke,
the axle of the wheel.
Wink
: ed. 1649, p. 46.
It
was no common meeting. The sporting world of Rome,
and all its provinces, were on the Campus Martius. Spain
sent her jennets from her dark Moriscan stables, and her wild
mountain rovers flashed their long manes around the heads of
their safe-seated Guerillas. Gaul entered untrimmed fetlocks.
Brittania stamped the track with heavy cart-horse hoofs.
Sarmatia
sweated, Dacia pranced upon the track. Greece stood
unsaddled in clear Spartan ribs, and trod, beside this simple
fit-out, magnificent in rich Corinthian adornment. Numidia
sent her wild eye-lightnings and Libya tramped the plain with
foaming teeth. Egypt entered Cleopatra,Black Maria of
her mistress queen. Syrian, Babylonian, Median,
Mesopotamian
,
all, were there. Felix Arabia walked out her splendid
stallions, bitted by stately Bedouins. The Imaum of Muscat
glorified his country by the challenge of two lippers of the
Persian Gulf. Great Jupiter! what an anniversary!
The Course was free for all four-year-olds that never had
been matched before; chariots not be more than four feet from
hub to hub of hind wheel; steeds unlimited in number,the
parties litigant to draw for places.
The Prtor's trumpet blew a summon blast, and straight a
host of pawing combatants neighed at the starting post. The
Meta
was scarcely seen for feather floaters. The Red, the
White, the Green, the Blue, the Golden and the Purple
mountings
mingled sparklings of ambition for the glory of success.
[5]
[5]
The four ancient companies were the
Prasina
, the
Russata
, the
Alba
or
Albata
, and the
Veneta;
the Green, the Red, the White, the Sea Colored
or Sky Colored. This distinction was taken from the color of their liveries,
* * * Domitian added two new companies, the Golden and the
Purple
.
Kennett
, R.
A.
It was a goodly sight to see the foamy rush of the
wave-breasted
steeds stopped on the instant into marble statue
movement
by the stern muscles of their godlike drivers. First stood
Marcellus, with his followers in
Blue
, holding a pair of
milk-white
colts from Elis, unbroken yet, but kind, great in their
name, the gift of a Greek girl, daughter of a happy hero
who bore away the wreath victorious at the last Olympic, and
died as he was crowned. 'T was said their sires were the
horses of the Sun, who in the last eclipse stole time and loved
their vein-swollen mothers. Hard upon him pressing,
scarcely
,
with desperate force, young Julius reined his four-in-hand
of dark-lashed Gypsiestrue bred, fresh, fed with grain, and
groomed upon the meadows of the Nile, and signalled by their
nature,
Green
. Whose panting ardor steamed by his side?
'T was Sergius Cataline sending fire through his reins to the
fifth couple-leaders.
In ordinary reading we meet only with the
Big
and the
Quadrig;
but they sometimes had their
Sejuges, Septemjuges
, &c. Suetonius
assures
us that when Nero was a performer in the Olympic game, he made
use of a `Decemjugis,' or chariot drawn with ten horses
together.Ib.
Close by his side rushed all his band
of friends, traitors to Romepimps of intriguing Fulvia, rob
Vol. II.3
bers of virtuous youth, and haters fierce of keen watching
Cicero. Cassius and Cethegus, Lentulus and Curius, stood
eachin false conspiracy, urging ferocious warrior steeds to
aid their leader, and defeat the faction upon which Cicero had
bet with Catalinein chariots side-armed with scythes, to cut
their adversaries' horses down. They flared in
Red
. Next
stood Gracchus, proud in his gorgeous family
Purple
.
Mark Antony shone in
Gold
behind six proud-necked
bitchampers
.
Last of all, a Knight, unknown, stood like a god,
with foot advanced upon his dashboard of pure pearl,
grooming
,
with skilful ease, three pair of coal-black ear-glistening
limb-tremblers, unable to stand still, and rolling fire from their
nostrils,
[6]
[6]
Stare loco nescit, micat auribus, et tremit artus,
Collectumque premens volvit sub maribus ignem.
Virg. Georgics
.
himself and reins and harness all in brilliant white,
and sparkling steel. The ladies cried behold Apollo! as
they owned with beating hearts the heavenly grace of his
recognition of the shouts of commendation which went to the
skies from the hundred thousand throats;
There were several of these Circi in Rome. The most remarkable
was Circus Maximus, first built by Tarquin. The length of it was four
stadia, or furlongs, the breadth the like number of acres, with a trench of
ten foot deep, and as many broad, to receive the water; and seats enough
for one hundred and fifty thousand men. It was extremely adorned and
beautified by succeeding princes, particularly by Julius Csar, Augustus,
&c., and enlarged to such an extent as to be able to contain in their proper
seats, two hundred and sixty thousand spectators.
Kennett
.
Some moderns say 380,000. Its circumference was a mile.
Adams
Rom. Antiq
.
Mem
.Kennett and Adams differ in their way and result of estimation
of length and breath.
and freely wagered
rings and bracelets upon the gallant stranger's triumph.
The sacred rites were celebrated, the lots were drawn, and
straight, obedient to the rules established, the factions took
their stations. The Master of the Lude dropped his white
kerchief, and then dashed, with ocean-like ferocity, the
rainbow-painted
waves of the raging combatants. Julius took the
lead, and Green! Green! was the cry. Hard behind
lashed Cataline, and all his faction. Blue, purple,
white, and golden, seemed to hang back to watch the
chance for a dash.
Green!Blue!Purple!Golden! went up the shouts
from the friends of the different factions as they became
involved
in dust, and locked each other's wheels. None cried
Red, for even the stable boys hated Cataline. White!
screamed Lucretia, although he lagged behind, and seemed to
fear. White against the field.
You are a fool, said Mrs. Cornelius Grab-us Agrip-onus,
who sat near her.
The chiel's distraught, quietly remarked an old Scotch
servant-woman behind,brought out by the Csar,what'll
ye bet, my lassie?
The baby which the slave had on her arm then set up a
domestic
yell, and with the vociferations of the boy, and people
in the boxI want to go homeand Turn her out
Lucretia's answer was lost. What cared she?
The White!look!shouted Lucretia; see! he is
discounting lashes freely! His whip touches the flank of the
near side leader! He is in the melee! He gains! He is
ahead of all but Cataline!
I can't see, my dear, so plain as thee can, said an
African
Quakeress, whom the Spirit had moved to come from the
borders of the Red Sea to see this uncommon race,I can't
see, my dear, so well as thee, on account of the dust, but I
think, I mean, I fear thee is in love with that `White,'his
mistress
,
likely,but he'll burst his boiler, and smash his bank
chariot I meanbefore he gets to the first Meta.
Out on thee! for a foul witch! replied Lucretia, very
quietly,like all women,and, suiting the action to the word,
laid, with impressive significance, the back of her hand upon
the fat lips of the prophetic Abyssinian. Faintness followed,
and the doorkeeper, with the utmost kindness, dragged out
the smitten slave. She never attended quaker meetings again.
Drs. Auger and Aruspex, and their students, dug her up
about a year afterwards, and one of them delivered a lecture
over her bones at the Museum on the interesting topic of
Ourang
Outangs.
White! white! white! now vociferated the excited girl.
But none would bet her more, and the timid began to hedge
hard work, too, to find a hedge to hide behindfor the noble
lady's shouts had reached the unknown's ear, and he was mad
with strength and skill.
Short time was there to bet or hedge; for the first meta
[7]
[7]
There was at the one end of the cirque certaine barriers,
id est
places
barred or railed in, at which place the horses began the race; and at the
other end was the marke, whether the horses ran: it was called in Latin
Meta
, and the barriers
Carceres, a coercendo
. Whence we say `
a
Carceribus
ad Metam
,' that is, from the beginning to the ending.
Cripp
's
Roman Anthology,
printed by Iohn Litchfield, Printer to the famous
Vniversity, at Oxford, Ann. Dom.
1631.
was approached by such a troop of sweepstakers as never had
been seen before. Some honor-seeker
must
be dashed against
the horrid columns, dedicated to the gods, which marked the
turning point, or crushed between the antagonistic chariots.
Who must be thrown under prostrate horses! Who must
die? On, white; cried Cicero. Whip, golden!
Whip, green! halloed some shoemaker's apprentices, and
laborers of
Erin
nys. Steady, hold! White! white! for
the love of Heaven! hold and wait! shrieked Lucretia.
Mark, mark, how impious Cataline and his crew let out their
secret-spring-bowie-scythes, and hold hard back to cut the
horses of Marcellus! The noble youth had seen, and
reining
hard, held back, and knew with horror, but determined
vengeance, Marcellus, cut in twain, his horses madly running
with half his body bleeding in his chariot. Upon the other
half, prone in the dust, crowned with rich auburn locks, and
eyes beautiful in death, the leaders of Mark Antony stumbled
and stopped. The cursed scythe of Lentulus cut his
wheel-horses
.
Cethegus, with his hubs of heavy steel, crushed in
his chariot sides, and Mark was tossed at least full fifty yards,
into the stall of an old woman who sold crabs, just outside the
track. There's an end of that poor nigger, sang out
Cataline
.
The Green,unhappy Julius, green enough,ran
against the marble column on the left, and smashed himself
into life eternal. Cethegus and Lentulus pressing on, got
entangled
in their own snares, and cut each other. Off their
nags jumped, and struck their comrade Curius. It was
curious
indeed to see how they leaped the barriers, and ran across the
field. The Gracchus then made a bold dash, but his
unwilling
mare shyed, backed, and kicked at the sight of the
mixed up blood of dying men and horses, and whip nor spur
would make them move. None then remained but Cataline
and the unknown white knight. O! with what an agony of
anxiety did Lucretia cry, Be wary of his cursed poisonous
sword-point! Kill him! cried the master of the Lude
he rides foul, and murders! Kill him;Stab him;
cried the whole assembled multitude. The white knight
raised his whip,with one end he lashed his streaming
leaders
,with
the other, heavy loaded, he gave Mr. Cataline a
crack on the head, that tumbled him out of his vehicle. His
horses ran away just where they had a mind to. He fell into
3*
the trench. Some Irishmen pulled him out, but he was very
muddy. Some thought he was a little drunk. The white
knight walked his horses over the course, as the waves walked
over the smitten Egyptians, treading upon the bodies of his
foes, and took the wreath of glory.
That night he married Lucretia.
The White Knight was
the son of Cicero
.
NO. III.
SUBTERRANEAN NEWS.
Dear Editor
,I was reading the fifth book of the neid
one afternoon last week, after dining magnificently upon roast
pig and green peas, when, almost imperceptibly, and with a
sensation of gradual, languid, pleasant metamorphosis, I was,
in the body, taken out of the body, and transported to the
unmonopolized
public lands of poetry and classic story. Animal
magnetism carried me over the track we flew. Cuma
received
me, ambitious pilgrim, seeking safe convoy and a
passport
for travel through the interesting regions that own Pluto
for their king. I stood upon the margin of the sacred grove,
where grows the golden tree, whose branches are at once the
protection-papers and the pilot of the specially favored living,
to the country of ghosts and infernal gods. Mighty enterprise,
glorious riches of glowing incidents! What subterranean
treasures shall I glorify to the wondering upper air, if ever I
get back! Pencillings by the wayCrayon Sketches
Trolloping inklings of a jaunt through Tartarus during
the year 1839. Shade of neas, help me to break through
these cat-briars and blackberry bushes, that guard the entrance
to the sacred tree!
With this invocation I pressed boldly into the penetralia of
the wood. I readily discovered the individual who keeps
watch over the aureal vegetable, and expressed to her my
desire
to go to Hell. My request was received with courtesy,
and the trusty watch-woman accompanied her
acknowledgment
of my right to prosecute the jaunt by breaking off and
putting into my hand a sister branch of the bough which
marshalled
the pious son of Anchises some thousand years ago.
I felt the god running through my veins as I touched the scion
of the tree of knowledge and power.
I presume, sir, I need not show you the way, said the
civil sybil; you New-Yorkers are generally familiar with
the road; but if you should miss your track, the rod will
direct
you. Follow the rod. The gold will keep you straight.
I touched my hat to the old lady in acknowledgment of the
complimentary observation which she was pleased to express
touching my fellow-citizens, and bidding her good day, turned
to commence my journey.
Immediately the under-brush and matted trees fell apart,
disclosing a broad avenue of spiral green sward running down
into the earth at about an angle of thirty-two and a half
degrees
.
Down this declivity I walked, or rather was whirled
by a vehement power of centripetal locomotion, which soon
brought me to the boundary of the dusky empire. High,
higher than sight; farfarther than thought, stretched the
everlasting walls. Gloomily and fearfully the grand portals
frowned before me. The gates were swung wide open, but
old Cerberus was wide awake, and his three heads were
busily occupied in fighting a family quarrel in reference to a
bone which each appeared desirous to appropriate.
The moment he noticed me he saluted me with an ululatory
recognition, which made me somewhat doubt the sufficiency
of my nerves for the journey I had undertaken. I trembled
more especially, because in the hurry of my setting out I had
neglected to bring with me the customary
viaticum
to grease
and bribe his jaws. Moreover, one does not like to strike a
gentleman's dog, particularly when he is on a visit to him,
and unless the brute exhibits decided symptoms of
hydrophobia
.
But the impetus of my progress was such, that there
was no time for adjustment of the difficulty. I must settle
this business with Pluto, said I to myself. Then I took
courage and thought of Hercules, who dragged the cur to
earth and back again; and raising my metal, no lightly-loaded
weapon, I got in readinessa blow at the rushing whelp,
which, if it had been discharged in the proper direction, would
have probably made him a constellation alongside of his brother
Sirius. But, oh! wonder-working gold! the moment that the
treasure glittered in his eyes, the three-mouthed coward fawned
and grovelled at my feet, kissing the yellow rod, like a
skinner
before a money-lender at a quarter before three.
Charge! good dog, said I, patting his heads successively,
to make sure of his good opinion when I should return; and
under these established terms of friendship, we separated. I
soon arrived at the east bank of the Styx, where I found
innumerable
ghosts, walking up and down, and waiting their
turn to cross. The throng at this landing place reminded me
of the congregation at the Brooklyn ferry on a race day; only
the people were all on foot. My magic passport gained me
an easy opening through the multitude, most of whom seemed
to be Ethiopians and low Irish. Those who held themselves
more respectable stood back at a distance from the river, and
a few groups that I particularly noticed, appeared by their
gestures
,
and the occasional emphatic words which sruck my ear,
to be discussing some question about the monopoly of the
ferry. The doctrine of equal rights, however, was faithfully
regarded. No exclusive facilities for entering into the
kingdom
were allowed. Every candidate was duly billeted, the
moment he arrived by the constables of the vestibule, and each
took turn according to the number of his ticket, without any
inquiry made as to property, citizenship, or naturalization: all
that was required was the paying for his ferriage. When I
arrived at the brink of the sluggish stream, the ferryman had
just put out with a cargo of small children. But on the
instant
he caught a glimpse of the golden rod, he returned and
hurried out his passengers with fierce precipitation, forgetting,
in his haste, to pay back the ferriage he had received.
Step in, step in, step in. Welcome to Erebus. Don't
see flesh and blood every day. Give us your fist. Where do
you hail from? Allow me to inhale once again the fragrance
of thatsnuff, snuffmy soul! Over! Ovareno,
I beg your pardon, sir. You shall not be annoyed with any
of the greasy ghosts. A mere slip of the tonguemy calling.
I'll row you over alone with pleasure.
I gave the hand of the veteran mariner a hearty grasp, and
at his beckoning, took a seat in the stern-sheets, and off he
put.
We had hardly got six yards from the bank, when a
familiar
voice, a little way down the stream, assailed my ears
with a loud hilloa. I turned at the cry, and to my utter
astonishment
,
saw my old friend Jack Furnace, who had sailed
only ten days before for Liverpool, in perfect health, swinging
his hands above his head, and shouting.
Mercy! protect us! cried I. Jack, is that you?
Charon, my dear boy, shove back and take him in.
That's contrary to law, replied the old gentleman.
Don't you see his ticket is numbered 11,251,956? There's
a whole army to cross before he can tread my plank.
You will most particularly oblige me, my esteemed friend,
if you will, in this single instance, suspend the operation of
the provisions of your charter. That gentleman, whose
demise
I am thus suddenly called on to deplore, owes me a very
convenient thousand on the result of a discussion at brag, a
fortnight since, and I should be happy to get his order upon
his executors or administrators, to pay the amount to me out
of his assets. Poor Jack! What could have killed him?
Indeed, dear Charon, you must take him in. Allow me to
present to you this twig of my bough, as a trifling token of
my regard to your friendship, and the firmness of your
adherence
to the established usages of your boat.
Don't mention this on the other side, said the old man,
thrusting the argument into his pantaloons' pocket, with some
rapidity; at the same time bending and pretending to fix a
thole-pin and backing water. Old Minos would have me
indicted, if he were to find out that in a single case bribery and
corruption had made me lose sight of the equal rights of the
ghosts. I should certainly be turned out of office.
Jack jumped in about mid-ship, and, ghost as he was,
nearly
swamped the ricketty craft with his irregular weight. He
was fat, puffed, and, strange for a shade, red-faced, and worse
and worse, was evidently inebriated. His marvellous
appearance
excited very natural inquiry. His story was soon told.
He and the captain, crew, and passengers of the vessel he had
sailed in, had just got down from the bed of the Atlantic
Ocean. On the tenth day out at 4 A.M. sea time, they ran
upon a mountain of ice floating under water, and in five
minutes
after, in a brisk flaw, foundered and went to the bottom.
Jack was at his wine at the time, when he was quite as
unpleasantly
as unexpectedly called upon to change his liquor.
Jack's inclination always did use to be in favor of drinking
many bumpers rather than to submit to a single glass of brine.
I could not, therefore, help saying to him, that it must have
been rather mortifying to be subjected to the punishment
imposed
upon people who want to keep sober, while he was
giving
unchallengable evidence of his determination to get drunk.
My suggestion did not seem to find favor with mynow
fellow-passenger
,
and former fellow-sinner.
No
post mortem
reflections, Jerry, said Jack, mournfully;
you're not Coronerit's a bad businessbadbad. I'm
very penitent. Cut off in my primeno notice to quit
unhouselled
unanointed!What
killed you my boy?
I'm not dead, Jack; I'm on a voyage of discovery
playing
Orpheus. Though I don't mean to pick up a wife here.
By-the-bydo you remember that thousand? Can't you give
me an order on your executors?
No money, Jerryno money. Bursted. I'll give you a
deed, when we get across, for my New Brighton speculation,
and my City Lots in Kimakewahamaya. Have you got such
a thing as an obolus about you, to pay this old cock? what's
that? Gold! by Jove! I haven't seen such a piece of
bullion
for And here my dear friend sprang up and dashed
at my magic branch.
Sit downsit downyou'll upset usyou'll be
overboard
;
cried our oarsman. But the caution came too late.
Our whiffling skiff shivered quick from larboard to starboard,
dipping her gunnels into the water, and Jack lost his feet, and
then there was a splash, and the waters of the Styx closed over
the head of my unfortunate debtor.
There he goes. Served him right. Just as I expected,
remarked the philosophic boatman, as he kept pulling on.
Stop! stop! Charon, back water! the man will be
drowned!
Drowned, will he? He was drowned this morning.
That's three kinds of liquor he's been in to-day; and the
grim ferryman grinned.
But he hasn't secured my debt; what will become of
him?
Go to the bottom, to be sure. Here's where I generally
lose such fellows. Just half way from shore. Call it `half
seas over hole.' Grand place for eels.
But my venerable Remex, consider my deep interest in
his fate.Consider my thousand dollars. Can't you get him
up? How deep is it?
Never went down to see. Don't fret. He can't
exundize
for as many years as he owes you dollars. When the
time comes, he'll float ashore t'other side, and take his trial
with the ghosts of people who have never been buried. Don't
you know it's the law that people that an't buried can't cross
the Styx for a thousand years?
I remembered the statute as quoted by divers of the poets,
and yielded to the necessity of its requisitions.
Seeing me melancholy, the old man lit up a good-natured
smile.Come, cheer up, said he, cheer up. What's the
news on earth? How do parties get on in America?
Glorious
country, that.In danger, thoughterrible danger!
Italian Operaloco focoismgambling in stocksAnimal
MagnetismFrench legsIrish headsMaine mill sites
Oregon building lotsphrenologybanksbrokerstwig
that snapping turtle! What are your politics?
Mine, sir? I am a federal democratic whig republican,
of the loco foco genus, conservative species, whole hog in the
abstract, and always ready to sacrifice personal opinion to the
judicious principles of public policy, rightly understood in
reference
to the individual interests of the citizen. Those are
my sentiments, my friend. Permit me to inquire the state of
parties in Hell. Do the Whigs or Democrats rule the roast?
Vol. II.4
Excuse the joke; but that puts me in mind to inquire
about the firemen. How does that department vote?
O, we have no people to put out fire here. We don't
admit
them.They're so uncertain. But we've had our own
time of it, nevertheless.Pluto has had his hands full.
Listen
!
First, up gets a company of speculating ghosts, with not
an obolus among the whole lot of them, and whose turn
to cross hadn't come yet, and presents a petition to the throne,
for an act of incorporation under the title of The Salamander
Styx Bridge, and Acheron Death and Trust Company, with
banking privileges. As this was got up merely to raise the
price of building lots near Colonel Tantalus' pond, which they
had bought of Colonel Ixion at a high price with their
promissory
notes, all the loafer ghosts that had sixpence cash in
their pockets, consulted and kicked. Free Trade and Sinners'
Rights Associations were formed in every part of Tartarus.
A special committee was sent up stairs for Fanny Wright.
They contrived to get off unobserved, and the first thing we
knew, down came the man giantess. The way she walked
over the sulphur was a caution. She throttled Cerberus, and
almost choked him with a copy of the Emancipator, and
strode on to the ferry. Seeing me half way across, she dashed
into the river and came after me like a sharkupset the boat
tumbled me and six old women and a young Baptist
minister
overboard, mounted the skiff, and sculled herself ashore.
Soon as she landed, she stole away my boat hook, stuck upon
its top her handkerchief, upon which was stamped, in
indelible
red ink, the motto Equal Rights and Free Ferriesnow
and forever, one and inseparable. The ghosts turned pale,
Acheron boiled, Tartarus trembled. Pluto came out, and took
off his hat, mistaking her for Minerva on a spree. Yielding
to the divine
afflatus
which possessed her he followed her
into a convenient
spelunca
, and gave her audience. Here she
raised the watchword cry of Reform, and demanded that
he should abandon his Pagan notion of devotion to a single
wife, and that she should be made queen of Hell, No. 2.
Aschalaphus standing by, ran off, on hearing the negotiation, and
told Proserpine. Then there was the Devil to pay. Proserpine
started, in a rage, and brought out the Fates and Furies, and
rushed to the rescue of monogamy. Did you ever see women
fight?Snakes! such a row! The people in Elysium heard
it, and came rushing in. Socrates and Adam Smith, Plato
and Malthus flew to the rescue, with cries of turn her out!
turn her out! Order! Order! sung out Pluto; but no
more order could be had than on the last night of a session of
Congress when Wise is speaking. Puffpuffit's hot!
Well; how did you finally succeed in getting her out?
I can't say, my dear boy. Her ascent was as mysterious
as her advent. Both immense. Some think she's here yet.
I am interrupted, my dear Editor. If you don't hear from
below before, I will tell you the rest of the adventure, next
time I write. Please consider this letter private.
Yours truly,
J. C., Jr.
RANDOM REMINISCENCES.
4*
EARLY TWIG-ERY.
NO. I.
DEDICATED, WITHOUT PERMISSION, TO SYLVANUS MILLER, ESQ.
Just as the twig is bent the tree's inclined,
Youth straightest stands with whip well plied behind.
Pope
.
Norswoldwoof
, the celebrated Kamschatkan scholiast, in
his Philosophical Laconisms, which made so much noise
at the time of their first publication, registered, at least, one
good remark, which was rendered in Blackwood's Magazine,
in strict pursuance of the original idiom
Times is'nt as they
used to was
. Christopher North fully appreciated the
originality
and beauty of the sentiment, and bestowed half a
column of commendation upon its axiomatic composition.
Feeling a deep impression upon my own heart of the mingled
truth and pathos of the thought, I was impelled with strong
desire to study what Christopher called the untranslatable
original. The only copy, however, to be found in the
country was in possession of the New York Historical
Society,and as to getting any book off the shelves of
that institution, by a person who is not President or Secretary,
or one of the Trustees; you might as well try to get your
note discounted at a bank without being one of the directors;
or perch yourself upon a high hill, with a long rake, and
oyster for stars in the milky way. I tried to get elected a
member, and two of my sweet cousins gave me each two
shillings towards my initiation fee; but I found that there
were no meetings, and that the books were stored away for
the benefit of future ages, or else laid with well-studied
carelessness
upon the book-tables of the literaryqu.?
litterery
brokersqu.?
breakers
men profound in books
muslin
,
and well printed
calico;
and who ought, therefore, to be
able to appreciate such writers as Norswoldwoofwho had
paid their entrance money of one hundred or five hundred
dollars
to buy the glory of being published in a book as gentle-men!
who had got beyond b-ak-e-r in their spelling books, and were
patrons! of the fine arts! Heaven forgive me if I wrong
them! The heaviest affliction that I wish them is, that they
will, in some moment of unnatural wisdom, pile up their
hoarded cases in the park, and make a bonfire; and
re-supply
their shelves with Parley's Magazine, Murray's Grammar,
and Bennet's Book-keeping. Two parties will be gainers by
that operation. The thirsty student, tantalized with hot thirst
for the sealed-up fountains of sparkling knowledge which he
grasps at in vain, may look on and see the ethereal essence of
soul ascend in a curling flame, like the prophet of old, to the
Heaven from which it came; and when the burning thoughts
have left the mortal scroll upon which they were impressed,
he may gather and in-urn their ashes, and stellate them
among his household-gods. The other party referred to will
derive an advantage better appreciated by them, because more
substantial. They will learn reading, writing and
arithmetic
.
Does any one doubt that these extensive acquirements
are matters of use and adornment, of which a trader in opium,
calomel, and raw-hides ought to be proud?Look back
twenty years and tell us how many men signed their own
names. Go into the register's and surrogate's offices and
look at the deeds and wills executed by the ancestors of the
rich. Why, a Dutchman who could WRITE was looked upon
as an astrologer or necromancer; and a stray Yankee
schoolmaster
snooping out a village where he might teach young
ideas how to shoot in the day-time, and the rich farmers'
buxom daughters how to spell crucifix at night, besides
keeping singing-school Saturday evening, and leading the
choir in Mear, Wells, and Old Hundred, on the next
day, was convicted by all such young gentlemen as Abraham
Bones [whose life and experience are so happily illustrated
by Diedrich Knickerbocker] as no better than a juggler or an
obtainer of other people's chattels under false pretences.
There is a manuscript history of New York which gives an
account of a justice of the peace, before whom all the causes
in Duchess county were tried, who knew no touch of
quillgraphy
,
but held his court in the woods, where the soil was
loamy; and, by the aid of his cane and certain sticks which
he would set up, made his notes of the testimony, and
invariably
came to a correct conclusion.
But, alas!
times isn't as they used to was;
there is too
much learning abroad. People know too much. They have
studied hard names and are conceited. They carry out the
advice given by our belles-lettres professor in college, and
commit to memory
the names
of books they never read, and
cannot be made to understand. Everybody can read. Even
your Irish cook, unless she has just left her cabin in Limerick,
can spell out her missal. They have got beyond ac
ac
tion
shion
town-shun
, and are travelling into
the
ologies
. the country is in danger of being ruined by
too much light and knowledge. These two last mentioned
ambiguous names have been cracked up by all the tract and
moral reform societies as being highly preferable to bread
and butter; but what have they done? Have they demolished
sin? Have they multiplied virtue? Are public exhibitions
upon the stage of reality in Broadway, or of imitation at the
Olympic, less gross and pernicious than of old? Are the
morals of the city purified? Are we less or more like Sodom
and Gomorrah than we were when I was a boy? Men
that are thirty years of age, think. Think, I say, and curse
the men that taught Vice, that they might cure it, and be
accounted
saints;who first breathed into the virgin innocence
of the ears of their happily ignorant wives and girls that
there was such a thing as guilt;who like the serpent
seducing Eve, gave Sin a name and called it Knowledge,
promising infinite happiness, while the price of the
information
was everlasting Hell-fire! How smooth-tongued Belial
must gloat over the idiots!
No,times isn't as they used to was. That's a beauty
of a sentence. It has a present past, and a past present
mingling
in labyrinthic harmony, that fill me with rapturous
pluperfection
.
I mount, I fly.
I am a pretty good democrat, and love the largest liberty;
but I am inclined to think that I am a little
antidemonexagotheatic
.
I think Yankee schoolmasters ought to be taken up
as vagrants. Cyphering I would permit; but I would let no
one go beyond the rule of three. The use of hard words
shall be prohibited by statute. Dictionaries are so common
that boys buy them at book-auctions, and study the definitions
as they carry home your marketing, and the next day you
find them editors of a penny paper upon the strength of their
knowing the meaning of liberty, equality, and
tergiversation
.
The silliest attempt at an aphorism is
the
Schoolmaster
abroad
. How easy to answer it. An old settler
would say,
he'd better stay at home
.
Brom watch him as
he goes by the orchard
are them onions all tuk up?
Renovare dolorem
, as my friend Ritchie says, in French,
Times isn't as they used to was. We squatted, settled,
builded meeting-houses, murdered the Six Nations,
multiplied
by twelve,without knowing arithmetic, killed the
Quakers
,
burned the witches, drained the meadows, cut down the
trees, excommunicated the swearers, baptized the infants,
courted Saturday night, kissed our wives every day but Sab,
bath consecrating ourlips to singing what the minister read to
us upon that festivaltwo lines at a time,had no hymn books
cushions neitherdrew wood for the minister, tightened the
cords of his bedstead, sent our boys and girls six miles to the
school-house with apple-pie and plain cake according, and a
rose for the school master; ploughed, trapped skunks and
buried them till they got sweet; pigeons! lord, fifty at a shot
were nothingrabbits, don't mention how they criticised the
cabbages; partridges! we used to burn premature sulpher
under the apple trees to save the buds!
Then
we had no
schools for astronomy, chemistry and French. Every boy
knew the pointers and the North Star, and he felt, moreover,
when he planted his quiet little cettage, fronting the South,
with his milk and cheese dairy deep in the hill side, five
yards from the kitchen, that his own best-loved Katrina would
have things handy.Were not these people virtuous, good,
and happy? Yet they could not writethey could not read.
Some of them, however, occasionally could spell. But of
what use was reading and writing to them. Their Domine
and the Squire could write their testaments and guide their
timorous faith. The old Doctor could sew up their
scythe-cuts
and set their dislocated bones; and the news of stirring
incidents were purely, truly brought by neighbor to confiding
friend. Would a christian, or an honest man, pour the
Herald, or Exhibitions of New York as it is, into the
bosoms of those ignorant lilies of innocence? Would the God
of Heaven permit Satan to spit venom upon his own
radiation
of beauty?
Times isn't as they used to was.By-the-by,I
have been beating over ground that I did not intend to travel
onboggymuddy,but my dog is wild, and sometimes
makes false points and wont come in. The illustration of
Norswoldwoof's sentiment I intended to confine to
scholastics
,
or the accomplishment of scholars. I can not do
better
than to give a touch of my own experience.
Before I begin, I want to ask a favor. I will give eighteen
pencespecieto any individual who will deliver, for me,
to the Editor of the
Spirit of the Times
, a copy of
Webster's
Spelling-book
. Don't send me the kakosyllabic
monstrosity
which he calls a dictionary; I mean the old thing
which he wrote before he forgot what he learned at school,
and invented a new alphabet. I want the old book with the
story about the green milkmaid, and of the landlord of the
apple-tree stoning a boy, and the Justice deciding that Dr.
Johnson's dictionary was an ox, and Noah's a Cape Cod bull
cash down.
If a gentleman of leisure were to make up his mind
that is a ridiculous expression, and I stop. Your chambermaid
may make up your bed, after you had been beseeching
multiplied pillows to give you one hour's quiet respite from a
headache. Penny-liars may make up at a moments'
warning a drowned man, a burglary, or a Corlear's-hookerism;
but
mind
has nothing to do with
manufacture
. Mind thinks,
radiates. It is impulsic. It rides with the lightning
before
the wind. It flashes, and you feel the vivid flagration in your
heart before you start from the burst air upon the drum of
your trembling ear.
Of all the modern inventions that have brought sin and
death into the world, next to Madame Lecompte's legs and
Colman's engravings, the holy church doth especially
anathematize
Sunday Schools. They teach snotty-nosed little
scarecrows what A is, truly; and the sweet infants reward
the pious zeal of their pedagogues in lisping complimentary
anthems, and in committing to memory the interesting detail
of the processes by which the venerable Jacob made money,
and the still more pure history of the loves of David and
Solomon. That is the doctrine of the Pope. You may call
it his bull, but it is not Irish only. I am Roman on this
subject, and agree with the fathers that the book ought
to be sealed, or else only wisely interpreted by a consecrated
priest. None but a Levite should approach the altar, much
less intrude into the Penetralia. Yet how is the fact in this
boasted land of equal rights and equal wisdom? Why
every bastard blasphemer who can read a sentence, lays
hold of the horns of the sanctuary, and butchers with impious
knife his bloody victim. Walter Scott was of my opinion,
when he said out of the mouth of one of his friends, I tell
thee, Elspeth, the word killeth. The literal unexplained
text, whose metaphors and allegories no old women in the
land can circumvent may reduce to misery the wretched soul
whom it was written to beckon to salvation. The heart of
diamond may be within its rough exterior, but give it
unpolished
,
untranslated by the wise, and it will be a millstone
about the neck of the outside speculator. Pope had this
rivulet of thought running through his head when he wrote,
A little learning is a dangerous thing,
Drink deep or taste not the Pierian spring.
Are we any happier for being able to read and write?
Are we stronger, healthier, handsomer, taller, honester, than
our grandsires? Can we beard wolves in their den, and ride
down perpendicularities better than old General Put? Can
we fight better than the boys did at Bunker Hill? Can we
pray more zealously and successfully than people did when
every pulpit, weekly, uplifted its voice to Heaven, and
obsecrated
the sore smiting of the Hessians? Will any person
write a Declaration of Independence, and dare Tom
Jefferson's
ghost to bet and leave it to men which is the best.
Is there any militia colonel who will accept a pair of silver
pitchers for his laborious struggles through the mud of
Broadway
,
and try to rival General Washington's address? Yet
these were the times when a man who could read and write
was a great scholar. The locusts of the printing press had
not yet blighted the land. The dragon's teeth of type had
not been sown. If an old newspaper got, by accident, into
a peaceful village, the fact was known forthwith, and the
Squire engaged to investigate and read it. The sheet was
looked upon suspiciously, and more thoughts dwelt upon the
devil than upon the printer. The Arabian Nights would
have had equal credence. That was not the way the
Revolutionists
got their news. Few could read, but all could
distrust
an Editor's solemn leader, because it was in the paper.
Who believed in Chatham? Who trusted Duane? No! when
there was a robbery, or a riot, a strike for liberty, or a row,
Fame carried the report in her mouth, holding hard on a
running
horse. The lads rode and ran. Ah! well! the race
of Dutch horses in extinct. Times isn't as they used to
was.
This random prologue, written
ad mulcendos animos
of
of the jewelry of knowledge stampers, from the apex of the
Vol. II.5
regents of the university down to the base of the distributors
of the Common School fund, now restores my boiler to the
proper thinness of pressure. I have let off steam enough,
and go ahead.
The first school I went to was a Madam's. I forget her
name. She kept her brainpan in John street, opposite Dutch
place. All I remember of my own acquirements isfirst,
the experience of a dark coal hole, under the stairway
secondly
,
biting pins crooked and putting them, point up, where
the girls sat and wiggled,not attending to their lessons,
and thirdly and lastly, going up before the whole school and
asking the old lady, while I held tight on my posterior
tegument
,
Ma'am please to let me go out?
Next, aunt Platt tried to teach me the humanities. A
good soul was she, sixty odd, fat, pious, kind, benevolent, a
lover and excuser of child-faultery. Mother she never was,
but to the romping rascalities that other people sent her to
adopt. And she did adopt them. She looked upon a school
of thirty, and called them MY CHILDREN. Happy labor
was thine, dear aunt, for the very kindness of thy gentle
punishment of looking into our eyes and speaking one word
our christian namewith those lips threatening to open,
but at the same time promising not to burst apartthat little
lock of oh! too soon! grey hair swelling out beneath the cap
that we put in a penny a-piece to buy for theethe gentle
pressure of thy left hand, while the dexter lifted, in threat
only, the smooth-shaven ferrule. No man can doubt that
woman died happy. It is a solemn fact that her first bridal
was her burial. She was too good for men, and slept in
Heaven
.
She died in Dr. Spring's session room, singing,
Jesus lover of my soul,
Let me to thy bosom fly.
Hotham was the tune.
By this time I had acquired the alphabet, and could read.
Women's schools then began to get into bad repute, unless
they had gentlemen professors. Taste grew collegiate.
Grescom lectured on chemistry, and taught children how to
make soft soap. Tammany Hall was whitewashed, and
several sachems sent their girls to French boarding institutes.
Then commenced reform. The phrase he can't write his
name came into acceptation. Albums and book-tables
glittered
in the parlors of good society. People who couldn't
address a letter to their wives without excruciating valuable
words, affixed their certificates to reports of the West Point
examinations, vouching for the accuracy of the details, and
the supreme perfection of the students. Gammon governed
and flourished. Blessed discrimination and honesty of the
appointing power! how the retired gin-distiller, and the one
thousand per cent mixers of rhubarb and magnesia swelled
and looked wise!
In treating of Twiggery, I ought, perhaps, to order all and
classify the genera and species. I would do so, but for my
certain conviction, that no man will read this excursion who
has not, in some pliant hour, been licked. Every body
knows what a twig is. It is built of hickorywillow,
that's poor, and breaks easy,cowhide, dressed leather,
twisted eel-skin, or plaited horse-hair;enoughenough
my back bites the tender stripes of yet unfilled-up
reminiscences
.
After aunt Platt was taken away, I first began to
know the modifications of twiggery. When the old woman
went to Heaven, I was sent to Picket. It was considered
necessary that my growing intellect should have some of
his
manure upon me, and that
he
should plough and harrow my
temper. He kept his menagerietrue name, for the boys
were treated like wild beastsin Chamber-street, near
Hudson
.
He had a couple of sons for understrappers, but they
were
Dii minores
. The old man was Jupiter, and
allowed
nobody else to thunder. Grim, coarse, whiskered,
belly-protruding, slow of foot, quick of eye, he strode
between
the benches of trembling defaulters, who knew not
what to call their offence, the Arbaces of heartless
pedagogues
.
He never laughed but once. That was when he
called the whole school around his throne, and announced
that he had just come from the Marine Court, and had
nonsuited
the father of one of the little boys down stairs, in
room No. 1, in an action brought against him for
pummelling
the infant to death. [The plaintiff's pleader made a
mistake, and put in death in his declaration instead of
almost to death.] Then the master laughed; and when
he got through, he ordered three cheers for discipline, which
the boys, as they had nothing else to be cheerful about, gave
clear and strong. Then the master grinned. I see his
sardonic
smile in my mind's eye now.
What I learned at this institute is more than I can tell.
My memory goes to the cutting northeasters that rushed upon
me as I turned the corner of Chamber street, and to the
systematic
ingenuity of the strange inventions of Picket's cruelty
ecce signum!
John Amos! come up here. I saw you,
sir. Lie down. And the victim would lie upon the dirty
floor at extended length, like a self-immolator before the
wheels of Juggernaut.
Shorts
, down. That made two
sides of a square; to make it equilateral and complete, he
would pick out boys of similar size, so that if Amos and
Shorts were called down, every boy knew that Jim Cobble
and Earnest Fustian were to go next. When the substratum
was laid, the old man began to pile; and the human
hecatombs
that we sometimes made ought to be illustrated for the
benefit of all the travellers who intended to favor the world
with further dissertations upon the pyramids of Egypt.
Another quaint branch of twiggery for which this old
gentleman
was peculiar was his military distribution of discipline.
When he became tired of seeing and smelling the prostrate
group of culprits, squeezing the very wind out of each other
at his feet, he would order up a cohort of fresh boys, and tell
them to recite the lesson which they began to study five
minutes
before. Of course they didn't know it. A licensed
butcher would have said in one of those moments What a
lovely sight! and as he looked upon a dozen hands stretched
out in a long row, after the order right dresspresent
arms, ready to receive the broad slap of the heavy ball-bat,
taken from some base player, who ought to have known
too much to carry it to school! How the old man's
countenance
would light up and burn with almost Mosaic fire as he
reviewed the line, firing his own
feu de joies
slap! slam!
spank!
But I cannot help thinking that the most ingenious
twiggery
for which the old man is to be praised, he inflicted upon
me miserable. It was a refinement that has made him an
honorary member of the Holy Inquisition in Rome already,
and will certainly ordain him as the cunningest cardinal in
Avernus evermore. What the offence was for my life I
cannot
tellI sincerely believe there was none, and if I did
admit
guilt, it was only because the tyrant frightened me. No
matter now. Only mark his twiggery. I was ordered down
stairsthe school was dismissed, not a lad remained but poor
I. John was despatched for that door. It was brought,
a veritable antique of continental times, blown off its hinges.
It was laid over the tops of the settees and desks. I was
invited
to mount it, and lie upon my back in the figure of a
5*
Saint Andrew's cross.
Lie you there, you puppy
, said the
old man. Don't stir.
John the ropes and some coarse salt
.'
They left me. Twothey seemed two hundredlong hours
did I wait for my torturers. They went in to tea, and forgot
me. Night closed around the empty benches, and some
floor-scourer
came with a lamp, and starting as at a thief, inquired
what I was doing there?
I fledfear winged my feet
desperation gave me courage. I pleaded and remonstrated
with my father. I was picketed never more.
Next I went to Morse's, in Nassau street. My blessings
rest upon that amiable, affectionate man. He was too mild
for a
schoolmaster
, as that name is commonly interpreted.
Fatherfriendbrotherwould be better. He accomplished
by kindness what Picket could not get out by twiggery. He
made us love him, for he was kind, he made us look up to
him, for he was good, he made us obey him, for he was just.
I never saw him in a passion. He treated children as
reasonable
beings, and I think he would rather have knelt at the feet
of a wayward miscreant, and pleaded to him to be dutiful, than
box his ears, or compass his trowsers,which process, I
regret
to admit, with some misbegotten brats is sometimes
indispensible
.I
learned a good deal here for a boy. The
greatest discovery I made was in animal physics. I learned
that I had a heartI fell in loveI never told herwith
Elizasomethingnot to be mentionedwho was always
head of her class, and got the highest rewards of worthy
commendation
.
I have seen her several times since the old school
was broken up and it always put me in mind of Adam's
grammar
,
and
amo, amare, amari, amatum
. Schoolboy dreams;
spring lightningmeteors.
I don't precisely recollect what calamity dissolved my last
referred-to apprenticeship, and consigned me to other
twiggery
;
but I found myself one summer afternoon at Basken.
ridge, in New Jersey, boarding with old squire Lewis, in
company
with six or eight exurbened candidates for literary glory,
under the care of the excellent and reverend Doctor Finlay
and his man Fridayman-every-day, I ought to sayLeek.
The Doctor was a good-natured creature, and his sternness
was affectedhe was a hypocrite only in pretending to be
cross. Monday mornings he regularly marched into school
with a bunch of hickory twigs, that would have adorned the
the most provident lictor in Italia. Hum ceased as the pace
begansolemn quiet looked between stealthy eyelashes. Of
whom Mr. Leek complained nobody knew. The last night's
report was quite as uncertain as the name of the next cashier
who is to be found out. Yet somebody had to be twigged, and
that we all knew. Whether it would be owing to the spiteful
malice of Leek, or to the Doctor's firm adherence to the maxim
of spare the whip and spoil the child, we all knew that
whack had to come. The old man was moderate, though,
and soon lost his strength, and broke his whips intentionally,
and then went home and wrote his sermon for next Sunday,
leaving us in the care of Leek. That Leek!Medusa is
painted with grinning snakes snapping at you from her
forehead
.
What a husband she would have had in that usher,
with his cat-o'-sixty-nine-tails swinging from his long, lean,
foul-nailed fingers! The personification of famine,
consumption
,
bitterness, and spite, conglomerated and condensed!
To pull a boy's ear who was startled from his book by a flock
of pigeons skirring near the windowto catch some
unfortunate
in the act of laughing at an adventurous mouse intruding
into the repository of Baskenridge learningto get a sly crack
at any boy's bottom!that put Leek into heaven. I don't
know what salary he got, but his personal appearance was as
mean as his inside was vulgar. He perhaps had socks and a
false shirt-bosom, but he stank of that horrid disease of
want
of waterism
. He was a decided loafer. He mistook his
vocation, and should have established himself in the calamus
pond near the school-house, and watered with the
bloodsuckers
.
He might have thus avoided the prospective reputation
which Ovid wrote for him, referring to his pulling juvenile
hair, and scraping for rare love in monkeys' heads, and
finding
none but of the entomological species
Unguibus et raras veilentem dentibus herbes.
I gathered here, however, more than I learned in any
eighteen months before. Principal, was wickedness, and
secondary, smooth-faced falsehood. The one followed the
other, as Lucifer's tail coursesno, streamssticks
arrowpointed
hisses after its master's handsheads!after
not so. I found that I was a simple goose when my father
left me, and drove back, leaving me his paternal blessing, with
a shilling to buy fish-hooks, and that I didn't know nothing.
I was no scholar, and the whole lot of boys was on me with
tricks, practices, and levies innumerable and scandalous. I
stood it until my eyes got opened, and then I fought. It was
a Philadelphia boy; let him deny it. I did do itand the
whole school saw itJim Black stood by.Poor Jim's dead.
But it was effectualmy reputation was established, and
nobody dared to follow my tracks, and let down my figurey
4's in the great swamp, or the parsonage woods, or touch
my reed-pole floating for catfish in Doty's pond. Leek was
the only enemy that could smite me. His inflictions I took
as a matter of duty, or perhaps habit, just as I now take sugar
to my coffee, and salt to my beefsteak. The frolics and the
mimic deviltry of that school after I got into the cabinet, I
have not time to record now. Wisdom crowned my forehead,
and know-a-thing-or-two-or-osity sparkled in the centre of the
diadem.
With such acquisitions, I was brought home and sent to
blind Joe Nelson to prepare for college. I looked at Joe, and
Joe felt me. He had
his
instrument of twiggery in his hand
at the time, consisting of a thong of leather, between which
and his hand there was an electrical sympathy; and with
that he seemed to feel the condition of my flesh, and estimate
what possible twiggery it could bear. His blue, bright,
lightless
eyes knew nothing; but his whip saw. Certain it is, its
accurate stripes made delinquents wish they had a
lightning-rod
to carry the fiery streak down from their non-conducting
shoulders, and precipitate into the earth their hot sufferance
of random vengeance. John Walsh, the junior partner, or
head clerk, looked on with both his foreheads, and all his
chins, and grinned his satisfaction. Then we all studied out
aloud. Double, double, toil and trouble, snakes,
witchcraft
,
Greek, and algebra were all studied at together. The
essence of the sound, if condensed by a curious chemist,
would have been a mixture to be named. We were examined
and admitted as freshmen in Columbia. I laid my cheek upon
the bosom of Alma.
I must rest now, I am upon holy ground. Discuss we this
new culture of twiggery with solemn awfulness. I am
exalted
to the upper air. Base cuffs, vanish!
EARLY TWIG-ERY.
NO. II.
REMINISCENCES OF OUR CLASS IN
COLLEGE.
Whoever has to College been,
Must surely know the joy, Sir,
To see old Granny prose and grin,
And flatter every boy, Sir.
Yankee Doodle, you have spoke
With great propriety, Sir,
You are a credit to yourself,
And honor unto me, Sir.
That
is a torn chaplet from the festive wreath, which thou,
dear Doctor Bill T, didst fling upon the altar of our
affections
,
on that roysterous night, when we solemnized a
wake over the corpse of the class of eighteen hundred and
blank. The smoke of the incense of the altar went up
gloriously
.
It was a melancholy, frolicksome, mad symposium.
Commencement
was ended. The speeches had been spoken.
The berries and the leaves of the bacca-laureation had been
plucked. Each ingenuous youth had got his due share of
tu vero videas, probe te geras
,
[8]
[8]
Part of the President's charge when he enacts the solemnity of
making
an A. B., and gives the diploma on commencement day,copied from
the dedicatory injunction used by Pope Benedict XIV., on the installation
of Black Nuns.
to start him ahead upon his
journey through this world of trouble. The attentive
audience
had been dismissed with thanks for their civil behavior,
and a benediction in Latin. We were let loose to
seek
our fortunes. The blessing of our Alma Mater was fresh
upon our heads, the memory of the happy days we had
labored
in her household was green and bitter in our hearts.
We had her best recommendation for sobriety, honesty, and
extensive capacity, in our pockets.
Optim spei juvenis
,
[9]
[9]
The common complimentary lie in the diploma.
was wreathed around our brows. We were proud, and
humbled
,
happy and wretched. The new sense of boyhood gone,
and manhood begun, of not understood independence, crazed
us. We walked on stilts.We felt the earth pressing down
upon us as on a clod.We were newly married.We had
lost our mother.The tie was severed.We were turned
out of house and home.We should never be called before
the board again.We had been torn from the breasts of our
beautiful nurse, and from the blessed fountains whence we
had been accustomed to suck our daily milk of Greek particles,
and conic sections, and were thrown into the streets to make
room for a new set of brats whom the professors had been
lately getting! We were collegians no more! Good bye,
black silk gown. Good bye, old trees. Good bye, bell.
Good bye, janitor. But not yet had we said, Good bye,
fellows
.
A very afflicting valediction had been pronounced for
us, in the church, it is true, and much tears were talked of,
by a speaker appointed by the board. But that appointment
was not ours, and the pathos reached the hearts of other
classes than the senior.
Our
valedictory orators pronounced,
and sung, their
valete
, at Kensington House, where our
parting
supper was spread. We were all orators, and poets too,
that night. But chiefly thee, Dear Doc, did Anacreon fill
full of inspiration. Why wert thou at the foot of thy class,
O thou Son of Song!
The declared estimate of merit of boy students does not
always stellate either the honesty, or discrimination of the
judges. I do not say this out of bad spite because I carried
away none of the honors. My vexation is that such
excellent
merit as the Doctor's should have borne off what is next
to disgrace. But no matter, dear Bill; thou wert up head in
our love; and it is better to have warm, full hearts, without
honors, than a cold, empty honor without a share in your
classmates affections. Remember, too, that gigantic Dr.
Mitchell was accounted worthy to be graduated in an equal
rank. And thou wert comforted with the companionship of
Junius T, and Jack T, forming with thee, a goodly
musical T. party; all since, solemn medical doctors. Jun.
and Jack, alas! breathe no more the atmosphere of this earth.
They are with the school-fellows of Justice Silence. Years
since, ye died, boys, in your yet unexhausted adolescence.
Pax vobiscum!
How many of us are left? Let us call the
roll, and see.
Shall we call the roll of the dead, and demand our friends
from the grave? Aye! let us bring back the old college
chapel, and the familiar lecture-rooms, and the healthy youth
that defied mortality with its well-knit muscles, and the sport
and the loves of boy enthusiasm. Classmates, come!
Attention
to the calling of the roll! ADSUM is the word.
Harry
P.!
Harry
P.!Thou wert at the head of thy
class worthily. But thou answerest not now to thy name
called. Thy place is empty, and we must mark thee absent.
O sorrow! not for thee, but for us who mourn so much genius
and virtue lost to us!
Noble, magnanimous, proud Harry! A boy patriot, stately,
exclusive, jealous of his right of citizenship, heir of a rich
estate, distrustful of the common herd, hater of Irishmen!
He worshipped Hamilton. But the grave holds him now,
whom the Senate-house expected;his body only, not his
fame. Death, not Oblivion, has triumphed. Before the
Destroyer
came he honored his country, and kissed the soil of
Greece dear to him for his love of her heroes and
philosophers
.
He comforted blood-stained Marathon, and,
danger-daring
,
dealt out the charities of his country to the suffering
islands of the gean. The Turk cursed him, and the bread
which he brought to the lips of the daughters of Pindar and
Demosthenes.
Harry wrote his travels and experience. But he was
modest, and he did not write for lucre, eking out his landlord's
rent by inklings spattered from a bitten pen. No printer's
devils, bought with unknown clean shirt-collars, extolled the
praise of his unaffected story. His book knew no puffs, and
has been only a thing to steal from. But he is honored where
his spirit would have sought honor, and it matters not that the
million of ladies'weeklymiscellanies never had
communion
with his spirit.
Bill
J.No. 2, answers here, and we give hearty thanks
for the hope that some good fellows are left to us. Three
years and a half did studious, always prepared Billy, wear the
crowning laurels of laborious desert; but he laughed, one day,
out of season, during the senior year, and
alter
,Harry,
tulit honores
. He was saved the necessity of writing a
salutatory in Latinhe abjured the past, and the present, and
consoled himself with a poem on the pleasures of
anticipation
.
It is a thing to be recorded and rejoiced at, that his
anticipations were bright, and better yet, that they have not
been fashions of deceitful fancy. The purest ermine on his
neck, gives ample vouchers for his acknowledged excellence.
Bill is the same Bill yet;simple, but wise;
unpretending
,
Vol. II.6
but learned;single-hearted,guile never knew him, nor
uneasy envy. To do what would make him happy,that
was his only exertion; and he never was happy, but in doing
good, or in helping along some piece of doubtful evil which
was needful for the comfort of his friends. You cannot
provoke
him, nor make him jealous. He looked sorrowful for
only two minutes, when he heard the annunciation of his lost
first honor. It would not grieve him now, to be defeated by
one vote, in a contest for a seat in Congress. Put Woodfall
and the Revised Statutes under his arm, and he is the same
boy that he was when he went down Park Place, hugging
Euclid, Vince, and Greca Majora.
Nextnextnext;I never did exactly comprehend
the adjustment of the honors of scholarship in our class;but
next, I believe, comes the ValedictatorI stand by that
word. It means a dictator appointed by the board of
professors
,
to take care that the boys bid each other good-bye before
the ladies and gentlemen, according to the forms of the
bye-laws
of the college, for that purpose duly established and
enacted
.
I have forgiven thee, O careful minder of rules and
regulations
,
obedient, good boy; and I love thee, now, moderately.
Yet it was a pity, that, of all the class, thou only wert present
on that morning when I was doomed to read, in the chapel,
after prayers, before the assembled college, with crocodile
penitence, a sorrowful admission of the enormity of my
adjudged
iniquity, and to exalt the merciful mildness of the
retribution
!
Thy presence spoiled the
oneness
of the effect.
The freshmen, too, might have mistaken thee for the culprit,
or coupled thee with me, miserable as a joint transgressor.
But the offence was not very rank, and they could not have
held thee disgraced. I protest that that punishment was cruel
and unusual. So thought my classmates; and I being
ignorant
,
and utterly innocent of conspiracy, they resolved to be
absent on the morning of the execution.
[10]
[10]
It is no more than justice to myself to state what was the offence. I
therefore give an original record, being the half-burned rough minutes of the
trial, picked up by me in the college yard, and which the janitor had,
probably
,
incautiously swept out of the President's room. I give also a copy
of the letter which the good old man sent to my father, for the purpose of
making sure of my attendance at the time and place to which the ceremony
was postponed. The letters are perfect models in their waysafe
precedents
.
The record is half consumed, but I give a
fac-simile
of its remains.
Cypress appeared before the board on a charge of disturbing * *
irreverent
be-of
the Chapel by talking; which fact being fully proved ig- * * *
the
of several of several the professors & partially admitted * * * * *
also
board after mature deliberation sentenced him to di * * * * *
and not to be received by him
-tion until he had made such acknowledgment * * * * * * *
and ats as the board should consider satisfactory.
The following is the President's epistle, scilicet.
King's Coll., Shrove Tuesday
.
Sir
Your son, J. Cypress, Jr, signed an acknowledgement of his
incorrect
behavior during the religious exercises of the Chapel, which he was
to have read on Tuesday last; but perceiving that most of his classmates
were then absent, I deferred his reading it until I should have an
opportunity
of informing the class of the consequence of a combination to resist the
authority of the College. I have given them that information, and have
ordered their attendance in the Chapel at prayers to-morrow, when I shall
expect your son to appear and read the reasonable acknowledgment he has
subscribed. I have thought it my duty to make this communication to you,
being assured that your son cannot fail to profit by your good advice on this
occasion.
With great respect, Your ob't serv't.
To J. Cypress, Senior, Esq.
Now follows the writ of intrabit in executionis locum which put me
in the pillory; to wit:
Rev'd Sir
,It is with pain that I learn that my son has been guilty
of incorrect behavior during the religious exercises of the chapel. Be
assured
that it meets my decided disapprobation. A sense of our
unworthiness
when we approach the presence of the Sovereign of Heaven and
Earth in prayer ought to affect onr hearts with due solemnity. I regret
the trouble he has given you, and the disgrace he has brought upon himself,
and I pray God that the discipline imposed upon him will have a salutary
effect. He has my orders to attend the chapel to-morrow morning, and
comply with your directions. Indisposition has prevented his attendance
to-day, which I hope you will excuse.
Your ob't serv't,
J.
Cypress
.
To
Pres. King's Coll.
That is the kind of Twiggery administered to boys when they get into
College, and are called Gentlemen. Twiggery for small boys is only
milk and water. This is imperial tea.
God bless their noble souls! Only thou wert there, sitting
with meekness and sweet humility, and pitying, doubtless,
those bad young men who imposed it upon thee to represent the
virtue of the class, and to reap the meed of the contrast of thy
good behavior;like Hogarth's good apprentice, who
married
his master's daughter, and got the estates and honors of
the family.
Verily, good boys shall have their reward. Prosperity
shall still follow
thee
, O my friend!assiduous, watchful, vain,
subtle, obsequious to the People,the People shall yet own
thee for a mighty man to get office from them.
Let us go on with the roll. P. M. is called and comes;
and we clasp to our bosom the spirit of poetry and the soul of
friendship. He was the favorite of the class, the prized and
admired. What sensibility of criticism, or what instability of
purpose, dearest P., deprives the class of the honor of thy
name, long since by heaven decreed to be celebrated for
mighty genius.
By his side, coming with modest steps, approaches amiable
Stephen
H. His thin form, pale cheek, light blue eye,his
pleasantly smiling, half opened lips, disclosing small brilliantly
white teeth, are familiar and welcome as heretofore. Only
he is older, and there is a cast of care upon his brow, deeper,
and half melancholy. Happy is that village church which
owns him for her pastor.
Next, jolly I. F. dashes to his place, and we greet his rosy
face with the well-remembered joy of old times. He first
gave his heart to the study of the decisions of Courts that have
powers to overrule the established fashions of other brother
and sister tribunals, and which are commonly called Law;
but soon, and wisely, determined that the whole race of
Bracton
and Britton were unprofitable company; and now he
draws a revenue from rum, sugar and molasses. Mark him
present with a whole heart.
Bill
B. cannot speak. Consumption wasted away him,
beloved both by the professors and his fellow-pupils. Weep
not. It is the common lot. We have all got to go soon.
Call on.
J. S. gives an uncertain sound. His voice is as the voice
of a ghost, or else as of a schoolmaster buried alive in the far
west. I know not how to mark him.
Good-hearted S. O., too. He left his country, and pursued
the lucre of merchandize in a foreign land. Does the sunny
sky, or the cold earth of the churchyard canopy his head.
He is absent without excuse.
H. J., solemn and dignified for a little fellow, wears a
bishop's
cassock, and seems to censure the freedom with which
we summon old associates; but he takes his seat and submits
to our invocation.
G. W. flourishes with the scalpel and lancet. Impatient
haste draws him to his patients. We must let him depart.
He is one of the friends to whom we might give authority in
an extreme case to
cut us
, but then, only professionally.
G. H. ministers to the reformed Dutch in a pleasant town
in Jersey. When I saw him last, some years ago, he
6*
had given proof of his power of persuasion, by inducing a
prime lamb of his flock to become his spouse; and she had
given fruitful evidence of her attachment to the shepherd, in
the shape of half-a-dozen little lambkin boys and girls.
F. P. comes next, true gentleman, from his magnificent
manor, nor avoids a seat with his classmates, who always
received
him open-armed. Goddess Fortune, when she smiled
upon him, took off her bandage and exercised good judgment.
G. G. rather majestic at some times, but always
good-natured
.
G. cries out a hearty here. He worshipped the
legal muses, and still officiates in their priesthood, speaking
oracles to clients, who, with just confidence, pay well for
favorable
responses.
W. C. leaps into his place with a long bound;he whom
we used to call Amaryllis,with his soft, feminine cheek,
clear gentle eye, and beginning-to-grow downy chin. He was
famous for a quick moving foot, and was always chosen first
at foot-ball. I have to show a scar upon my knee, gained
from him upon the Battery, in the raging melee. The class
got through trigonometry while I was laid up, and that consoled
me. He plays now the serious games of
for that whereas
,
and
may it please your Honor
. The boy ball-player has
disappeared in the Counsellor of men.
The list is nearly through; Death has made sad havoc
below the middle of the class. There are left, besides, to
answer only W. M. and W. G., bred to the legal bar, but
happily
independent upon that laborious profession;and then,
dear
Doctor Bill
, and E. P., of unquestionable talent and
laziness
,
Nimrod of the class,mighty feather scatterer. We
awarded to him the first honor in that department of science,
which comprises the theory of percutient bodies, and the
composition
and resolution of forces and projectiles. That kind
of philosophy was truly natural to himhe was born to
illustrate
it. I never knew a practical lecturer who, the initial
velocity being given, could better find the direction in which
a body must be projected in order to hit a given point. He
is high yet on some kind of
points,
and almost inimitable as
to direction.
Let us not forget C. E., honored with a diploma,
causa
favoris
,
and the payment of the necessary fees;nor simple
G. S.,
commee
, as his name went. He was the jovial
Andronicus
of the class, yet was sometimes pathetic, and read
compositions about the streaming rivulet of consistency
which flows but to cement, and other poetical melancholies
of the same tender spirit. Commee paid the fees, however,
and got his diploma. Money is a great blessing. Where the
boy is now the Lord knows. Mark him absent.
What horrid appetite of the grave has swallowed up the
rest of the three last grades! Little, hump-backed P. S., and
red-haired Tom K., and strong-passioned E. S., and thin J. L.,
torn from the church, and fat Duck W., and pale, innocent
shadow W. F., who answered to the
sobriquet
of Sol Lob,
and musical Jack T., with his ever-present companion Jun?
Alas! boys
You are not here! the quaint witch Memory sees
In vacant chairs, your absent images,
And points where once you sat, and should be now,
But are not.I demand if ever we
Shall meet as then we met?
Shelley
.
Stay! stay! stay! stay! I recall my invocation! Speak
not, I conjure you! Speak not! My heart is gone! I
cannot
bear the solemn vision!
What fearful changes are produced by the revolution of a
few short years! We entered, a class of forty-seven. We
were graduated, a class of twenty-nine; of this number only
nineteen are surviving, counting some bachelors as existing
of whom I have no certain knowledge! It seems but as
yesterday
that we were boys; and now we are mature men,
clergymen
,
physicians, lawyers, merchants, judges, legislators,
fathers in the Republic! It never occurred to me before that
I am getting old. It is time for me to repent and reform. Dr.
Wilson used to say that our class was the worst class that he
ever had to do with, and he was pleased to assure me upon one
occasion that I was the worst young mon in it. I wonder
whether I have improved any. But he did me injustice there,
I never threw a torpedo on the floor between the Doctor's
legs, merely to see him jump, nor did I ever let loose in the
lecture-room a mouse, or any other quadruped, as did some
sad boys with longer faces, and in better credit than myself.
I seriously affirm that my only guilt has been that of an
accessory
after the fact, in laughing at the silly joke. Yet I had
not occasionally to suffer for
imputed
transgressions, as thou,
dear Doc., canst testify. But I never quarrelled with thee,
Doc., about that matterand it is all over now. Let the
thing go.
Here I am! here I am! And what am I, that I am left to
write these reminiscences? Where is my recorded merit,
my service done to the church, or to my country, of which
this prolonged duration of life is the reward? Let me retire,
and give myself an examination. I am, I think, awakened.
A FEW INTERESTING INCIDENTS IN THE
TERRESTRIAL
EXISTENCE OF A YOUNG MAN
WHO USED TO LIKE HORSES.
I love
a good, fast horse. I luxuriate in a well balanced
buggy. If my biography be ever written,
gaudet equis
will
be the weathercock quotation set above the history to show
which way the wind of its lucubration is about to blow. My
equine propensities were developed as soon as I could toddle
upon truant feet to the nearest stable in the neighborhood. At
the sixth year's existence, I abstracted a shilling from my
stepmother's
work box, to pay the man that kept the zebra; but I
honestly paid it back, with funds acquired the next day by
running away from school and holding the horses of two
militia
colonels, when they dismounted on the parade ground,
for a grand review by the brigadier general.
Our milk-man had a horse; he was not a very especial
beauty; but couldn't he go fast around the corner! I once
knocked down a little peanut girl, and turned Maiden-lane into
a very palpably milky way, by trying to find the maximum of
proximity which might be attained between a pump and the
hub of a wheel, without any necessary collision of contiguous
particles of matter. Like many other philosophers, I came
near sacrificing my life to my scientific zeal, just at the
moment
when I deemed my discovery secure, and my triumph
certain and glorious. The jealous fates, as usual, interfered,
and with violent rage at my promised success, precipitated
me across the street into the centre of the peanut
establishment
just referred to. Down went the lady-merchant, and
down went her apples, peanuts and barbers'-poles. I felt sorry
for the poor thing, but it was all her fault, for not getting out
of the way; or else it was the fault of the corporation in
planting
such a stubborn hydrodynamical obstacle at the corner of
the street.
This was but the preface to more glorious exploits, the
entitulement
of a long chapter of spirit-stirring accidents. The
incidents of my life have been but a catalogue of the names
of danger. I have been run away with by frightened, and
kicked and bitten by vicious steeds; I have been thrown from
stumblers; I have broken down in sulkies; I have been
upset
in gigsin fine,for the whole catalogue would be
tedious,I have been crushed, and banged and bruised, and
battered in all manner of imaginable fashions; so that it is a
crying mercy that I have fingers left to write this penitential
confession. Indeed, when I reflect upon my various
hair-breath
salvations, I cannot help thinking of what an eminently
amiable Dutch gentlewoman told certain foraging pupils of a
country boarding-school, concerning some choice forbidden
fruit, touching which we had mounted a tree in her garden.
Don't hook them are cherries, boys, she screamed, I'me
resarved
them for presarves. O! what a jubilate would go up
from my blessed maiden aunts, were the promise of a hope to
be shadowed forth, that I am reserved for some better function
than to moisten the shears of Mistress Beldame Atropos!
When I had escaped so far as my sixteenth year, I was
driving a spirited, half-broken colt before a pleasure wagon,
near a country village, in the neighborhood of which myself
and my companion expected to shoot on the succeeding day.
It was just at night, and our journey was nearly completed.
All of a sudden, our whiffle-tree became detached from the
vehicle, and fell upon the horse's heels. Off then he started,
in the madness of his fright, utterly uncontrollable, and
whirling
us after him in the bounding wagon. The trees and fences
appeared and vanished like lightning; we seemed to fly. All
that I could pray for, was to be able to keep our racer in the
road, and I hoped to hold him on a straight and steady run,
until the furious animal should be exhausted. Vain hope!
my hands were soon powerless from the strain of holding and
sawing and pulling on the reins. Just at this crisis, a little
green lane, running at right angles with the turnpike, invited
the wilful feet of our crazy colt, by a fair promise of an easy
road, and a speedy barn-yard termination. But, alas! not
three bounds had the runaway made upon his new chosen
course, before he brought us upon a spot where they were
mending the track, and where the way was accordingly strewn
with huge, rough stones. That was the last I saw, and it is
all I remember of the matter.
Two days afterwards, I awoke, and found myself in bed, in
a strange place. I raised my hand to rub my eyes open, and
dispel the supposed dream, but to my astonishment, I found
that my arm was stiff and bandaged, as though I had been
lately bled. I was weak and sore in all my bones. There
was a smell of camphor in the room. A bottle marked soap
liniment, stood upon a table by my bed-side. The
window-shutters
were half closed, but a curiously cut crescent,the
crowning glory, no doubt, of the artificer of the domicil,
admitted
the bright rays of a mid-day sun. All was still as the
solitude of a wilderness.
I fell back upon the pillow in amazement. It was a neat,
pleasant, little room, plainly, but comfortably furnished,
adorned with peacocks' feathers, tastefully arranged around
the walls, and a large boquet of fresh flowers in the fire-place.
The appointments of the bed were delightful; the sheets were
white as snow, and the curtains were of old-fashioned chintz,
blue and white, presenting to my wondering eyes innumerable
little venuses and cupids. Why should I be a-bed there, and
the sun shining in the window, bright as noonday?
A newspaper lay upon the foot of my bed; I took it up, and
gazed upon it vacantly. It was the village hebdomodal, just
moist from the press. A mist floated before my eyes as they
fell upon my own name. When I regained my uncertain
vision
,
I made out with difficulty to comprehend the following
editorial announcement: We regret to mention, that on
Thursday evening last, a serious accident befell Mr. Renovare
Dolorem, jun. and Dr. Cerberus Angelo, of New-York, as they
were riding in a wagon, in the vicinity of this village. The
horse taking fright, ran away, upset the vehicle, and threw out
the gentlemen near the toll-gate. Mr. D. was taken up for
dead, but the doctor escaped unhurt. Fortunately, Squire
Hoel Bones was passing by at the time, and he and the
doctor
conveyed Mr. D. to a house in the neighborhood, where,
we are happy to say, every attention is rendered to the
unfortunate
sufferer. Mr. D. continues still insensible.
Here then was a development of the why and wherefore of
my stiff joints and meridian repose. So, then, now for
another
week's repentance, I sighed aloud; but there was some
one at the door, and I stopped and shut my eyes. I heard
the rustling of frocks, and soft footsteps fell upon the floor,
and presently the curtains were drawn aside, and I perceived
the shadows of two light figures bending over me, and I heard
low, restrained breathings. A small forefinger wandered
about my wrist, in search of my pulse; a little hand was
drawn several times across my forehead, and then it put back
the tangled hair that overhung my eyebrows: I thought it
seemed to linger about my temples, as though its owner wished
there was another matted tuft yet to be adjusted.
He has got more color than he had, sister; was the first
spoken sentence. No reply was made.
Poor fellow! I wonder if he will die. Is n't he handsome,
Mary? said the same fair speaker, after a little pause.
I am telling a true story, and if I have to rehearse
compliments
that were paid me when a boy, it must not be set down
under the head of vanity.
Mary answered not, but she sighed. That was voice and
speech enough for me. She was evidently the younger of
the two, and my boyish fancy quickly formed the beau ideal
of the girl who heaved that sigh for my misadventures and
dangers. I was at once in love, deeply, devotedly. I cared
not to open my eyes; I would willingly have been blind for
ever, the vision of my imagination was so happy. Yet it was
painful to lie there, a hypocrite, affecting insensibility, and
hear my physiognomy and my chance of recovery discussed
between the maidens. Perhaps I was bashful
O quantum
mutatus!
and had not the courage to encounter the eyes of
beings whom I knew not, but in the kind discharge of the
grateful offices of guardian angels. I wonder they did not
feel my quick beating pulse, and hear my throbbing heart
beating against my ribs!
Presently they left my bed-side and glided to the
looking-glass
,
where they conversed in inaudible wispers. I
ventured
to peep through a crevice in the curtain, and reconnoitre
my gentle nurses. Need I say they were both beautiful?
Presumptuous wretch! O! worse than profaner of the
mysteries of the Bona Dea, to gaze with unlicensed eye upon
the delicate services of the toilet! The cruelly punished
Act
on
was to be pitied, for he rushed unwittingly into the
presence
of the hunter goddess; but I courted my just
punishment
,
Vol. II.7
and if I was doomed to love both sisters madly, it was
but a merciful judgment!
The elder sister was, I thought, about twenty; Mary had
scarcely passed her fifteenth year. Had it not been for that
newspaper, I might have revelled in the fancies of a Turkish
paradise.
Jenneatte took out her comb, and there gushed down her
back a full bright flow of auburn tresses, that almost reached
her feet.
Sister Mary assisted her in plating and adjusting and
putting
them up, and then tightened her corset-lacing, and then
, spare me, spare me, too faithful memory! and then
sister Jenneatte left Mary and me alone.
If the doctor had come in at the moment, he could have
told whether I had a fever, without taking out his watch, and
looking wise.
I closed my eyes, for Mary was at my bedside, and her
evident agitation assured me that there was pity in her heart.
Kind, good girl! that innocent sympathy would have won the
mercy of the coldest censor. She put her arm under the
pillow, and gently raised my head. Something rested on my
cheek; it was warm and moist; there was a gentle pressure
about it; it was still and quiet; and Mary's breath was with
it; and it came again, and againyes, Mary kissed me
gods!
Fudge. I am getting rhapsodical. What can have made
my eyes so misty? Mary is nothing to menow that,
pshaw!
When Doctor Cerberus Angelo came in to see me, I was
alone, tossing to and fro with a burning fever.
Consternation
and hurry were written on his face, for he came upon a
summons from Mary, who had told him, in tears, that I had
waked up, and was very wild and flighty.
The lancet renewed its office, and sudorifices and
antifebriles
were again my bitter portion. But all the doctor's
practice reached not my disease. That night, that night!
how I suffered! I raved and ranted all manner of incoherent
nonsense; now calling upon Mary, and now crying for
Jenneatte
.
The doctor soothed, and scolded, and brought me mint
tea, and swore at me. At last, I fell asleep, and there was a
quiet house until the next morning, when I awoke faint, weak,
and melancholy.
I tried to reason with myself upon the absurdity of my
passion
for the two girls, but without avail. It was a species of
insanity which I could not cure. I slowly recovered my
strength and health, but before a fortnight had elapsed, I had
offered my boy-heart to each of the sisters, and was engaged
to be married to them both.
This was not villainy, but madness. The doctor found it
out, and read me a lecture on gratitude. I think he was
jealous
of me. He wrote also to my father, and a close carriage
soon conveyed me from the place where my heart was doubly
pledged. Jenneatte kissed me good-by at the door. She
could do it with proprietyshe was so much older than me;
but Mary ran up into her room, to cry, by herself.
When I arrived at man's estate, did I not of course
continue
to love Mary, and make the tender-hearted little country
girl my wedded wife?
I am wandering again. Let me proceed to another
incident
.
We were talking of horses and accidents.
I am romantic enough to love to ride upon a moonlit night.
What a beautiful sight is the full, round-faced goddess,
mounting
into a clear, blue sky, just after the snow has done falling,
and the wind is lulled into an almost infant's breath! How
it makes one think of sleigh-bells, and fur cloaks, and buffalo
skins, and mulled wine, and bright eyes, and cold elastic
cheeks, and warm merry hearts! On such a night as this,
my college chum Harry and I drove a gallant pair of coursers
up to old Dorus Van Stickler's mansion, in New-Jersey. The
girls had promised to go, and the sleighing was capital, and
there was to be a ball at Valley-grotto, about nine miles off.
We left the horses in charge of sable Sam, and bounded into
the house. Harry's sweetheart was all ready, but Jemima
my Jemima had a bad headache, and could not go. This grief
was distressing enough, in all conscience; but what think you
of her aunt Starchy's stalking into the room, rigged out with
muff and tippetas I am a sinner!and telling me that it
was a pity that I should be disappointed, and that she would
go with me herself, in Mima's place?
Fire and ice! what benevolence! and O! provident
antiquity
!
she put into my hands as a pledge of her sincerity, her
snuff-box, and a towel-full of gingerbread, to sneeze and eat
upon the road.
I was patient; very patient. Yet, nevertheless, I did think
of going out and breaking one of the horses' legs. But
after
all, whispered my good genius to me, and then I to
Harry
,
what need we care! To be sure, we can't go to the
ball, and we'll have to come home early; but trust to fate.
I'll try to get rid of her. Remember,
I
shall drive.
I assisted the old lady into the sleigh. It was like lifting
an icicle or a chesnut rail.
We rode more than a mile before a word was spoken,
except
to the horses. I had the reins. Harry and his loved
one were on the back seat, talking by looks and actions.
Happy, happy Harry!
The old woman, after a while, grew drowsyshe did, by
Jove. She pitched backwards and forwards, now knocking
Harry, and now saluting me with her honored cranium. She
seemed used to it, for despite of all my hopes, she would not
tumble out of the sleigh.
At last we approached a tavern, near which was a
beautiful
,
deep snow-drift. I knew the ground. It was rough, and
a little precipitous on the roadside, and unless I drove with
uncommon carefulness, we should certainly be upset. I
looked at Harry. There was a contagious wickedness in his
eye that made my hand unsteady. I must have pulled on the
near-side rein a little too hard, for the runner went down into
a deep rut, our centre of gravity was lost, and we were
unceremoniously
tumbled helter-skelter into the snow-bank.
Aunt Starchy screeched out, as though every bone in her
body was broken. Harry lifted her up, and brushed the snow
off her, while I got the horses into the road. She insisted
upon going to the tavern, to ascertain whether she had not
received some inward bruise, declaring, in spite of all our
entreaties
,
that she would ride no further, and that we must go
on without her.
Accordingly, we hoisted her in, and drove up to Boniface's.
The first thing that I did there, was to get her a stiff glass of
gin and water, which the old lady drank off with great
comfort
to her weak stomach, declaring that she always admired
how considerate I was. This prescription being so well
received
,
I was satisfied that a hot rum-toddy might be
swallowed
with additional benefit; and I am proud to declare that
my course of practice upon this occasion made the most rapid
7*
and successful progress. The good old gentlewoman soon
ceased to grunt, and she presently fell into a pleasant sleep.
It would have been cruel to awake her and renew our
entreaties
to accompany us; so we tucked her up, and told Mrs.
Boniface we would call for her when we came back, and off
we started for the ball. O! had Jemima but been with us,
then! However, little Sue de Mott and Jane Antonides both
lived on our road.
Every body has been on a sleighing frolic once, and it
would be foreign to our business, to tell what else took place.
Harry stopped for the old lady on his return about three
o'clock next morning. Something detained me in the
neighborhood
of the ball-room until daylight.
Riding of a dark stormy night cannot be esteemed a pleasure.
Yet a frequent roadster must sometimes be prepared to say
composedly
to the clouds, pour on, I will endure. My last
experience
of a wet ride was shared by Doctor Gulielm Belgium.
Fate has been ironical with me, in more than once giving me
a doctor for a companion in my travelling distresses. I told
this story once to Angelo, in a letter which I have begged
back to help my memory. I cannot do better than to quote my
recital on the impulse of the adventure. Here it is.
So he invited me to take some vehicular enjoyment on
the road to Cato's.
Allons! and we started.
He was made up with more than even his own
exquisiteness
,
this afternoon. His mere vestimental arrangements
were enough to show that in his time he had read a book, and
travelled out of his county. There was nothing flash or
Corinthian in the structure; the order of the architecture was
rather of the simplest Doric. But what a beautiful fitness!
what a harmony of composition! He had crowned his caput
with a bran new golgotha, beneath whose gracefully curved
brim, his late shorn locks showed here and there their glossy
edges, just sufficiently to satisfy the careless gazer of the ample
stock from which they descended, and without encroaching too
much upon the boasted beauty of his well-framed forehead.
His whiskersthey were so accurately and curiously cut, you
would have been reminded of the days when people trimmed
trees and hedges into the likeness of birds and beasts; they
were so thick, and smooth, and regular, that a stray mosquito
planting his tired feet upon their tangling meshes, might have
thought himself upon the surface of a swath of his own native
meadows, just after it had been swept by the scythe of the
merry mower. His cheek had a ruddy, hearty glow of health
upon it. His eye was bright and keen. You would have
thought it had not twinkled over hochheimer for a month.
But the
coup de grace
of all was a kidded forefinger, against
which gently pressing digital there seemed to languish a
slender
walking-stick, of the most singular and severe virtue. No
vulgar man ever sported such a staff. There was but one
other like it in the world. It was the rarest quality of
sandalwood
,
precious as the golden rod, that led the pious neas
to the elysian fields. It cost judgment, taste and a price. It
was of eastern origin, and drew its earliest breath in India.
You might have suspected that, from the voluptuous perfume
that was breathed from the wood, and from its delicate form
and tint, and from the fineness of its texture and fibre. The
color was slightly changeable, and nearest of any thing else
to the invisible orange of the neck plumage of a Barbary
pheasant.
None but a brave man, and a good-looking, well-dressed
fellow would have dared to wear it.
We reached our original destination in safety, and then,
tempted by the mildness of the evening, extended our jaunt
in the pleasant twilight to Harlaem, and returned at our easy
leisure to the Roman's. Here a sudden and violent
midnight-black
mass of rain and thunder and lightning blocked up the
road, so that we were fain compelled to stop and comfort
ourselves
with tongue and a salad. When the storm abated, we
renewed our travel homeward, Belgium commanding the reins.
Soon, however, again the darkness became so thick, that it
rested upon our eyelids like a palpable weight; we could not
see our way except when the heavenly fulgurations set it all
on fire. Still on we went. There is a place about two
hundred
yards from the censor's, on the return to the city, where
the alderman of the twelfth ward has provided a deep ditch
on the roadside, for the devil to set man-traps. I had a feint
recollection of the existence of these pitfalls, and I entreated
my learned friend to let me have the reins.
B. was a good fair-weather driver, and one of the few whom
I could trust by daylight; but he had not the owl eyes of an
old traveller by night. His pride, however, stood up at the
insinuation that I could see better in the dark than he, and he
peremptorily refused.
Of all the agonies of apprehension, save me from the
incubus
of an unskilful, head-strong driver! I begged and
beseeched
him to yield, for I saw that he was leaving the road;
but no, he insisted that he was right, and that he could not be
mistaken.
`Drive to the right, for mercy's sake,' I cried, feeling the
left wheel of the vehicle already on the descent into the ditch.
`Drive to Tartarus and be quiet,' or something like it, was
the kind and amiable response.
I grew angry now, and tried the influence of abuse; but
nothing could move the obstinate madness of my Dutchman.
`I see the road plainly enough, don't be a fool,' and other
such gentle phrases were all the reward that I got for my poor
pains. On urged the headlong Jehu, and not long deferred
was our embrace of `
mater et terra genitrix
.' Down went
our five hundred dollar mare, some eight or ten feet into the
bottom of the ditch, and in a little brief moment were figured
out a group of horse, and men, and buggy, precipitated,
conglomerated
and accumulated, at sight of which Hogarth would
have wept for joy.
The violence of the fall stunned me for a minute. When
I came to myself, I was uncertain whether terrene habitations
yet possessed me, or whether I was a groping ghost upon the
banks of the dark Styx. I listened for the noise of Ixion's
wheel, and the rumbling of the stone of Sisyphus, but I heard
instead the doctor cry out, `d it,' as he turned over upon
his side, in a mud-puddle by the head of our poor beast.
Assured
by this unequivocal evidence of vitality, I got upon my
feet, and without waiting to make any inquiries about bones,
I plunged through the rain to the house of our late host for
relief. I soon returned to the scene of distress with a lantern,
and a sleepy negro. Then, dear Angelo, there was a sight
to look at. O! could you have seen B. come up to me, at
that moment, with his pet cane, his unique, broken in his
hands, with that wo-begone expression on his countenance
with that tragical attitude, hatlesshis heavy eye-brow
dripping
with rainhis hair seeming to be in a state of liquidation,
and fast flowing down upon the muddy adornments of coat
and whiteah! once white pantaloons; his left hand
pointing
to the fragment in his right, as though that were the only
thing to be lamented or cared for; while the mare lay groaning
in the ditch, and the lightning flashed, and the wind and rain
beat and whistled around us, and the negro yawned, and the
light of the lantern threw a narrow streak now upon one, and
then upon another feature of the scene; now disclosing a hat
or rather what had once been a hatand now an umbrella,
and now a buggy-cushion. If your neck had been broken,
you would have laughed at this ludicrous piece of picturesque.
How can I give you an idea of the appearance of the hero of
the scene? Think of old Lear, bare-headed in the tempest;
no, that's not it. Think of Othello, in his bitterest anguish,
harrowing up his soul with the thoughts of what had been.
Do you remember Kean's air, and attitude, when he comes to
this melancholy passage
`Had it pleased heaven
To try me with affliction, etc. *****
But there
, where I have garnered up my heart,
Where either I must live, or bear no life.'
I have given you brush, easel and canvas; you have a good
fancydraw the
waterscape
yourself.
But be amazed at our escape. A broken dashboard, a
strained shoulder, and the doctor's ruined habiliments, made
the sum total of our added up distresses. I must confess for
myself some undefinable rheumatics; but I am willing to bear
that infliction, by way of warning against rides by night, and
opinionated drivers.
MISCELLANIES.
WOODCOCK SHOOTING.
Vol. II.8
RACHEL-BAKERISM.
I SHALL always believe, that people may be in the body,
and out of the body, during the same moment of time. I am
firmly persuaded, that the soul frequently quits the tenement
to which it is assigned, and goes a-visiting other souls. Yes,
and some times, it does not return. Under this theory, I
account
for the different characters and qualities of what are
called strength of mind, genius, idiocy, and lunacy. When
half a dozen good souls unite, and take up their lodging in
one cropus, provided only the family regulations are discreet
and are wisely administered, the union is strength, and the
external man is esteemed a casket of intellect. If, however,
too many, or too boisterous, or discordant spirits should hive
upon one cranium, or if the domestic duties are not strictly
enforcedHeaven pity the manhe is incurably mad.
I need not add, that when the soul totally vacates the
premises
,
Perditus
is esteemed a fool, and the devil institutes
proceedings against him forthwith, under the absent and
absconding
debtor act. Short excursions, such as amorous
exaltations, poetic flights, and all the variety of ruralizations,
are the mere walks that the soul takes for exercise. These
are the ordinary occupation, the daily going forth and
incoming
of the divine
afflatus
upon its peculiar and proper
business
.
But what a glorious exercise of divinity, what a blending
of reality and imagination, of existence and annihilation, is
that power of the soul, which mingles the past, the present,
and the future! which makes even the gross body live back
in the young merriment of childhood, and taste by anticipation
the happiness of the far future! which makes the miserable
happy, the dumb eloquent, the sinner a saint! and is the
power controlled by circumstances? What have facts and
things to do with it? Rachel Baker had no education, but
when her body was asleep, her soul and
her soul's friends
discoursed sacred music. What is a dream? a frolic, say
you of young Fancy, after old Judgment has gone to bed.
The substitute of imagination for factwhat is
fact?
How
do you determine any thing to be a fact? Do you not
sometimes
doubt whether you are not dreaming? Are you always
certain, when you dream? Have you not sometimes
dreamed
you were
dreaming?
Metaphysicians and learned doctors
have discussed these matters with profound and ingenious
ability. But I must confess that I am not much enlightened
upon the subject, after all; the many freaks of Alma have led
them all up and down and through the bogs and quagmires
of their art, just as did Trinculo the magic tabor of Ariel. I
have had myself a little experience in flights and absences,
and my irregular Jack-a-lanthorn spirit has beguiled me
more than once into a scrape. Of all these, hear one instance,
ye wise ones, ye custom house officers of reason,ye
measurers
and inspectors of the soul's exports and imports, and if
there be a philosophical explanation for it, pronounce,
expound
.
In the year 18 on the fourth of July, I left the burning
patriotism of my fellow citizens, and went a fishing upon the
classic waters of Communipaw. We watched in the
distance
the tall spire and glittering roof and battlement, and
banners floating in the sunny air, and heard until nightfall,
the roar of the glad cannon. When the parade and bustle
of the celebration were gone by, we headed our little row-boat
towards Whitehall. It was a long and tedious pull, and my
friend and I were juvenile in the exercise. At last our
prow struck the wharf, and
terra firma
received us. I was
worn out with heat and fatigue, and the excitement of our
piscatory abductions. It was a long walk home, and I
willingly
accepted Horatio's invitation to stop at his domicil and
rest. Scarcely had I set me down, when I found myself in
the kingdom of Morpheus. I made myself happy there, until
about eleven o'clock, when Horatio called me back, and
advised
me to go home, and to bed.My father exacted of me
good hours.He awakened me, of this I am certain.I rose,
and directed my steps homeward. On my way, I had to pass
the old family mansion, from which we had removed, some
three years before. The street door was now open. The
housethe wide hallthe entry lamp seemed all as usual.
Without hesitation, and as a matter of course, and in honest
joy, I entered, and closed the street door, wondering all the
while why it should have been left open. I was wide awake,
but I was living back in the third year previous. I was at
my own home, as truly, as ever I had been in my whole life,
and I was ready to give a good account of myself, for being
out so late. On I passedbut nobody did I encounter. My
foot was soon upon the stairs, and my hand upon the
balustrade
.
Up I mounted into the third story, entered into my
old room, shut the door, pulled of my coat, and turned to the
bed, when, what was my surprise, to see in the dim
moonlight
sweetly sleeping there, a young lady! She was
beautiful
women
sleeping in the moonbeams always are. My
first impression was that there was some trick to be played
off upon me, by my cousin Harry, who had come from Scio to
spend the holidays with us. I looked closer to see if it was not
a rag babywhen no! Heavens! she breathedshe moved
Flesh and blood was in my bed! I dare not tell all the
rapid thoughts that burned their traces across my brain.But
I do remember that among my better imaginings, I fancied it
possible that some visitors
might
have unexpectedly arrived, and
that my room had been appropriated for the accommodation of
one of them. I looked around, and seeing a considerable
change in the arrangement of the furniture, my fancy became
almost conviction. At all events, though I, I must retreat.
With this intent, I took up my coat, and turned toward the door,
when horror! the lady awaked, and screamed! In ten
seconds
,
a half drest, trembling boy burst through the door and
blubbered out who are you? I cannot tell which of us
was then the most frightened. For my own part, I did not
know what to make of it.What do you want?who
are you?Mother?came in quick succession upon my
doubting ears. Rip Van Winkle was not worse off, when he
saw his own soul beating beneath the thorax of his progeny,
and stood the empty case of an absent spirit. I was
satisfied
,
however, that there was a mistake somewhere, and
I hurried to the door.
Down the stair way I rushed, but hardly had I reached the
landing in the second story, before I was surrounded by a
troup of old women. That I was where I ought not to be,
was now evident; and escape was impossibleand whether
I was in heaven, earth, or hell, I knew not.Who are
you?What are you doing here?What do you want?
screamed half a dozen shrill voices at once.In that moment
I
died
.I lived again.Go for a watchman, James, said
8*
an old lady, in a low toneaside. It did not escape me.
Watchman!thought Ithank God! then I am still in a
civilized
country! Happy institution of a watch district!
Ladies
,I
at last struggled outI have been committing
some egregious blunderbut what it is, I know notI am a
respectable young man, I assure youI had no sinister
intentions
in going up stairsask the young womannor am I
a thiefperhaps some of you may know my family, by
repute
.
My name is CypressJeremiah Cypress.But I
here I was interrupted by the old landlady, who came forward
and exclaimed, La! Mr. Cypress, is it you?Why, to be
sure, I know you.Why, I'm so sorrybut graciousI was
so frightenedand here she told me her name, and I for the
first time found that she was the keeper of the aforesaid
boarding-house. It all flashed upon me at onceor rather,
I was back again into the year as numbered on the vulgar
calendar. Dear madam, said I, I have not the pleasure
of your acquaintance, though I well know your name. I am
sure I can never sufficiently apologize for my rudeness. I
cannot tell how to account for it. But I have been out
a-fishing
all day, and am returned very tired, and from not taking
particular notice, or from some distress or
absence of mind
, I
have followed a dream of former days, andO cried
the old lady, you're very excusable, Mr. Cypress, it's fourth
of July, you know, and we all know, thatPardon me,
madamI assure youI hope you don't think I've been
drinkingI have drank nothing to-daythat is, nothing of
any consequenceCertainly, Mr. C. I see you are not in
liquor, butbut my dear madam, I am not in the least
affected
do
not let me detain you, however, any longerI
will bid you good evening, and do myself the honor of
calling
and making a further apology to-morrow.Good night,
Mr. C. don't be distressedit's fourth of July, you know
I
shan't say nothing
.
Thus terminated this Rachel-bakerism excursion of my soul.
I was very tired, but not asleep nor drunkon my honorand
I do protest that the scream of that maiden banished every
particle of fatigue, too, and well it mightfor I hear it yet.
HYMN TUNES AND GRAVE-YARDS.
I WENT to church one night last week,
Ibam forte via sacra,
as Horace has it; and into what shrine of shrines should my
sinful feet be led, but into the freshly hallowed tabernacle of
the new free Chapel. It was Carnival week among the
Presbyterians
,
the season of Calvinistic Pentecost; and one of
the Missionary Societies in the celebration of its blessed
triumphs
,
bulged out
, on that night, from the windows of the
gigantic meeting-house, like the golden glories of
thickly-crowded
wheat-sheafs from the granary of a heaven-prospered
garnerer. Not, however, did the zeal of a Crusader against
the Paynim, nor the expected rehearsal of the victories of the
Christian soldier, draw me, unaccustomed, upon holy ground.
Wherefore did I, just now, pricked by conscience, stop short
in the middle of that line from Flaccus. I could not add
sicut meus est mos.
Meus mos
stuck in my throat. It was no good grace of
mine.
Non nobis
. Reader, I confess to thee that I was
charmed into the Tabernacle by a hymn tune.
Now, before I ask for absolution, let me declare, that my
late unfrequent visitation of the Church is to be attributed to
no lack of disposition for faithful duty, but to the new-fangled
notions and fashions of the elders and preachers, and to my
dislike for the new church music.
It had been an unhappy day with me. My note lay over in
the Manhattan; and I had ascertained that some regulated
suburban building lots, which I had bought a few days
before
,
unsight unseen, upon the assurance of a truly sincere
friend, were lands covered with water, green mud, and
blackberry
bushes, in the bottom of a deep valley, untraversable and
impenetrable as a Florida hammock. Abstracted, in
uncomfortable
meditation, I threaded my unconscious pathway
homeward
,
the jargon of the confused noises of Broadway falling
upon my tympanum utterly unheard. In this entranced
condition
,
I came abreast of the steps of the covered entrance to
the Tabernacle. Here was done a work of speedy
disenchantment
.
A strain of music came floating down the avenue.
It was an old and fondly remembered hymn. It was the
favorite
tune of my boyhood. It was the first tune I ever
learned. It was what I loved to sing with my old nurse and
my little sisters, when I used to pray. It was the tune that
even now always makes my heart swell, and brings tears into
my eyes. It was
Old Hundredth
.
Fellow-sinner, peradventure, thou hast never sung Old
Hundredth. Thou wert not blessed with pious parents. The
star of the reformation hath not shone upon thee. Thou hast
not been moved and exalted by the solemn ecstasy of Martin
Luther. Perhaps thou hast had eunuchs and opera-singers
to do thy vicarious devotions, in recitative, and elaborate
cantatas
;
scaling Heaven by appoggiaturas upon the rungs of a
metrical ladder. Lay down this discourse. Such as thou
cannotyet I bethink me now how I shall teach thee to
comprehend
and feel. Thou hast seen and heard Der Frieschutz?
I know that thou hast. Be not ashamed to confess it before
these good people. They play it at the play-house, it is true;
but what of that? What else is it than a German
Camp-meeting
sermon set to music? It is a solemn drama, showing,
terribly, the certain and awful fate of the wicked. There is a
single strain of an anthem in that operatic homilyworth all
the rest of the piece;dost thou not remember the harmony
of the early matin hymn unexpectedly springing from the choir
in the neighboring village church, which, faintly beginning,
swells upon your ear, and upon poor Caspar's too, pleading
with his irresolute soul, just as the old head-ranger has almost
persuaded the unhappy boy to renounce the Devil, and to
become
good? Dost thou not remember, as the tune grows upon
his ear, the strong resolution suddenly taken, the subdued joy,
the meek rapture that illumine the face of the penitent; and
how, with head bowed down and humble feet, he follows his
old friend to the fountain of pardon and to the altar of
reconciliation
?
I see that thou rememberest, andthou art moved;
Be these tears wet?
Here I am happy to receive the congratulations of the
reader, that the similarity of Caspar's case and my own is at
an end. Poetical justice required that Von Weber's Zamiel
should carry off repenting Caspar from the very entrance to
the sanctuary;the civil sexton of the Tabernacle asked me
to walk in, and showed me to a seat.
The hymn went up like the fragrance of a magnificent
sacrifice
.
Every voice in that crowded house was uplifted, and
swelled the choral harmony. The various parts fell into each
other like mingling water, and made one magnificent stream
of music; but yet you could recognize the constituent
melodies
of which the harmonious whole was made up; you could
distinguish the deep voice of manhood, the shrill pipe of boys,
and the confident treble of the maiden communicant,all
singing
with earnestness and strength, and just as God and
religion
taught them to sing, directly from the heart. To me,
one of the best recommendations of Old Hundredth is, that
every Protestant knows it, and can sing it. You cannot sing
it wrong. There is no fugue, nor
da capo
, nor place to rest
and place to begin, nor place to shake, nor any other
meretricious
affectation about it. The most ingenious choristerand
the church is cursed with some who are skilful to a wonder
in dampening people's piety, by tearing God's praises to
tatters
cannot
find a place in Old Hundredth where he can
introduce
a flourish or a shake.
Deo gratias
for the comfortable
triumph over vain glory. It would be as easy for a
schoolmaster
to introduce a new letter into the alphabet; and Old
Hundredth may be said, in some sense, once to have been the
alphabet of Christian psalmody. I remember a time when it
was a sort of A B C for Protestant children learning to sing.
It was the universal psalm of family worship. But its day
has gone by. It is not a fashionable tune. You seldom hear
it except in the country churches, and in those not noted for
high-priced pews and good society.
There is much solemn effect in the accompaniment of vocal
music by a discreetly played organ; but in my ears Old
Hundreth
suffers by the assistance. The hired organist and
bellows
blower, have each his quota of duty to perform, and they
generally do it with so much zeal, that the more excellent
music of the human voice is utterly drowned. And then there
is a prelude, and a running up and down of keys, which
takes off your attention, and makes you think of the flippancy
of the player's fingers, and that your business is to listen and
not to sing. No; if you would hear, and sing Old Hundreth
a-right, go into one of the Presbyterian meeting houses that
has retained somewhat of the simplicity and humility of the
early church; or into the solemn aisles of the temples which
the Creator hath builded in the woods for the methodists to
go out and worship in. There you may enjoy the tune in its
original, incorrupt excellence, and join in a universal song of
devotion from the whole assembled people.
To Martin Luther is ascribed the honor of writing Old
Hundredth
.
But the tune was older than he. It took its birth
with the Christian church. It was born in the tone and
inflection
of voice with which the early Christians spoke their
Saviour's praise. Martin Luther never did more than to catch
the floating religion of the hymn, and write it in musical
letters
.
It was such music that the poor of the world, out of
whom the church was chosen, used to sing for their
consolation
amid the persecutions of their Pagan masters. It was
such simple music that Paul and Silas sang, at midnight, in
the prison-house. It was such that afterwards rang from crag
to crag in the mountain fastnesses of Scotland, when the
hunted Covenanters saluted the dawning Sabbath. Such
simple
music was heard at nightfall in the tents of the Christian
soldiery, that prevailed, by the help of the God of battles, at
Naseby and Marston Moor. Such sang our puritan fathers,
when, in distress for their forlorn condition, they gave
themselves
,
first to God and then to one another. Such sang they
on the shore of Holland, when, with prayers and tears, their
holy community divided itself, and when the first American
pilgrims trod, with fearful feet, the deck of the
precious-freighted
May flower.
Amidst the storm they sang,
And the stars heard and the sea!
And the sounding aisles of the dim woods rang
To the anthem of the free!
Where are all the old hymn tunes that the churches used
to sing? Where are Majesty, and Wells, and
Windham
,
and Jordan, and Devises, and other tunes,not
all great compositions, but dear to us because our fathers
sang them?
The old-fashioned church music has been pushed from its
stool by two sets of innovators. First, from the rich, sleepy
churches, it has been expelled by the choristers, who seem
to prefer to set a tune which only themselves can warble, as
if the better to show forth their clear
alto
voices and
splendid
power of execution. No objection is made to this
monopoly
of the musical part of the devotion of the congregations,
for it is getting to be the fashion to believe that it is not polite
to sing in church. Secondly, from the new-light
conventicles
,
the expulsion has been effected by those reformers of
the reformation, who have compelled Dr. Watts, not pious
enough, forsooth, to stand aside for their own more spiritual
performances. The old hymn tunes will not suit these
precious
compositions. But with genuine good taste in their
adaptation of melodies to words, they have made a ludicrous
enough collection of musical fancies, of all varieties, of
tragedy
and farce. Some of their ecstacies are intended to
strike sinners down by wild hoopings copied from the
incantations
of Indian medicine feasts, bringing present hell
before
the victim, and of which his frightened or crazed, but not
converted nor convinced soul, has an antetaste in the howling
of the discord. Of this sort of composition there is one which
ought to be handed over to the Shaking Quakers to be sung
with clapping of hands and dancing; I mean that abortion of
some fanatic brain which is adapted to the horrid words of
O! there will be wailing,
Wailing, wailing, wailing,
O! there will be wailing! &c.
Some preachers have thought it would be a good plan to
circumvent the Devil by stealing some of his song tunes; as
though profane music could win souls to love piety better than
the hymns of the saints; and accordingly they have
introduced
into their flocks such melodies as Auld Lang Syne,
and Home, sweet Home! O! could it be permitted to
Vol. II.9
John Robinson, the pastor of the New-England pilgrims; to
John Cotton, he who, in the language of his biographer, was
one of those olive trees which afford a singular measure of
oil for the illumination of the Sanctuaryto John Fisk, who
for twenty years did shine in the golden candlestick of
Chelmsfordto Brewsterto Matherto any of those
fathers
of the American church, to revisit this world, what
would they not lament of the descendants of the Pilgrims!
I have conjured up spirits! I am compelled, by an impulse
which I cannot resist, to go on. I seem to hear some
wailing
ghost cry aloudThere are more sorrowful changes in
the body and spirit of the reformed church than in the fashion
of the hymn tunes! Where are the ministers of religion,
who occupied the pulpits a few years since? where are their
churches? where are the altars which our fathers builded,
and where are the graves and bones of our fathers?
Alas! poor ghost! thou knowest not that the age of
bargaining is come, and that the Reformed church is a
trafficker
in the market, selling her sanctuaries for gold, and
committing sacrilege for silver. The pious dead shall sleep
no more in quiet graves.
Requiescat in pace!
shall
henceforth be quoted in the price-current! The departed
brethren in communion, who were committed to the earth
beneath
the shadows of those sacred walls where first they
knew the glad offices of the gospel, shall be turned out of
their narrow tenements to make room for bankers and
speculators
!
Do I speak lies? Go to the Wall-street church and
get the flagrant proof. It smells to Heaven! That
christian
church draws a revenue from suits of offices for trade
and barter which she has erected upon the graves of her
children
;
and brokers and attorneyshow can I speak itfind
the way to the temple of a heathen goddess,not the altar of
Fortune nor the temple of Fame,paved with old grave-yard
stones of the members of a christian congregation?
Dr. Romeyn! come not back to look for thy church in Cedar
Street! It is clean gone. The merchants, who bought it,
bade a liberal price. They sing no hymn tunes there now.
The ground is consecrated to cotton, coffee, and dry goods.
The congregation have gone up town and built a splendid
cathedral. Go thou there, and see how glorious be the
scarlet
,
and gilt, and fine chased work of this reformed church.
But tell that minister to doff his humble suit of black. It
accords not with his pulpit. See! looks he not like a beetle
in a gold snuff box?
McLeod! departed thunderer against the Pope, sleep on!
Sleep on, nor from thy cerements burst.
Hear not the whispered horror. There are pictures hung
up behind thine ancient altarand candles are burned there in
the day-time,and strange tunes are played upon an organ
and Latin is chanted thereand a silver bell is tinkled
and frankincense is burned before the people; but there is
not a bible nor a Scotch hymn book in the church! and the
people do not sing. but they cross themselves! Sleep on,
sleep on, sweet shade; too happy to have bee ncalled away.
[11]
[11]
It ought to be said, in justice to this church, that the sale of their old
meeting-house is to be lamented
with
them as a necessity, and not
to be charged
against
them as an offence. They were
driven
to a sale
by the result of a chancery suit, which imposed upon them the payment
of large sums of money, and they could not pick their
purchasers.
Garden Street Church is a heap of burned ruins. But the
number of building lots has been counted, and the elders
already feel the price within their grasp, and the name shall
no longer be Garden Street Church, but Exchange Place
Hotel!
The Old Middle Dutch yet stands. O, may not that church
be spared! May there not remain one unviolated tabernacle
in this part of the city; if for nothing else than to remind us
that there were Christians here in old times, and out of
respect
and regard for the memory of our forefathers?
The Brick Church.I wish that I might be spared this
task. But I cannotI cannot forget that they, too, have agreed
to sell their church and grave-yard,to be used for a public
post officeand that a decree has gone forth that the officers
of the customs shall sit in the vault of my grandmother! The
city corporation have absolved the trustees from their
contract
with them perpetually to keep sacred the land for a
burial-ground. But have the people been released from their
covenant to God, to respect the sepulchres of their brethren?
Who has given them a dispensation to break open the cave
of Macpelah? Or is there no moral or religious obligation
These bones from insult to protect?
Is the word sacrilege abolished from our language?
But to what plea does this church fly for excuse? Can
she complain that she is crowded out by the storehouses of
trade and commerce, and that her people live so far off that
they cannot walk to meeting? No, no. The brick church
stands exactly where it should,in the centre of the city
near the halls of Justiceon the public park; and it is
isolated
,
and occupies an entire block, having no next door
neighbors to annoy it or to hide it. Its familiar steeple towers
where strangers and sojourners will naturally see it, and it is
in the way of such as may inquire, Where is a Presbyterian
church? The temples of God ought to be built in public
places. They should not be hid behind dwelling-houses, like
Chatham Chapel and the Tabernacle, nor in narrow lanes,
like that one amid the pollution of Duane and Church streets.
Pull down the old Brick Church! That church known
all over the christian world as a highly favored church,a
church of eminent graces! It would be a fit work for the
infidels who razed Jerusalemand to disturb the grave-yard
the proper office of hyenas! O! if the bond be not sealed,
if the bargain be not irrevocably concluded, let the church
save herself from the sin of this eternal condemnation. Let
her send back the wretched pieces of silver!
Tearstearstears!I fear I have said too much.
And all this bold wrath comes out of a dissertation on
hymn tunes! I think I hear my reader say. And I see
some austere person rising and preparing to censure the
plainness of my speech to the churches. He is learned, and
well armed with all sorts of weapons of argument. He
comes at me first in Latin, quoting Terence:
Nonne id flagitium est, te aliis consilium dare
Foris sapere, tibi non posse te auxiliarer?
which being interpreted freely, means, is not this a
flagitious
piece of impudence in an unknown layman like you
to get up in the synagogue and lecture the elders,to be wise
and pious about other people's crimes, while by your own
confession you are an unannointed reprobate? Spare me,
spare memost merciful inquisitor. I waited until all those
who had a right to speak before me, might speak; but they
were silent. I felt it my duty then to disburthen my heart.
Sinner as I am, I do yet take deep interest in the welfare
and honor of the reformed republican church. I am a
descendant
of the pilgrims, and it is not I, but their blood, that
speaks. The cause is the cause of patriotism as well as
piety. With one of the departed saints I feel and say,and
I commend this as part of his testament,to those who are
trying to improve upon God's institutions, I shall count
my country lost, in the loss of the primitive principles, and
the primitive practices, upon which it was first established.
9*
A WARNING VOICE AGAINST
FASCINATION
.
Philomathes
.
What can be the reason that there are twenty women
given to that craft where there is one man?
Epistemon
.
The reason is easie, for as that sexe is frailer than man is,
so it is easier to be entrapped into these gross snares of the deuil, as
was once well proved to be trew, by the serpent's deceiving Eua at the
beginning, which makes him the homelier with that sexe sensine.
Dmonologie by the most high and mightie Prince
James, by the grace of God, king
, &c.
Juliet
.
If they do see thee they will murder thee.
Romeo
.
Alack! There lies more peril in thine eye, than twenty of
their swords.
One
of the earliest victims of the too much indulged crime,
whose character and consequences are the subject of the
present discourse, was Patience Delight, a young witch of
Franklin, Massachusetts. As her case is pregnant with good
caution, and pertiment to the matter in hand, we will premise
our observations with a brief statement of her trial. The
account is taken from the original manuscript in the
handwriting
of the venerable Precious Smith, one of the early
settlers in Smith's patent, L. I. and Chairman of the board of
Commissioners on the occasion of this memorable
investigation
.
The interesting document is preserved in the library
of the Syrian Institute of Christian Hook, Matowacs, N. Y.
The records runs, as follows:
A trew account of the triall of Patience Delight, &c.
May 24, 1692. This being the day sette apart for the triall
of that atrocious leaguer with Sathan, I tuck brother
Condemned
Fish, and Rev. Remember-Lots-wife Parkensen to
sit with me in judgment, we being thereto specially
commissioned
.
Opened court in the meet'n house with prayer.
The pris'ner was brought in by the sherif thickly vailed, so
that Sathan might not prevail upon the court thro' her devilish
eyes, and with her arms straitly chained. Then brother
Persevere-to-the-end
Havery testified after this wise. I was
up into my broad-hollow wood-lot, cloast by Goody Delight's,
mother of pris'ner, chop'n wood Just towards the night, I
felled a hickory, and sat thereon, resting and meditating.
Then comes a certain rustlin in the bushes hard by, and
turning
my head, lo! I see, thorow the tanglements, two sharp
piercing eyes that overcame me with strange dread. I
thought, first, it should be a wild catte, or a painter, the
sharpness thereof was so severe. But reach'n for my axe,
and rising up, I see pris'ner pluck'n berries. She looked at
me again, and then looks away, and thereupon was I seized
with unaccountable desire to keep looking at her, and could,
in nowise, keep my eyes off her. Which the tempter seeing
and waxing bold, she saieth good evenen to me with much
sweetness of voice that ran like tingling oil of Egypt
thorow my marrow. She keeps pick'n, and look'n, and shuten
into my body the most distrustful contagion, insomuch that I
was near beside myself. Presentlie, on pretense of pluck'n
beries, she cometh to where I sat, still shutin at me with
her eyes, and when she comes cloast by me, restraining grace
was utterly banished out of me, and I was wholly possessed
with the Deuil. Hearken not to my weaknesse, but to the
power of sin. Then, saied I, Patience, how old art thou?
And she answered and saied Sixteen years, and nine months,
worthy sir. Then Sathan takes my hand, and makes me
to lay hold on her, and draw her to sette by my side. She
struggles, and makes outcrie, and saies she, the man is
bewitched
.
Yes, saies I, and thou art the witch that hath
bewitched me, and thou shalt cure thine own poisson.
Whereupon, she uplifts violent clamour, and I know not what
else goes on, until my brother Condemned Fish, passing by,
comes up, and clappes me on the sholderre, saying `Hallo!
brother Havery! what's the matter?' And at that touch of
that holy man, Sathan departed out of me, strait-way.
Sworn in open Court this
24 May, 1692.
Signed
,
Persevere-to-the-end Havery.
Precious Smith
,
Head Deputie
.
A WARNING VOICE AGAINST
FASCINATION
.
The young men
Barnabas Ware, Boaz Daniels
, and
Walk-meekly Smith
, severally testify that pris'ner hath
fascinated
them at sundry times and in diuers manners. Saied
Barnabas
saieth, last Sunday two weeks ago, he couldn't
keep his eyes off pris'ner all meetin time. Said
Boaz
saieth,
for several months he hath been constrained, in spite of all
he could do, when he went into meetin to look for pris'ner,
and that alwaies a look from her went thorow him, and filled
him with very dredful tremulation. That the fascination was
painefull, but, natheless full of delight. Witness saith it was
like the prickin of pins all over him, but when he searched,
there was none to be seen.
Walk-meekly Smith
saieth that
he went to home with pris'ner from singin schoole two weekes
agoe. That he did so because he was thereto fascinated,
and she moued him by her behauior so to do, having sat by
his side in schoole and singin out of his booke, and that he
had neuer done the like before, being a youth, aged only
nineteene yeares, and subject to his father. That there was
nothing in pris'ner's walk and maner that night, which
might show forth the presence of the deuil; only the
cunninge
puttinge on of modestie, and lookin strange sorts of
earnest looks thorow her eye-lashes bent down, and, as it were,
resting on her cheeks, which were seemingly all in a glow
of deuilish fire. But next day and euer since witness hath
been sore distressed with losse of appetite, and melancholie,
and constant desire to be in companie with pris'ner, but is
afraid to touch her. And he swears, before God, she hath
bewitched him.
Sworn &c.
Signed, &c.
A WARNING VOICE AGAINST
FASCINATION
.
Ruth Daniels
being sworn, testifies that she knows that
pris'ner hath bewitched Walk-meekly Smith, for that he now
shunnes witness, whereas he used to be familiar and good
friends, being witness' third cousin. That last Sabbath week,
in the meetin, pris'ner tried to fascinate witness. Witness
looked at pris'ner, to rebuke her for not minding to the
discourse
.
Prisner turned up her nose, and gave her such a
fierce look, that witness was fascinated to take up the
hymnbook
,
and was near about to throw it at pris'ner's head.
Hereupon, brother Condemned Fish saieth he remembereth
the witness uplifting the book, and how he checked her, and
he asks is not this enough? Shall we not suddenly seize
defendant and cast out the curse from among us?
Then up starts pris'ner, and throws the veil from off her
head, with incredible diligence and fury, and cries to the jury,
Worthy sirs, take heed how ye give trust to false counselle,
and be not swift to stain your skirts with guiltless blood. I
proteste to the Lorde I am innocent in this thinge. Would
you put to death Susannah, and justifie the lying elders?
with more of such bold assurance.
Hereupon it was plaine to see how Sathan struggled
in her; so that Mr. Fish goes up and spat in her face,
and charged him to come out of her, and covered up her head.
Their judgment being passed, the people took her to a
convenient
tree hard by, and burned her with fire, while we all
exalted a song of triumph which well nigh drowned the cry
of Beelzebub yelling with her voice.
The foregoing, was, probably, one of the most clearly
established
cases of witchcraft, which ever came into the
condemnation
of the judgment halls of New England. Yet, it is
greatly remarkable, that this is the only authentic record of
the kind. The adjudications in the Massachusetts reports
are, generally, upon prosecutions against ancient hags, for
sticking pins into little children, and committing other absurd
outrages against the peace of the people, and the dignity of
the church, and which made them, rather subjects for
laughter
at the oddity of their devil-play, than of fear for the
substantial
damages of their sorcery. Not another reported case
exists of the flagrant basiliskism of the young witches who
drew men, by their eyes, to run after them, and so lead them
to melancholy ruin.
How clearly manifest in this matter, is the trickey cloven
foot of the father of all witches!Who prompts his favorites
to anticipate a charge against themselves, by commencing a
crimination of others!The Pilgrim people, with whom
Satan
pretended to pitch his tent, were generally married
women
or antique. The complainants and witnesses were,
almost
invariably, young, plump, juvenals. So it came to be
generally believed that a certain number of years were
needful
to a lady to be deemed worthy of supernatural visitations;
and thus, the fiercest witches in the land escaped suspicion.
Many, doubtless, vehement fascinatrixes, of middle age,
suffered
just judgment, but it is equally certain that many
innocent
old ladies were victimized for simply wearing spectacles.
That the grand juries began to ignore bills of indictment, was
more owing to the fear of depopulating the country of their
grandmothers, than to any new light of revelation shed upon
them by the judges. It was the fear of being compelled to
go without woollen stockings, that gradually brought the
pilgrims
to their senses. The approach of a hard winter
unravelled
the yarn of witchcraft, and opened the eyes of the
boys of the Bay State. Time and cold weather pointed them
to comfort and safety. Then Connecticut set a good example
and passed its memorable statutes against young women.
Then Mr. Hutchinson got bold, and made his famous speech
at the calm frolic at Taunton. If we continue these
annihilating
executions, says he, what an expurgated edition
of humanity shall be presented! If my aunts,I have nine
escape to the mountains, and then be caught, I shall see
them exhibited as monstrosities in the Zoological Institute!
It becomes us to consider the errors of our fathers, and to
learn wisdom from their unwitting sinfulness. Much did
they lament. Much penitential sorrow did they pour out,
when they finally discovered that the witchcraft which
afflicted
the land was only the eyey galvanism of juvenile
blood:
[12]
[12]
Is it not somewhat strange, that the principal sufferers as weird
women, were withered crones, when our fathers had before them this
testimony of the learned King James, concerning the Scotch witches?
Many of them that are convict, or confessors of witchcraft, are rich, and
worldly wise, some of them fat, or corpulent in their bodies, and most of
them given over to the pleasures of the flesh, continual hauntinge of
companie
,
and all kindes of merrinesse.
Demonologie, Book II
If this case
can be, as it ought to be, taken as good evidence, the manager of the
theatre, when he next gets up Macbeth, ought by way of variety, to strike
out the infernal, midnight hags, and put in something good looking,
fat, and funny.
Let the evil they did be interred with their bones.
They did all they could, for atonement, by expunging
It is worthy of note, as a matter of history, that the first case of
expunging
did not occur in our own time. The moral obligation of the duty,
as well as the clearness of the power, to expunge, was felt in the case
of the Salem witches So early as March, 1712, after the witch panic
had gone by, the church, which was then the state represented, met to
consider the case of Rebecca Nurse, who had been not only hung, but
even ex-communicated. The following notes are taken from Upham's
lectures on witchcraft. Her case is first stated, as follows, page 90.
Rebecca Nurse, the person whom the jury in the first instance
acquitted
,
but were afterwards induced by the strong disapprobation and rebukes
of the judges to condemn, was a member of the first church. On the
communion
day that intervened between her conviction and execution, Mr.
Noyes procured a vote of excommunication to be passed against her. In
the afternoon of the same day, the poor old woman was carried to the
great and spacious meeting house, in chains, and then, in the presence of
a vast assembly, Mr Noyes proclaimed her expulsion from the church,
pronounced the sentence of eternal death upon her, formally delivered her
over to Satan, and consigned her to the flames of hell.
Now for the redeeming record of common sense look to page 123.
The first church, which had anathematised Rebecca Nurse and others,
after their conviction, and previous to their execution, did all that they
could by way of reparation. It endeavored to erase the ignominy it had
cast upon them, by publicly repealing and reversing its censures, and by
recording the following affecting acknowledgment of its error.
March 2d. 1712.After the sacrament a meeting was appointed to be
at the teacher's house, at two o'clock in the afternoon, on the sixth of the
month, being Thursday; on which day accordingly, March 6th. they met
to consider of the several particulars propounded to them by the teacher:
viz.1st. Whether the record of the excommunications of our sister Nurse,
all things considered,may not be erased and blotted out. The result
of which consideration was, that whereas on the third of July 1692, it was
proposed by the elders, and consented to by an unanimous vote of the
church, that our sister Nurse should be excommunicated, she being
convicted
of witchcraft by the courtand she was accordingly
excommunicated
Since which the general court have taken off the attainder, and
the testimony on which she was conuicted not being so satisfactory to
ourselves, as it was generally
in that hour of darkness and temptation
,
this church having the matter seriously proposed and having seriously
considered it,
doth consent that the record ef our sister Nurse's
excommunication
be accordingly erased and blotted out, that it may be no longer a
reproach to her memory and an occasion of grief to her
children
.
the
records of criminality they had made up. Poor repentance,
perhaps. But the best they could offer. Forgive them.
Blot out was written on the tear that immortalized Sterne's
accusing angel.
If history has taught us any thing, it has inculcated the
good sense of the caution of Dr Drake:
Trust not the evils of a woman's eye.
Doctor Cotton Mather found out that witchcraft lay in
something
else than astrology, and divination, and conjuring and
burning pictures, and gathering cabbages on All-hallow-eve,
and putting chicken breast bones over the door-top, when he
quoted in reference to his seven sons, all bewitched by the
same young woman, a member of his congregation, the
pathetic lines of Virgil:
Nescio quis teneros oculus mihi fascinat agnos.
Tender lambs, indeed.Poor devils.All in love with the
same, Syren! Burned, withered, blasted, by an opthalmic
coup de soliel!
Perhaps, all struck down at one shot from
the same electrical battery! Well, let us reject all vulgar
magic, all spells, incantations, charms. We are reason proof
against them. But fascination we confess. Palmistry thrills;
but oculation sets the heart on fire.
Does any one doubt that a woman's eye is the fountain of
witchcraft? Why, all history, all philosphy, all morals, all
immorals, all experience, all nature, are full, fierce, and
flashing
with the proof.
History. Rise, witches, rise. Take them as they come.
Helen, Fulvia, Medea.She boiled her father-in-law,
and several other old gentlemen. She was a cook as well as
a witch.Sappho, Catharine of Russia, Rahab, Kitty
Fischer
,
Joan of Naples, Joan of Arc, Paulina Buonaparte,
Cleopatra, Lais, Thais, Tamar, Queen Christina, Judith,
Xantippe, Delilah, Dejanira, Nell Gwinn, Euriphile
Clytemnestra
,
DidoWe will see no more.Was there no
witchcraft
in these women's eyes? It would be interesting to hear
the ghosts of Alexander, Socrates, and Samson testify to
that point before a committee of the House authorized to send
for persons and papers.
The philosophy of fascination is full of attractive, and
incomprehensible
Vol. II.10
wonder. We feel it, and acknowledge its
power, but we cannot define it. It does not belong to the
exact sciences, but is rather referable to the metaphysical
deportment of all-overishness. We can analyze the elements
of ice, and give learned reasons why the blast that blows over
us is hot; but no man hath yet been able to resolve the
agonies
of the fierce and languid rays of woman's eye light. Some
philosophers, who though good enough christians on other
points, are well nigh materialists here, talk of the subtle
and active exhalation, or rarefaction of the humers of the
eye, and of the vibration of the nervous juices, and other
such abstract imaginations, with a sort of familiar impudence,
as if they had conquered the kingdom of darkness, and could
put you up a bottle of fascination to order, at a moment's
notice. But admitting these people, profane, to be correct;
they only show the
modus operandi
,the means used for the
expulsion and instillation of the invisible essence. They
simply point out the lightning rod by which the fluid is
conducted
.
The character of the element remains undeveloped.
We are not certified whether it truly be Satan that sends it
out in streaks. We are not assured whether it was a
deception
of our vision, when we have sometimes thought we
saw the Devil in a woman's eye. Fascination is still in
the clouds of chaos, with galvanism, and magnetism, and
chemical affinities, and aurora borealises, and the music of
the spheres, and the soul of the world, and all mysteries.
There be some men, who think themselves to be wise,
that deny the existence of the element of fascination, and
upon whom the eye of a beautiful witch falls powerlessly
as upon a brazen statue. Such were never created out
of flesh and blood, but were, in a hard laboring hour of
some modern Prometheus, manufactured out of whitleather
and red ink. If they do possess the attributes of humanity,
perhaps, they can reason, if they cannot feel. We pray
them, then, to be profound, and resolve us the well
attested
miracles of the Basilisk, and Opoblepha,respectable
brutes, who kill and cook their enemies and food, by staring
at them. What is the power that enables the rattle-snake
to draw by the invisible cords of his brilliant eyes, the
shivering victim of his fascination? Why crouches the
trembling
quail under the steady eye of the pointer?
O! how we should delight to put one of these vain
boasters
under the magnetic influence of a pair of eyes we wot
of! Thine, Julia, thine. Speak but say nothing. Let thine
eye discourse
[13]
[13]
Romeo
. She speaks yet says nothingwhat of that?
Her eye discourses.
. Be first downcast, then inquiring and
docile
,
then dignified, then tender, then earnest, then gently
rebuking, all with thine eyes, thy tongue ever silent, and
shortly thou wilt have a raging heathen in thy net, and
thou shalt sing the song of the triumphant Maimuna.
I thank thee, I thank thee, Hodeirah's son!
I thank thee for doing what can't be undone,
For binding thyself in the chain I have spun!
The web is spun,
The prize is won,
The work is done,
For I have made captive Hodeirah's son.
The power of Fascination rarely deserts the sex, even in
extreme old age. Its character and quality are only modified.
In youth, it is a consuming conflagration,a persuading
delusion
,a
bewildering deliciousness,a feverish rapture.
The victims operated upon are boys grown up, and pensive,
contemplative gentlemen. In senile years the element
becomes
weak. It degenerates into a venomous pestilence,
that falls powerless upon men, but with considerable fatality
upon little children, and cattle. Some writers, however, think
that the spirit exists in the greatest quantity, and strength in
gray antiquity. This notion, as we have seen, was the
received
belief among our forefathers of New England. Thus,
one of the most eminent and zealous expounders of the craft
says Old bilious persons are most supposed to have the
faculty
,
the nervous juice in them being depraved and irritated
by a vicious habit of living, so as to make it more pestilent
and malignant; and young persons,children and girls,are
most affected by it, because their pores are patent, their
juices incoherent, and their fibres delicate and susceptible.
Doubtless, the antique sybils are best entitled to the
reputation
of having what is commonly called an evil eye, so far
as concerns the laming of horses, and frightening juvenals out
of their wits. They can eyebite,as Cotgrave calls it,
sucklings. They may stare a cow out of her life estate.
They know how
to kill with their ugly mugs
like the Haridans among the Triballians, and Illyrians,
touching
whom we have the certificates of Vossius and Pliny. But
theirs is not the eye that strikes down and demolishes a man.
The full glory of sorcery flashes from the
the kissing witchery of the eye of twenty-five, and from the
venefic Vesuvius of thirty.
The question as to the morality of Fascination, depends,
very much, upon the discoveries yet to be made in its
philosophy
.
One thing will not fail to strike the careful investigator
Mankind, from the very beginning of time, has shown no
disposition
to avoid the arrows which send poison through his
veins, but has courted and rushed upon the dangers of the
priestesses of the craft. It seems to be a part of human
nature
,
to love to
Bask in the beam of a dark rolling eye.
Hence have arisen all the factions of rhyme-grinders,
jingling
their bells, and laboriously whetting down their pewter
metal into edge no edge, point no point, to the color of
some vixen's eyeball. The conclusion to be drawn from all this
mis-spent time, and painful elaborations of nonsense, is, that
Fascination is a sinful thing; for it is not to be found recorded
in any book of trust-worthy authority, that humanity has a
natural
propensity for occupations which are good. Man is prone
to evil, and human nature is frail. Alas! alas! we are a
fearful race of reprobates, worshipping idols of flesh and blood,
and building us temples to sacrifice in, in the black eyes, and
in the blue eyes, and in the hazel eyes of witches!
We all have much, very much to answer for, touching the
empire of witchcraft. We have not resisted the Devil, and
made him flee from us; but we have taken his arm, and
walked with him in company. How many witches' eyes
have stricken us with lightning, in our boyhood! How many
enchantresses galvanize us, daily, with our perfect consent!
The sin is so pleasant, the indulgence so voluptuous, that we
drink it in like stolen waters. The Syrens adopt so many
shapes, and come in so many forms, too, that we dont know
it is a witch, until we feel all over in one spot, as Dr.
Abernethy
happily expresses it. Nothing will save a man but
utter gynephobia. Some believe in spells. That was
reputed
a good charm composed by the learned friar
Philomyglinus
friar
of sins in public, and broiler of venison steaks
in private,and which he wrote for King Arthur when he
started to travel in Circassia.
But it availeth not. Not Greek, nor Hebrew, nor High
Dutch, Amulet, Alexipharmic, nor Abracadabra, will assure a
man of safety. We have a Quaker friend, who wore a
phylactory
of eel skin, around his right arm, for forty-five years,
10*
and then finally caught the aconite from a fat widow of forty,
that came to take tea with his sister.
A most confirmed witch, once, adopted the shape of a sweet
saint, and pretended to try to convert us. O! what beautiful
tears, she shed, while she talked to us about the goodness of
goodness; and how through the liquid diamonds pendant
from her eyelets, came the fierce mildness of her petitioning
witchery! Our heart was torn to pieces. Could we help
loving her madly? * * * * * That memory is painful
She afterwards bewitched a young minister, and carried
him off to Oahu. That cured us.
We were once fascinated to go home with a young witch
whom we met at camp meeting. How Satan can put on the
appearance of an angel of light! In that moonlit walk we
were burned to cindersO we were dust and ashes! Our
soul cried aloud, it is good to be fascinated! O keep on
fascinating! smile! strike! glory, glory, glory!
Why should we confess our sins to a public that is not
apostolic? The people shall not be our priest, and we will
not kneel at their confessional. But we will listen to their
confiteor
, and give them good advice. Friends, study King
James, live low, and wear green spectacles. Despair not
because
you are afflicted. It is good to be persecuted.
Remember
thatas his royal and pious majesty has told us
there are three classes of people whom the Lord lets Satan
buffet in this way; First, the ungodly for their sins;
Secondly
,
the godly who are sleeping in their weaknesses and
infirmities; and Thirdly, the brightest saints that their patience
may be tried before the world;and again,No man is
free from these devilish practices; yet we ought not to fear,
for we daily fight against the Devil in an hundred ways. So
as a valiant captain dashing into the battle stays not his
purpose
by means of a rummishing shot of a cannon, nor the
small clashing of a pistolet, so we ought to go boldly forward,
and fight howsoever wounded.
This subject is not unworthy the serious consideration of
congress. Fascination is practiced to such a great extent
in this community, that it may yet be necessary to pass
some conservative statute for its restraint. Wont one of the
parties take this subject up? They can make more out of it
than they can out of abolition, or any of the threadbare
texts about the bleeding constitution. Here is a fearful
crisis arrived! We are on the brink of a gynecocracy!
women
are travelling about the republic, preaching, lecturing,
and uniting, fidelity, infidelity, and politics. By the last
census
,
it appears that they are multiplying and replenishing the
republic in a most extravagant ratio beyond the sex that now
scarcely retains the reins of government. Our men are
getting
fast killed off by Indian wars and drinking. Suppose it
should so happen,it might,who can tell?that the next
numeration should exhibit a balance sheet of seven women to
one man;what will become of our liberties when the
fearful
fact is promulgated! Let no confident youth think that
this is the suggestion of a cowardly imagination, and that his
personal safety would not be jeoparded by ambitious aspirants
for queendoms. We kneel even now to the tyrants, and hug
the chains in which they bind us. But once let Miss
Martineau's
horrible doctrines of the equal rights of woman be
put into successful practice, and then good bye to purse and
sword, and all! We call them, now by affectation, the weaker
vessel; but it is in the multiplication table to make them
vessels
of wrath. There were Amazons once. Every one has
heard of Boadicea and old queen Bess. The word heroine
is far from being a proper noun. Is there not a prophecy on
record, that a time shall come when seven women shall lay
hold on one man?Seven to one! We faint! Air, air!
O! my country!
Yes, Congress ought to appoint a committee to inquire
into
the matter. Either side is interested to press the patriotic
investigation. Here are substantial laurels to be won. Here
may be built a name to last for ages. Let the self denying
patriots of any faction raise a standard of resistance against
witchcraft and petticoat government, and they will have a
watchword and a battle-ensign, that would herald them to
Victory.
AN UNPUBLISHED CHAPTER OF MRS.
TROLLOPE
.
New York JudiciaryPoliticsSpecimen of a ChancellorWater
drinking
DropsyChurch-yards.
The
most intricate and perplexing difficulty, after all, to be
encountered by one going to America, to settle, who has been
accustomed to a government of impartial laws, lies in the
Yankee Judiciary Systems; or as I would call them, machines
for administering law. That of the state of New York,
is the most democratic, as it is termed, and best illustrates to
my notion, the worst evils of a republic. Mr. O'Flanagan,
the leading lawyer at the bar of that state,furnished me
with some facts, which, although I heard them with a holy
horror, were related by him as establishing conclusively, the
superlative excellence of their government. Their Judges
and other officers of justice are not chosen at all in reference
to their capacity, or experience, but simply in regard to their
politics. The state I have before mentioned, is cut up into
separate factions, which carry on a fierce and bloody warfare,
for the purpose of getting possession of the offices of trust and
profit. And my friend solemnly assured me that it was a
universally
admitted principle, that the only legitimate object of
a republican government was the creation of offices for the
people to fight for. These are called
the spoils of war
, and
are distributed, with a sort of barbarian equity, among the
soldiers of the successful party, as soon as the battle is over.
The most important and lucrative situations are generally
gained by the best intriguers, and the leading chieftains.
They, on their part, have reciprocal duties to perform, and a
solemn promise is exacted from them, when they are invested
with their offices, that, after taking care of themselves,
and their brothers, and uncles, and nephews, they will
provide out of their power of patronage, for their
partisan
friends exclusively. A pregnant illustration of this rule
appears in Noah's History of New York, in the case of one
of the Chancellors of that state. The purport of the record
is to this effect;That immediately upon the appointment
being announced to the new incumbentwho was a country
farmerhe took the boat for the city of New York, to
comply
with the immemorial usages of the party; where, says
the veracious Noah, he hastened to smoke the calumet of
peace with the grand Sachems, and hold a long talk by
the council fires of St. Tammany. The meaning of all this
is, that the new Chancellor, according to custom, treated his
party to a sumptuous dinner.It was paid for, I am told, by
the Corporation of New York,but he had the credit of it,
and he gave a public pledge, as to the course he would
pursue
.
He appointed on the spot, two Sachems,Black Hawk
and Tecumseh,to be masters in chancery, in the city of New
York. In the course of the evening, the grand object of the
assemblage was effected; and upon this, Noah seems to
dwell with great delight. I must quote him againand
now came the time for the taking of the vows, and for the
proof that the people had not been mistaken in their man.
Supported by William-s-co and Jack-targy, and six other
chiefs, bearing bucks-tails, the noviciate arose under a canopy
of Irish linen, bearing the motto `Spolia Opima.' Nine
cheers shook the vaulted roof of the venerable wigwam,
while the signs of triumph were displayed. At length, the
general voice of joy becoming husky, the new elect, laying
hold of the ear of a half demolished cold pig, on the table,
before him,to signify thereby, that he would go the
whole hogpledged the toast, and vowed the vow, which
binds us to him forever. He swore to be ours, and ours alone.
To take care of number one first, and then provide for his
friends. Nay, such was the generous and magnanimous
feeling of the moment, that he drank `Death to the man that
won't take care of his friends, and decide their causes in their
favor.'
This Chancellor, I am informed by Mr. O'Flanagan,
during his term of office, was true to his pledge. He,
immediately turned out of office all the Vice
Chancellors
,
and Registers, and Clerks of the eight different Circuits
of the state, and provided for eight of his brothers two of
his brothers-in-law, three uncles, and an innumerable quantity
of second cousins, and distant relatives in the country.
This was not all; as my friend informed me; for with
judicious
regard to a proper reward, for his kindness to his friends
he went into partnership with all the new officers of his
appointment
and divided receipts with them. That his new
partners should not suffer by this encroachment, he added to
the fees of their office, and required things to be done, which,
O'Flanagan said needed not to have been done; and to
prevent
complaint out of doors he reduced the fees of the
solicitors
and counsel of the court, in a correspondent ratio. Of
this Mr. O'F. complained bitterly, and said that the next
thing he expected was that a rule would come out, requiring
every lawyer who had a case, to go to the register, or assistant
register, and give him a fee to draw his bill or answer. These
things, however, I do not well comprehend; but they show
plainly enough what republics are. One thing, O'Flanagan
told me, I think worth mentioning. After all the people of
the other party had been turned out, and their places supplied,
there were seven men left unprovided for, to whom the new
officer was deeply pledged. Having no other mode to reward
them, he appointed them extra sergeants at arms, for the
express
purpose of bringing him water to drink, while engaged
in Court. The joke of it is, that to keep them in
employment
,
he was obliged to drink most lustily, and be taking
potations during every moment of the day. It was one
eternal
sip, sip, sip. The lawyers looked on in amazement at
the Tantalian rapacity of his thirst, and the Manhattan
Company
sent a petition to the legislature upon the subject. But
the committee of the house to whom the matter was referred,
were all of the Chancellor's party, and they reported that the
imbibition complained of, was no more than was necessary in
the officer who had the charge of all lunatics and poor widows
with small children, and that the practice was commendable,
since it kept constantly before the eyes of the bar, a glorious
example of the preference of cold water, to brandy. Thus
sustained, and the sign of Aquarius thus preferred, the
Chancellor
drank with redoubled zeal, and appointed two new
deputy
sergeants at arms. But alas! the aquatic influences at
last overwhelmed him, and he finally died of the dropsy. I
saw his tomb-stone, erected in St. Tamimany's church-yard.
On it is written a long eulogium, concluding with these
words; Of him it may be truly said, that while he lived
he was no `small light,' and that he held his office `dum
bene, etiam optime, res pro se et suis gessit.'
[14]
[14]
The constitutional term of his appointment to
office.
AN UNPUBLISHED CHAPTER OF COL.
HAMILTON
.
[PICKED UP BY THE CHAMBERMAID, AT HIS LODGINGS.]
No intelligent traveller can fail to be struck on his arrival in
this country, with the wretched condition of the lower order
of the natives. The baleful effects of democracy can be
read at once in their pale, emaciated countenances. Instead
of the industry and honest ambition of European countries,
their badge and brand is an indolent and thievish indigence.
In no city in the world are there so many paupers as in New
York. A stranger is constantly beset by them, and finds his
own safety in the distribution of the contents of his purse.
The precarious supplies obtained in this manner, support a
large majority of the population. Great numbers of what
are called the respectable classes, subsist entirely upon a
kind of poor, small, yellow oysters, which are found in great
abundance, at low water, upon a flat on the west side of the
city, called the
Canal Street Plan
. I have seen thousands
of people, men, women and children, floundering and
flapping
through the mud, on the Plan in the middle of the
hottest
days, toiling and sweating, and eating their truly
republican
dinners. Not unfrequently, more than one
piscivorous
gourmand dashes at the same shell-fish; and then are
enacted scenes that shock a civilized beholder.
Oyster-knives
and blood become well acquainted. It is not
uncommon
for hundreds of people to be murdered in one of
these conflicts.
It is really refreshing, after witnessing these distressing
evidences of the turbulent spirit of democracy, to turn to
the contemplation of a people that has felt the happy
influence
Vol. II.II
of king and lords, game-laws, taxes and tithes. I
often go down to the Liverpool packet ships, to relieve my
disgust by a sight of something human. Home, sweet home,
rushes upon my memory, when I see these castles of the sea
disembogue their freights of wholesome emigrants from the
United Kingdoms. These hardy, enterprising, adventurous
subjects of our glorious sovereign, are the only salt to be
found on American earth. It is delightful to see them, as
they stream along the wharves, dressed in their neat green
frocks, white vests, and whole corduroy breeches, with a
steadiness and solemnity which nothing could have taught
but the influence of a sound government, and a bench of
bishops. Immense sums of money are brought into the
States by the emigrants; and I was informed by Mr.
Biddle
the cashier of the National Republican Bank, that a
greater revenue was drawn from the deposits made by these
new comers than from any other source. From this class of
individuals, too, have sprung all the distinguished men of the
country. They are the only exception from the general
charge of poverty and crime, which must be recorded against
the United States. I have the best authority for this; for
the district attorney of New York told me, in confidence,
that not a single individual of the three kingdoms had had
a charge preferred against him, in the police office, for seven
years and a half. These remarks cannot be applied to any other
of the foreigners who flock to this land of liberties. Their
condition is not much superior to that of the natives
themselves
.
The Dutch and the Swiss struggle through a
miserable
existence, in New Jersey, and Pensylvania; living
principally
upon cotton pods and the exterior filaments of the
sugar cane, which these states produce in abundance. They
are the mere helots of the Yankees in New England, who
own all the southern and middle states, and who treat the
wretched inhabitants with brutal tyranny. This very fully
appears from the report of Captain Hayne, a member of
congress from Florida, on bringing in a bill to provide for the
sowing of grass in the streets of Charleston.
One caste of the indigenous population of the country,
I ought, perhaps, to except from the general denunciation.
I refer to the negroes, and to those who build their hopes
of preferment here and hereafter upon their immediate
emancipation
from slavery. These elect people have come out
from the common herd of their fellow citizens, and shaken
off the dust of their feet against them. With a
magnanimous
disregard of means and consequences, they have
determined
that every bondman shall be free. No blow has
yet been struck, but active preparations are on foot.
Military
academies and Sunday schools are extensively
established
among the free blacks, and the best poets and
philosophers
now living in the country, bear the sable hue of
Africa. Major Jack Downing, whoas Colonel Lapis
informed
meis an intimate friend and cabinet counsellor of
the president, is an emancipated slave of John Randolph, the
late catholic bishop of Massachusetts. The Jackson party,
however, deny the friendship. A young lady in Vermont, of
considerable accomplishment for a Yankee, has established a
school of poetry and manners, for the good society portion of
the negroes. This really new academy is watched with
great jealousy by the government. The rabble have burned
the school-house down no less than thirteen times, and the
young lady herself is treated with all manner of indignity. She
bears it all, however, with the spirit of a martyr; and so justly
flattering to her is the notoriety she has acquired, that rumor
speaks of a matrimonial contract soon to be consummated,
which will certainly secure to her an everlasting reputation.
These solitary instances of endeavors to improve the
population
of the country, are oases in this desert of selfishness and
sloth. I visited the school in Vermont, in company with a
distinguished philanthropist from New York, and was
delighted
with the arrangement and order of the establishment.
The temperature of the school-room was rather too high,
considering
the number of the pupils; but there was a peculiar
aroma in the air,which my companion told me was not to
be snuffed but in the region of the Green Mountainsthat
made my two hours' stay exceedingly pleasant. What the
result of all this will be, it is really fearful to anticipate.
There will be bloodshed, no doubt; but I cannot, as a man,
refrain from going the whole length with my before-mentioned
friend; and with him, I hope soon to see the sons of Africa
placed, in all respects, upon an equality with the whites
marrying their daughters, ruling in their councils, giving
judgment
in their courts, and feasting at their festive boards.
Such millenial glories would, to be sure, be out of place in
England, but in this boasted land of liberty and equality they
would be appropriate and practically useful. Besides, as I
have already intimated, all the brains in the country, with a
few exceptions, are lodged in Ethiopian skulls.
I paid a visit, yesterday, to one of the courts, and witnessed
a glorious manifestation of the fierce spirit of liberty. An
action of assault and battery was on trial. The defendant
was a tall, broad, raw-boned, big-whiskered individual, who
had formerly been sheriff of Buffalo county. He came
originally
,
from the city of Kentucky, and was born, I am told,
upon one of the numerous sawyers on the Mississippi, where
most of the families in that barbarous region reside. This
was the thirty-seventh action against him, tried during this
court; and yet, notwithstanding he had knocked down two of
the judges on the bench, and maimed all the constables but
one, during this very term, not a single conviction could be
had against him. His personal prowess made him
invulnerable
and irresponsible. When I entered the court room, I
was startled by the unusual appearance of the forms of
justice
.
Instead of the gravity of bag-wigs and hair-powder, and
the grace of silk gowns, which adorn our king's bench, I
found the judge dressed in a pea-jacket, with black stock, and
pantaloons that might have once been white, and without a
symptom of a shirt. The jury was drinking gin and smoking
cigars, and the lawyers and the defendant were apparently
preparing for a fight. Presently the judge got up, in a
tremendous
fury, and leaning over his desk, shook his fist at
the combatants in the arena below him, and abusing the
defendant
in stentorian style, swore he'd be if he'd stand
it any longer! No sooner was this done, than up rose a
general cry of make a ring, make a ring! and the deed
followed the word instantaneously. To my utter
astonishment
,
the lawyers made a circle, and the judge pulling off his
coat, leaped over the bar, and throttled his antagonist in a
twinkling. The confusion and uproar were so appalling to
me, thatnot being accustomed to see fights in my own
countryI am scarcely able to say what blows were struck,
and what blood followed. After the lapse of five or ten
minutes
,
I saw the judge again on the bench, and the defendant
who must have been worsted in the encountermaking a
precatory speech to the court, gesticulating with his left
hand, while with his right he endeavored to keep a dislodged
eyeball in its socket. His discomfiture had a salutary effect
upon the jury; who, now that he was no longer an object of
admiration or fear, gave a verdict against him for thirty
thousand
dollars.
11*
CRIES OF NEW YORK.
AN UNPUBLISHED CHAPTER OF MRS. TROLLOPE.
PRIVATELY ADDRESSED TO THE PAINTER,
But intercepted and sent to the Spirit of the Times for exposure.
One
of the most singular characteristics of this
extraordinary
race of semi-barbarians, after mentioning their horrid
cannibal fashion of taking the shell off their eggs before they
inthroat their contents, and buying tooth-brushes by wards
seventeen to a city of three hundred thousand mouths,and
hiring a Street Inspector to clean their teeth, once, every Fall
and Spring, before election day, is their Cries. The
most profitable book that Washington Irving ever wrote was
entitled Cries of New York. It was embellished with
pictures
,which
are very taking in America,of a man crying
Clams! clams! Rockaway clams! dragging along a spavined
horseno, hide, I should say,spread over a lean hog,for
they have no
horses proper
in America;an Irish Loaferone
of our countrymen, dear,bawling Vatermelings
watermelons
,
my love;a low Dutchman, with a two bushel
basket
on his shoulder, vociferating T-Oaktea-rusk,
sweetest
;a
mule, with a Yankee pulling him, and conclamating
Sand, sand, any sand!which last mentioned article is a
great commodity in a country where they have no carpets.
I am told that Johannes Jacobus Constellatio, the
Rothschild
of Columbia, made all his money by carrying around the
streets rat skins, and crying buy some beaver, Sir? Fresh
from Oregon!
[15]
[15]
Vide Irving's Virgil to MacenasSic iter ad
Astra
.
Every thing here is done by crying. I got
out of the clutches of a gentleman the other day,don't cry,
kindest,they called him a police-officer, I believe, by
mere vehement clamor. It was something about one of the
smallest silver spoonsyou could take ninety like them in
your mouth, and I only borrowed this single one to show the
people in England how
little
things are in America.
Joy of my heart! how I wish to see, to hold, to love you!
This brief bed-quilt of my soul will reach you per the British
Queen Steamer in fourteen days. For four nights, then,
about that time, look upon the Moon, throw arrowy glances
into her face:she will feel the puncture, and laugh, and
make her reflections on me. So shall we meet, in spirit,
animally
magnetised. I cannot be with you, bodily for some
time to come. I am taking lessons, from a Yankee Editor,
in
Coolness, Sympathy
and
Gammon
.
I wish, my love, to call your particular attention to this
system of Cries. A well got up pamphlet addressed to
Lord Melbournesay by Anti-Radical,dont spell it
Aunty
,might move great force for you, and I may yet see
you in Parliament, the proud representative of the borough of
Snake Hill. Do try, dear!
The Worshipful Corporation of the City of New York have
done wonderful work in this behalf. They have established,
and honorably maintain, schools for Cries. Bellevue,
the Long Island Farms, and the Egyptian Tombs, are
the favorite colleges. Private schools, under good protection,
are plentiful. But the birch-holder is chosen in reference to
his strength of lungs. To be able to sing out, as they call
it,that is the great required qualification of a school-master.
A boy, in this republic, has got his education when he can
hurra, squeal, and scream at a political meeting, so as to be
heard five miles off;not before that maturity.
For people not poor enough to go upon the town, and for
that sort of democrats who advocate the honor of trade
because
they cannot get a dinner without it,and I assure you,
the country is full of such,night meetings,
caucuses
they
call them, or
carcases
,are held. I was at one, night before
last, drest in male attire, smuggled in by one of
your
friends,
I can't tell you, now. Mercy! mercy! mercy!the mixed
up impudence, gin, patriotism and tobacco! Talk of the
State of Mainewhy, if those Orators had their prophecies
fulfilled, not a single
estate
in England would
remain
, and
Jack Cade would be made lawyer for the whole kingdom
Jack on both sides, or something worse. Nevertheless, it
was pleasant to hear their sonorous throats rolling out
Hurra! I confess I think that word far beyond our
Parliamentary
,
shrill, argute Hear, mixed up with the country
and cockney discord of Hee, and Hea, and E. The
cry of Hurra for Jackson! made him President of the
United States. It happened that the old man's message about
the claims of the country on France, full of powder and ball,
got out to Byzantium just before a young man named
Stephens
,
who was returning from a mission to the Sultan of
Petrea
,
started in a small privateer for New York. The lad
opened, read, and explained the paper, and at the close,
carried
away by his enthusiasm, leaped up six feet, nine times,
threw his cap on top of a five story brick house, and
cried
out
what he called the old fashioned WAR
Cry
of Hurra for
Jackson! That burst of soul, converted ten Arabs to
Christianity
on the spot. They immediately took berths in the
forward cabin with John, crossed the Atlantic, got naturalized
in the Marine Court, and voted the Loco-foco ticket. Their
suffrages turned the election. Two of the Justices, I regret
to hear, have since been turned out. The Arabs said, on
hearing of this kick, Allah is Mallahserves them right;
the rascally foreigners are bought over, and are owned by
the other party now. Money and a popular CRY can do
any thing in this wild country. They cry Log Cabin, and
Hard Cider, now, for General Harrison. They
cry
Cider
,
but they drink Rum.
You have heard much of American politics; but you have
no conception of how much they do by cries. The two
parties
which I call,leaving adopted technicalities to the
natives
,Snug
in
office, and Bleating
for
office,that's
the genius of this republic,each train their young men, sons,
apprentices, and all, how to halloo. For this purpose, they
establish schools which they call General Committees of
young men, employ some forty-five-year-old-colt to sweat
himself down and look thin, to write their resolutions, and
copy extracts from speeches in Congress, and
seem
to be
youthful, and then to teach the real juvenals how to roar.
Such has been the crying up of this self-righteousness, and
crying down the iniquity of the candidates on the other side,
that several large gathering places have had their walls
cracked, and it is seriously feared by the mortgagees of the
Masonic and Tammany Halls that they will fall in and
smash the security furnished by the party speakers. But I
never heard the watchword cry of battle more gloriful than in
the Park. There needed no torches, though they were
there, for the stars attended that meeting thick, and sang,
though I don't think those democrats heard them. I did.
And when the boisterous ocean of
base
went up to the
treble
of the blessed sky, after some humble flower-planter had sown
his seed, I heard, distinctly, the mingled chorus of seraphic
harps, hymning composite harmony with Loco-Foco shouts
of Hope. O! I am sorry you left this country so soon! If
I only thought you was safe off the Newfoundland Banks!
Don't stop to fish, dearCodfish are coppery at this season
of the year.
Hang politics! Let me simply speak of the music of the
country, which the democrat simpletons call
Cries
. In doing
this I do not mean to encroach upon the investments of
Charles Horn, who has entered into great engagements to
diapason and appogiature the street cries, and the yells of
the suffering slaves as their mistresses beat their sculls in with
the kitchen shovel; nor to deprive the poor poets of Gotham
of their glorious gathering up under the butchers' stalls in
market, of things long time ago. I speak from my own
gathering. * * *
But, for a simple, lone woman, to lie in bed and hear the
glorious festivals of the early birds of New York! it is
rapture
to open your windows and let in the operatic sweetnesses.
If I had musical talent I would save expense, and not trouble
you;but you will have to engage Horn to furnish the music.
I can give you only the words. E. G. Hea!s! adishes!
raydishers!raydishus!watermylions! Harcoal!
charcoal
!
Sawbries!strawburruos!sawbris! Sun!
Morning
Hayold!Heruld!
and Brother
Jonathin! Ha-aiep! yep!
hinc! yop! wick! wo! mil-ick! Then right afterwards,
Butter-my-leg! or buttermillock! Journal of Commerce,
ma'am?
Here's
the Courier and Enquirer! The last two
cries
sotto voce
, as those publishers stand upon their dignity,
and employ boys who can whisper so as not to be heard above
the noise of the steam they are letting loose from the
delaying
river-crafts.Ba-a! A-a-a-ah! go the calves and lambs,
half starved on a North River sloop close by. Go 'board
the Constitution, sir? cries a fellow in a boat, pulling out
alongside. NextPassengers an't paid their passage please
step to Cap'n's office and SETTLE! On the wharf, again, a
negro pokes you in the ribs, with, Carriage, ma'am?
Take your baggage? cry out fifty licensed runaways, hired
by the Corporation out of the House of Refugethe only
legitimate opera house in the city. Get into Broadway, and
a Greenwich coach runs over you, while a Bowery
omnibus
heals your wounds with, Bowery! right up! take a
seat, ma'm! while you are rolling in the mud. Hot corn!
ho-ut co-orn! cries a muddy-faced Abyssinian, as she pokes
into your amazed eye an ear of maize. Hot corn, piping
hot! come and buy my lillywhite corn and let me go home.
I particularly commend the last cry to your study before
Horn & Co. get hold of it.Baked pears! baked pears!',
chimes in an old wench, as she applies a pair each side of
your nose. Eysters! here's your fine fat eysters! Try
one, ma'm. Then some tender urchin ushers out his
democratic
infidelity, and a third takes up the counter and screams
at the top of his
alto, New Ery, Sir? New Ery, Sir?
and
seventy-ninthly chimes in some Conservative in base,
jingling
harsh discord, against whom all cry out, Keep your
Times, sir, keep your Times. Any soap fat? any ashes?
cries a decent looking Yankee, who pretends to be an
Irishman
,
so that he may have the liberty of the town, and can steal
easily. His comrade at his side cries legitimate Tipperary,
vociferating in tripple allegretto, Onny sopfat on oshes?
Toot! toot! toot! goes a tin horn, while a little boy
running
along side of it cries, Here's your fine fresh mackerel!
Toot! toot!here they go-ey! Then comes some sweet
minstrelsy from the sweeps,all beautifully black, and with
the sweetest teeth, my love. I am told some of them are our
own emancipated, from Jamaica. Such music as they have
got! Such throat-rolls! Such eye-waves! It would be
impossible for any English woman to be here for a day
without
becoming an advocate of anti-slavery. Listen, and put it
into poetry and sing it. O! o-o-o-o-oh! O! o-o-o-oh-oh!
O! oh! ohi, ohi! oho! It rolls from their angelic, sooty
tapanities, which the people of the States vulgarly call
lips
,
with such a pleasant grace, that it always reminds me of the
dying howl of my dear lap-dog Juliowhom you fed to death
with too much toast,crying for another bathe in the milkpot
at breakfast.
I have not mentioned a tenth part of the parties in this
operaI have given you but some of the principal
characters
;
you must fill up the under-actors, supernumeraries'
and spectators' names yourself. The Carnival in Rome, or
in Venice, is a fool to it. People there
act
here they
live
their parts. It is a chapter of their education and duty.
Every crier must be appointed by a court; auctioneers and
masters in Chancery are nominated by the Governor, and
elected by the Senate. Little-necked clam-boys are
examined
and certificated by Chief Chamberlain and Lord High
Hospitaller Harry Van Cott, at the Golden City of Jim Acre.
Few, I am told, pass the test; the most being destined for
weeksCale.i. e. Calendarto improve for their desired
circuit. They get their throats in sweet order after this
tuition
,
and can sing like gypseys. Sweet monkeys one got my
cornelian off my finger Sunday afternoon, so innocently and
full of play! Poor thing, how sorry he was he couldn't find
it on the carpet! He was an English boy, my precious one,
born on the passage, crying all the way! Wasn't that funny?
But instinct taught his cry. His mother's thought at his
conception
taught him New York. Your natural shrewdness
and good sense will readily find the reason why the
Americans
have succeeded so desperately in gorging our best
musicians
;
whistling down every bird in the British horizon to
their mobocratic stools.
They love music, and they will have
it
. They have a taste. They made Malibran, and gave
her a husband and a name. Every raspberry girl from
Bergen
knows this, and when she pours out sound of
rarseburies
from her wide-startling lips, she is careful to stream
from a deep-rushing throat, and to volume out the tone
opposite
the house of the Alderman of the district, and sell to him a
penny a basket cheaper than to any of the commonalty. I
cry
you mercy for this long epistle. Far, but faithful,
Believe me, I think their
cries
Macedonian,
Though beautiful to be
listened to, only
, your own
Trollope
.
THREE HOURS WITH TIME.
It
was a sultry afternoon in the month of August. Clara
was not, as I had hoped she would be, in her seat at church.
My disappointment and a hearty dinner made me wish myself
back at home; and I beheld with dismay the Rev. Dr.
Spin-text
,
so celebrated for his acuteness in drawing distinctions,
and for his ability in expounding mysteries, wipe away the
perspiration with his blue cotton handkerchief, as he repeated
for the third time, in a climacteric of emphasis, a text from
the Apocrypha. A wicked, heathenish languor came over
me; my head was dropping upon the desk in front of me,
when I felt my elbow slightly touched by some person in the
aisle. I turned around, and observed a significant,
queer-looking
Vol. II.12
old gentleman, in whose face was combined a singular
appearance of youth and age. His face was wrinkled all over;
yet the wrinkles were not the furrows of decay; each one was
full of elasticity and life; and his eye, which was protected
by long grey lashes, exhibited the buoyancy and good humor
of youth. His person was enwrapped in a loose grey cloak,
which effectually prevented a close scrutiny into the figure of
the wearer. I had, however, no time for observation, for the
old man, leaning over the pew door, immediately addressed
me in a low voice, and asked,
Will you step out with me one moment?
I was heartily glad to get an excuse for leaving the
theopolemic
arena; and hoping that the congregation would think
I was suddenly sent for on important business, I immediately
unbuttoned the door, and followed the old man out of church.
As we proceeded down the aisle, I observed that the doctor
stopped, and the people stared, as if astounded at my
irreverence
;
and all eyes were turned upon me. To my surprise
not a creature looked at, or seemed even to observe the old
man, who moved along as noiselessly and swiftly as a cloud.
When we had at last fairly got out into the churchyard, and
were alone, my new friend turned to me.
You have no disposition, I perceive, said he, with a
humorous
yet courteous glance of his eye, to stay and see that
old screw-driver boring into non-essentials, and destroying
bad instruments in trying to prove worse theories? Come, I
have invited some friends of mine to a symposium with me
to-day. You will be pleased with their acquaintance. You
will go with me? Get on my back?
This was all said sooner than I can repeat it, and the deed
followed the invitation with infinite rapidity. Quicker than
thought I found myself astride of the old gentleman's
shoulders
,
and before I could recover breath, we were above the
steeple of the church. As we began to ascend, my future host
stretched out from underneath me a pair of huge black wings,
with which he made the air to scream, as if severely wounded
by the rapid strokes of their pinions. His old gray cloak
floated off behind us, in the shape of a dark vapor, and was
soon lost in ether. The rushing wind struck off a very
genteel
wig, with which his bald head had been protected; and
my new friend, now stripped off his different masks and
coverings, flew, confessed and proven to my astonished eyes,
old father Time
. There could be no illusion. There was
his horrid scythe in one hand, and his hour-glass in the other,
and his single gray forelock, floating in the wind; and
certainly
no genius nor devil could fly half so fast. Up, up we
flew. What a situation for a poor sinner like me!
My health was not very good; and my friends had lately
been telling me that my days were short, and that my
time
was passing fast away; but this was rather faster work than
either my friends or myself expected to see going on. My
whole life, and all the thoughts and feelings of my life, seemed
centered in a single point. I thought of my many insults,
neglects, and abuses of the old gentleman; and horror
stupified
me when I remembered that I had several times, tried
even to kill him. It is all over with me, now! thought
I: this autocrat of the world, this ruiner of empires, this
humbler of proud and wicked hearts, is about to take his
swift revenge. My limbs relaxed, my muscles seemed to
melt, when the old gentleman, turning his head partly round,
spoke in a sharp tone,as if to chide me for my want of
confidence
,and
bade me hold on tighter. I felt re-assured by
his manner.
You much mistake my character, said he; you have
nothing to fear from me. I have read your thoughts and pity
your feelings. I am not revengeful; no man ever suffered
ill from acquaintance with me, unless he abused my gifts.
But I can't talk and fly well at the same time. I will
converse
with you more at freedom when we get to our journey's
end. In the mean time carry my hour-glass, for I have got
more than my usual load, and can scarce grasp all.
So saying, he reached me his glass, and I felt not more
comforted
by his words than by the view of sundry black bottles,
nicely wired and waxed, which disclosed themselves to my
eyes in his act of turning. I took courage and a firm seat at
once. If I had been singing the third verse of Away with
melancholy in mine own parlor, I could not have felt more
easy and comfortable. Our conversation was momentary and
monosyllabic, until I observed that we were descending over
a sharp ledge of the Rocky Mountains. Here we laid on our
wings, and soared along more leisurely, while old Time
looked
about, as if uncertain where to land. Occasionally he
struck with his scythe at some projecting point or eminence,
when instantly the face and surface of the mountain became
changed. A single touch of that magic weapon wrought
wonders as we passed along. A fertile plain would in a
moment
occupy the place of a barren ledge of rocks; or a lake
reflect back the clouds and the neighboring scenery, where
just before some bleak Atlas had reared his head. While
hovering about this region we had a very unembarrassed
conversation
upon the subject of the future destinies of this part
of the world. The prospects of the Indiansthe growth of
the western statesthe dissolution of the Unionthese, and
other topics of the same character, seemed to be familiar
matters
with my companion; and I must say, that upon this
occasion
I gained some knowledge of Time's intentions, which
certain great men would give all their present prospects to
possess. But I need not say, perhaps, that as to my
prospective
information thus obtained, my mouth is sealed. At length
we alighted upon a romantic lawn, which nature had made a
garden after her own sweet simple fashion, where wild roses
gave their sweets, and the honeysuckle encircled the
untrimmed
althea, receiving and breathing perfume. We directed
our footsteps to a grove of venerable oaks, which spread their
magnificent branches hard by.
These oaks, said Time, mortals would say have defied
my power. But I feel pride in stating that they have been
planted and nurtured and preserved by myself. Here is my
favorite retreat. When sick of the abuses and unkindness
of mankind, here I have often found the wished-for retreat of
the philosopher of nature. How sweet retirement is, Mr.
Cypress.
I was glad to find that the old gentleman was getting to be
sentimental; for the seclusion and sweetness of the spot had
already made me rather lack-a-dasical. But suddenly
checking
himself,
Here, said he, I have invited my friends to meet me,
I must apprise you who they are. You must not expect to
find my equals; I of course, have none. They are my
dependent
family connections. Spirits, like me; all alike, and
yet all different; parts of me, yet distinct, and to a certain
extent
independent sovereigns; not so old as I am, yet born at
the same time. These are mysteries, I grant you, and you
need not ask to understand them. My friends are the
Hours
.
Not the sickly nymphs whom the mawkish fancy of the
Grecian
poet conjured up. No, my young friend, I know that it
has been abusively said of me, more than once, that I
occasionally
am lazy, and borrow speed and swiftness from the
12*
smiles of woman; but I pledge you my word that these
reports
are only the base slanders of my enemies.
Here the old gentleman spoke with emphatic indignation,
and unconsciously striking his scythe against a huge rock,
upon which we were treading, there sprang up where the
blow was given a pure, bubbling spring of water. I smothered
an ill-restrained exclamation. The old gentleman took no
notice of the matter.
Pardon my feelings, he continued, I am getting old,
and perhaps peevish. My friends are twelve young
gentlemen
,I
say
young
, according to our mode of computation,
hearty, hard-working, industrious, good fellows, who have
been fellow-laborers with me since I first followed my
present
business. You will find them agreeable if you choose to
have them so, or they will be cross and ill-natured, as you see
fit. They partake a great deal of the fashion of the times,
and are not unfrequently a little irregular; but this, I assure
you, arises from nothing but their accommodating disposition.
Within that grotto, which you see upon your right, we
sometimes
meet, and talk over matters, leaving some one or more
of the twelve on the watch; and if any thing goes wrong in
our absence, we rectify the error at the next leap year, orif
that wont answerwe have a new calendar, or new style,
manufactured, to set things right again. But come, let us
go in.
So saying, we entered a spacious grotto, where I perceived
the company had already begun to assemble. I have read
of the cave in Antipharos; of the heaped up treasures, and
kingly glories of the chambers of the east. I have seen in my
dreams the gorgeous magnificence of the palaces of Arabian
magi, but what, O Time, can compare with the spectacle which
now burst upon me! Here was indeed the museum of ages.
Antiquity, modern years, the four quarters of the world, might
here have each claimed some precious curiosity. The crowns
and sceptres of monarchs, the robes and stoles of orators, the
gowns of philosophers, the cimiters of heroes, were here.
The riches of the world, spiritual as well as physical, here met,
and were apparent to the eye of sense; and I found that
my heart was affected by their contemplation, with the same
emotionthough to an intenser degreewhich I have felt
when reading what history has said of them. Here were
embalmed
and encased in ethereal adamant the faith and
constancy
of suffering martyrs, the tears of oppressed virtue, the
fame of the conqueror, the pangs of the vanquished, the pride
of the usurper, the aspirations of the poet. In fine,for I
cannot
attempt even the heads of a catalogue of the collection,
here were the essences of all the virtues and vices, passions
and emotions, glories and disgraces, which ever entered into
the hearts of men, or marked their career, embodied and
rendered palpable to vision. I had no opportunity for a close
examination, although my curiosity drew me very powerfully
towards an immense collection of books and manuscripts,
over which was written in golden characters, Alexandrian
Library. I could barely make a few reflections, when my
host, taking me by the arm, whispered in my ear, Here are
treasures which the world accuses me of having destroyed;
bear witness how I am belied. We had entered so
noiselessly
that the Hours did not at first perceive our approach.
They had all arrived except Twelve O'clock, and also except
Four, Five, and Six O'clock, whom Time said he had
directed
to stay behind, and wait upon Dr. Spintext and his
congregation
.
We concealed ourselves behind an ancient statue,
while Time hastily sketched the characters of some of the
guests. There was a strong family likeness between all of
them, and all wore sharp, short wings. Each had a small
sickle hanging at his back, under his wings, yet all were
dressed differently, and were dissimilar in their conduct.
That tall, lean, straight young man, standing by himself,
said Time, is One O'clock. He is the most unsociable of the
whole family, and feels vain of his being number one. He
has to work in the heat of the day, however, and you observe
his retiring shirt collar and moistened kerchief give proof of
his exertions. I often attribute his apparent melancholy to
fatigue and exposure to the sun. He possesses some singular
and
unique
qualities, and we are always happy to own him
for
one
of us. Two O'clock stands a little on his right, with his
back half turned towards us. He is as fat again as One O'clock,
but I assure you not the less active. He eats a great deal, and
yet is always hungry and full of business. He has lately got
into the brokerage profession, and has almost as much to do
with exchanging money and taking up notes as Three
O'clock
,
whom you see approaching him. I have expostulated
with both of them against pursuing a profession for which
they are certainly not so well qualified as Five, Six, or even
Seven O'clock; but young men now-a-days, you know, will
choose their professions for themselves. Seven O'clock is
taking
a seat there at the tomb of Thersites. I'll lay you a wager
now that fellow's got his hour-glass filled with an infusion
of tea, instead of sand. I am afraid, sir, that young man has
acquired an affection for some old maid. He's become
scandalous
,
and makes remarks upon his absent companions; but
what is most suspicious, he will not drink wine. It will do
your heart good presently to see him fill his glass half full,
and when his health is proposed, sip it with a simper, like
nothing temporal, I assure you. That fine looking fellow,
combing his whiskers, and who looks as though he had just
escaped from a frisseur's show-window, is Master Eight. He
has many good qualities, sir, and possesses infinite versatility
of talent. He has chosen, it seems, to-night to be tricked out
for a ball, or an opera; and to carry his operations among the
fair sex; not that he cares two-pence for them. By no means;
the girls have laid a great many traps for him, particularly in
the country; but they have found out, at last, that he was
born too early in the evening for them. He is a literary and
political character besides, and many a public meeting for
charitable purposes has been held under his auspices. What
I say of him now, Mr. Cypress, I may say of all of us.
Though each has his own business to attend to, yet we all
attend to each other's; we have to be like lawyers, `
omni
laud cumulate
,' a sort of jack-of-all-trades people, learned
in `
omnibus rebus et quibusdam aliis
.' We have all manner
of people to deal with. You will perceive, sir, by examining,
closely, that Master Eight has a pack of cards sticking out of
one pocket, and a camp-meeting hymn book out of the other.
Whether piety or picking pockets employs his next moment
depends mainly upon the character of the mortal he meets.
Nine O'clock, whom you observe figuring about those mirrors,
is nothing more nor less than Master Eight set in motion. He
has not so much starch but more fire and vivacity; but when
he chooses, he is insipid enough.
Here old Time gave a tremendous yawn.
By my hour-glass, said he, I never can look at that
cross fellow with two heavy eyes, without getting sleepy.
I directed my gaze to the person who gave cause to this
exclamation, and perceived a sleepy looking old fellow with a
book in his hand, whom I took to be Ten O'clock. But that
yawn had closed the lecture on heads. The whole company
simultaneously started and rushed towards our covert. In the
same breath we advanced upon the Hours, and answered all
inquiries by timely gratulations and welcomes.
My dearest friends, said the old gentleman, bowing with
the grace and elegance of his most polished manner, I am
quite delighted to meet you all again. I trust I have not
kept you long in suspense. At least, I hope you have made
yourselves happy. Allow me to introduce to your
acquaintance
my friend Mr. Cypress. He is a very respectable mortal
of good familycan get
tick
wherever he goes, and never
suffers his clock
to strike the hours
. He has a friendship for
us, gentlemen, and wishes to make the most of us.
Here I was almost crushed by the embraces of half-a-dozen
of my new associates.
But come, my friends to business. `
Tempus fugit
,' is
my motto you know. Be seated. I promised you last
new-year's
eve, you remember, to give you a taste of the new
importation
of Burgundy. I have secured the boys, and have
them here.
As he said this we seated ourselves at a long table, and our
host drew forth twelve veritable bottles of rich red Burgundy
burning red
.
Gentlemen, said he, I will give you
my certificate
that
these are the true, genuine boys; `
insignes pietate viros
,' as
Virgil has it. But where did I get them? you ask. Why in
a very good place. The same spot where I picked up my
friend Ascanius here. To make a long story short, the
sexton's
back was turned, I caught hold of my forelock, the
bottles were under my arm, I touched Mr. Cypress's elbow,
and we were here in no timefill, gentlemen, fillbumpers
your healthI am happy to see you all, at all hours.
My dear Tempus, said Nine O'clock, your spirits are
as etherial as your wine. That `iron tongue' of yours, as
Will Shakespeare used to call it, is as quick and voluble as
the piston of the North America.
Like causes produce like effects, said Seven O'clock, in
a low tone. They both are set a-going by
steam
.
Not of the tea-kettle, said Nine.
Nay, now, my friends, this is ill-timed for gentlemanly
hours, interposed Time. I hold that it is quite enough
for us to be abused by our enemies; let us not suffer our keen
wits to wage war either upon each other's spiritualities or
temporalities
.
I, for my part, am sober and pious as the world
goes, yet, although, I have kept pace with the improvements
of different ages, and have accommodated myself to the
different fashions of the day, yet I find that my enemies are
universal. In attempting to please all, I have pleased none.
Mankind, I find, have been determined to find fault with me
ever since I had any thing to do with them. In every age I
have been accused of being worse than ever I had been
before
,
and of getting worse and worse every day. Is there a
term of obloquy with which I have not been visited? Am I
not reproached by all manner of cunningly devised phrases
of the poets, and by down-right Billingsgate of the mob? Yes,
gentlemen, and it is so with us all. We are, in the same
breath, accounted swift and tedious, long and short, certain
and unknown. `
Tempora mutantur
,' says the classic; `the
times are out of joint,' cries the poet; `hard times, bad times,
poor times, miserable times,' ejaculates the
canaille
. What
are we not in the esteem and on the foul tongues of our
malicious
slanderers? Yet, we bring them daily good gifts, and
many of them, particularly the political part of the world,
are content to live and be waiters upon us. I sometimes
seriously think of getting rid of the connection; but the
moment that I hint an intention to move into another
country
,
all the world weeps, and goes distracted at the thought.
However, we must `grin and bear it,' my friends, and in the
mean time,
here's to better times
.
Here I ventured to remark, on the behalf of some of my
earthly friends, that I thought the judgment of Time, although
in general impartial and controlling, to be in this instance
prejudiced and too indiscriminate. I insisted that many
mortals loved Time, and the things of Time. above all things;
and that for this very affection they suffered martyrdom every
day. I referred to the cases of newly married lovers, and
people about to be hanged; and was proceeding in my
vindication
with some zeal, when I was rather abruptly called to
order by two or three of the company for making a speech
against time as they called it, and was reminded that I was
not in congress. As I was attempting an explanation, we
were interrupted by the approaching sound of some
bacchanalian
ditty outside the grotto.
Twelve O'clock has not been at his studies to-night I
opine, said Seven O'clock. When he arrives it is generally
time for decent people to go home.
By these characteristic remarks I was prepared to see Master
Twelve, who now staggered into the room, bowing and
bending
with the most ludicrous affectation of dignified politeness,
and after divers circumgyrations, took his seat by One O'Clock.
The appearance and conduct of this personage were rather
disordered. His face was pale and haggardhis eye dead
drunk. His clothes were cut after the newest pattern of
modern
grace, but exhibited unequivocal symptoms of having
been in a recent fray. A watchman's broken lanthorn
supplied
the place of his hour-glass, and the bladeless handle of
his sickle, suspended from his neck, performed in its wearer's
hand the function of a quizzing glass. These shocking
evidences
of dissipation drew down upon the new comer the
sharp rebukes of old Time. His reproofs, however, were
more in sorrow than in anger, and the old gentleman turning
to me, assured me that these aberations from the right road
were only seldom, and always the unfortunate result of
unavoidable
circumstances.
I will show you that young man, said he, night after
night dying his locks gray in the smoky fumes of his lamp,
and wasting his pale cheek over his midnight studies to benefit
the world. But hark what he has to say for himself.
I turned my head towards the culprit guest, and observed
that he was trying to steady himself by leaning upon One and
Two O'clock, who to my surprise now began to put on
entirely
different characters.
Gentlemen, he at last stammered out, I ask to be
forgiven
I
have been in bad company, and have had no
Burgundy
to drink. But you know it's my nature to be always
last`but better late than never.' Shall I tell you what
glorious mortals have been with me to night? Well, they
werethey were good fellowsthey said I was `the very
witching time of night,' and when I was going, they told me
if I could'nt stay I must send my little brother One. Father
Chronos, your blessinggentlemen, my love to you. I drink
the hours, all the hours, and nothing but the hours.
Here the crazy spirit observing me, broke through all
restraint
,
and pitching his body in a straight direction towards
me, extended both arms for an embrace. I hastily sought to
avoid him by getting under the table, but in the attempt I
struck my head with a cruel violence againt its sharp corner.
The blow for a moment stunned me. At last I recovered,
and raising my head, found that I was back in church. The
gloom of evening was gathering about me; the pulpit and
pews were vacant, and the sexton coming up, told me he
wanted to close the doors.
Vol. II.13
EXTRACT FROM THE
ADDRESS OF DR. CYPRESS,
ON TAKING THE ETYMOLOGICAL CHAIR IN THE NEW
COLLEGE
.
[Published by desire of the class.]
Etymology
, says Jeremy Bentham, is an essential and
useful branch of philology. It supposes an acquaintance with
the philosophy of the human mind, with the analogies which
form and distinguish each language, with the history of
mankind, philosophical, religious, and political. It furnishes
the readiest and most effectual means to acquire the
knowledge
of language, and as language is but the dress of our
ideas, it holds up a mirror to delineate and reflect the
operations
of the human mind.
Most authentic art thou, O Jeremy! and whoso readeth
with a right spirit, he shall be edified. But all are not true
believers. The scepticism and bad taste of this rail road
age reject faith, and cry out for demonstration. This is near
at hand for the learned caviler; Heaven help the common
herd, that cannot comprehend a thing when it is made
manifest
unto them. We, be it lamented, have got to fight a fight
against them. Ay, such is the jealous suspicion of the vulgar
world, that in the prosecution of these sublime meditations,
we must prepare to combat the prejudices and objections of
many a Zoilus, and be solemn as well as earnest, lest they
who never studied astrology or magical harmonies, should
esteem us to be triflers. Let me remark to these last
mentioned
,
miserable individuals, that, sinful, they are plunged
into the same gall of bitterness which drowned the wits of
the would-be-wise men, who denied to Columbus a western
continent; that they are obligors upon the same bond of
iniquity with the phil-agnosiasts who doubted the circulation
of the blood, or the efficacy of vaccination, or who now,
impious
!
shake their profane heads at Captain Symnes and
Ddalian Mr. Bennett.
But instead of railing, I should be studious [whispers
discretion
]
of submissive and alluring speech
ad mulcendos animos
for engaging the favor of the ignorant, whom I would
enlighten
.
In accordance with this presumption, let me, with
deep deference, submit, that the dignity of etymological
pursuits
is proved by their antiquity, and the character of their
patrons.
Herodotus records, that one Samuel Metticus, an ancient
king of Egypt, who had a vigorous taste for philosophy, and
who would certainly, had he lived in our age, have invented
steamboats, and discovered the perpetual motion; being
desirous to ascertain what language was the earliest, caused
two infants to be taken from their mother's breasts, and
confined
in a solitary hut, where no human voice might reach
them; very justly and sagaciously determining that if ever
they agreed to talk, it would be in the language of nature,
and consequently, in that of the first inhabitants of the world.
or as it is rendered in Dr.
Parr's translation, these things commanded princely Sam.
The babes continued so long mute, that the king began to
doubt the wisdom of his theory, when wonderful to be told!
one morning upon the entrance of his servants to feed them
with their accustomed meal of goat's milk, the little infants
fell upon their knees
and, with
uplifted hands, cried out Bekos. Now had the king
understood
English, he might readily have perceived that
is by
apocope
and by paragoge
, or, in our vernacular,
Bekky;
and what could
Bekky
mean, but a nurse, or servant girl
a being for whom the unprotected state of the little
innocents
languished! And what is consequent, but that there
is a truth in the doctrine of innate ideas, and that one of the
first we entertain is the sense of imbecility; and that, when
infants, we must be attended by a servant maid, orby
synedoche
a
Bekky
, which is a sort of generic term for the whole
tribe? Or
indeed, when evolved from juvenile gums,
with the emollient lubricity of an infant lisp, might fall upon
auriculars sufficiently philological, as a well-defined outcry
for
breakfast
an exclamation extremely natural for hungry
children, and quite common even at the present day. But
both these cogent explications were strangers to Sam.
Metticus
,
whose library had not been furnished with Webster's
Universal, and therefore knew not English undefiled; and
he finding the oracular word to signify
bread
in some other
language, the question was settled to the infinite detriment
and damage of our mother tongue.
Shakspeare had a very proper idea of the importance of
these pursuits, when he made Hamlet, that courtier, scholar
and soldier, answer to an inquiry of what he studied, words,
words, words.
The Jewish Rabbins employed themselves in analysing
the words of the Old Testament, well convinced that every
one contained in it a law or a prophecy.
It would be wasteful and ridiculous excess, to
enumerate
all the syllabic and literary philosophers, who have spent
their lives in settling the meaning and orthodoxy of words.
The simple proverb,
verbum sapienti
, will put the dignity
of the profession beyond a doubt. A word for the wise
evidently intending, that it is for wise men alone, to
comment
on and quarrel about obscure expressions. We have,
therefore, assumed a weighty responsibility, in putting on the
whole armor of an etymologist, and we must be strong, and
brave, and bold to sustain ourselves in that glorious company
of knights-noscent, who have consecrated themselves to
the overthrow of delusion. But do not fear for me, my
gentle
pupil, I have fought for a word before now. I know the
temper of my weapon, and not without confidence have I
plunged into black blood.
Let us now rush
in medias res
. Mark how obscurity
bites the dust, and error gives up the ghost.
The poet very truly and happily sings,
The man that hath not music in his
sole
,
Nor is not moved with concord of sweet sounds,
Is fit for treasons, stratagems and spoils,
Now, the vulgar editions have so arranged the last word
in the first line of this triplet, as to make the poet require
every man to keep a music book under his ribs, and that his
soul should be no better than a wind instrument! Here has
been grievous misconception, and here is our vocation exalted.
The discriminating antiquary and judicious critic, who is
aware of the constant corruption of language, who
understands
the analogy of words, and is familiar with the
manners
and customs of nations, will perceive, upon a little
reflection
,
that the poet, in reality, refers to the custom of
dancing
with musical instruments attached to the feet; having
in his eye, no doubt, the concluding couplet of Herrick's
beautiful little epicedium on the death of Mrs. Malaprop:
With rings on her fingers and
bells on her toes
,
And she shall have music
wherever
she goes.
13*
With this explanation the author's meaning is apparent. Not
Psyche
, nor
alma
, nor the old fashioned English
soul
was in
his thought. He is the eulogist of saltation, merely, and
superinducent melody. The man, says he,translated into
prose,who is too Cassius-like to dance, who confesses not
the bewilderment and strong compulsion of a tinkling foot, is
fit for treason, and all those other things afterwards above
mentioned. With what exceeding beauty is the passage
invested
,
by this integration!
Again: It is well settled among Latin scholars, that the
word Lucus, a gloomy grove, derives its name,
a non
lucendo
;
that
is to say, it is called a bright and cheerful region,
because it is black and dark as Erebus. What light is thrown,
by this example, upon the obscurity of that beautiful, but
much abused line,
My wound is great because it is so small?
Nothing could be more quaintly, yet more naturally
conceived
.
By the same rationale, my reverend Hellenian professor
derived the word
plough
from the Greek verb
to burn
because we do not put fiery horses to the aforesaid
agricultural
chariot.
But instead of multiplying minor instances, to magnify the
excellence of our studies, let me call you to the contemplation
of one great example, which will afford us all the argument
and illustration we can desire. Listen and you shall be
edified
by the discussion of a much agitated verse of Shakspeare,
a compilation of the various readings, and a criticism, modest
and conclusive, upon them all. It is no more than justice to
that respectable dramatist, that this matter should be settled.
It shall be settled now; and I invoke the shades of Theobald
and Dr. Johnson, whom I think I see in the midst of you, to
bear with me to the end, and then pronounce if my success be
not complete.
It is well known, that never was bard so favored by
posterity
,
in quantity and variety of commentators and expositors,
as he of Stratford. The mass of confusion and obscurity
thrown upon his plays, by ignorant editors, and by finical,
capricious actors, rendered them, for a long time, of little
repute
.
At last, however, Etymology came to give the
deerstealer
justice. And when he had lived his little day, the
million assumed the prerogative of literary popes, and issued
bulls
for his apotheosis. Then began the worship, and then
flourished the contest, who should best understand and most
admire. Critic succeeded critic, buffeting and cuffing
each other, as says the erudite Mr. Seward, each succeeding
one accusing his predecessor of stupidity and absurdity. All,
however, concurred in this one sentimentthat the author
upon whom they commented could have written nothing but
sense. Of the immortal bard none dared say,
aliquando
bonus dormitat Homerus
. Adopting their understood and
universally conceded premises, we will join these lovers of
darkness rather than of light, and proceed to the contemplation
of our text. It may be found in Othello, act fifth, scene
second
.
It is part of the soliloquy of the Moor, after he has
entered
the bed-chamber, and is commonly read,
Put out the light, and then put out the light.
This is the reading adhered to by Malone, who refers the
first light to the candle which the Moor holds in his hand,
and the last to Desdemona's life. All this, in his opinion, is
spoken in a calm, matter-of-course style. I will first put out
the candle, and then I'll kill my wife.
Warburton thinks, that more emphasis should be laid upon
the latter part of the line, and he accordingly puts a dash after
the word then, leaving it thus
Put out the light, and thenput out the light.
But here a difficulty arises. How shall the last light be
pointed? By a period, a mark of interrogation, or of
exclamation
?
Put out the light.Put out the light!or
Put out the light? All these lections have their respective
advocates; but as I shall reject them all, I will not at present
scan their merits. Let me merely remark that Mr. Hewlett,
the celebrated Ethiopian buskin-stretcher, goes the period
entirely. He puts a dash after then, leaving time to Othello
to make up his mind about what he will do; and after being
buried in a brownqr. blackstudy, and thrumming on his
thorax for some fifteen minutes, he suddenly catches at the
just born idea, which is almost made visible by his demoniac
leap to grasp itthen pulls a suitable quantity of wool out of
his head, and with a Kean-flashing eye exclaims, Put out
the light!
Professor McClearer, of the Dublin university, county
Leinster
,
is quite confident that the last light refer's to
Desdemona's
eyes; and he therefore proposes to throw light upon
the subject, by taking away one light, and substituting
sight. And, in truth, even Fieldingwhose lucubrations,
hereupon, are
e profundis
vehemently swears, that when on
his journey in the other world, he heard some literary ghost
insist to Shakespeare himself, that the line ought to run,
Put out, &c.thy eyes.
To me, however, this appears but the turning of light into
darkness, so incomprehensible is the insinuation, that even a
Turk might imagine a revenge so exquisitely Blackhawkical.
Still, it is but fair to admit, that some little color is given to
the barbarism, by the assimilated phraseology of Publius Maro,
in discoursing of the expelled vision of the one-eyed pastoral
giant, who ate up the friends of Ulysses
Monstrum horrendum, informe, ingens,
cui lumen ademptum
The horrible, great monster, whose light was taken away, or
put out. But I cannot, nevertheless, admit that the
exopthalmation
of Polyphemus, which was certainly appropriate, and
exceedingly poetical, in its place, can justify the bad taste of
making a soldier, and a general, too, put out the two fair eyes
of a christian lady.
That learned and ingenious critic, Lampas Lampados, in
the one hundred and forty-fifth chapter of his treatise of this
line, comes to the conclusion, that the second light refers
to the same object as the first; and the latter part of the line
is nothing but a natural repetition of the earnest and
determined
resolution; Othello meaning, by the word light in
both clauses, the holy man who married him; against
whom, says he, on that accounte he justlie entertaineth a
feelinge of revenge and bitternesse, for that he was the
architecte
of all his miserie. And this dogmatist very cunningly
supports his opinion, by an allusion to the torch which Hymen
is supposed to holda light ever bright and ever burning
insisting that the light itself is taken, by metonymy, for the
man who holds it. And this suggestion, he proceeds, is
set arounde and fortified by the contexte.
If I quench thee, thou `flaming
minister
,' or thou
ill-starred
parsonne, which shall presentlie burne, as he might haue
sayd. Whence it appeareth, that the succeeding lines, in the
vulgate, are but the player's trashe and bombaste. Doe not
men commonlie call a minister, a light, a fire, a light upon
the house-tops, a light to kindle and consume the peccant and
errant humours of moral morbositie, a lamp, a watch-tower, a
pharos, or light-house, to illumine the pathe of his besotted
congregation? Thus then, it seemeth to me: Othello saith,
`Put out the light,' or `quench the minister;' evidentlie
meaning
to drown him in a horse-ponde at some convenient season.
Then breakinge off suddenlie, he approacheth the bed-side,
when ensueth the final conversation with Desdemona, which
endeth with the Moor's passion and her takinge off.
Sac-Speare, or talking Jim, an eleve of Governor Cass, and
secretary of the Columbia-river academy, in a late
contribution
to the Menomine Quarterly, elaborately reviews the
writings
of Lampados, and treats this particular subject with much
and quite original perspicacity. He attributes great honor to
his author, and agrees with him, but in the respect only that
he considers that the last light refers to the ceremonial of the
nuptials. We give light credence, says he, to the
presumption
that our seraphic ancestor ever wrote such words,
meaning simply and tamely thereby to repeat the same idea.
The swan does not so sing. The governor of all Cyprus did
not so think. Mystery, not simplicity, is the fountain of the
sublime. The bard has here availed himself of that excellent
provision of his king's English, which compels a single word
to stand godfather for many ideas. We doubt not that he
forsaw
the anxious interest and distress of posterity to know the
truth of the matter, and that this line gave him more
satisfaction
than any he ever wrote. Under the arrangement of
this writer, the interpretation of the perplexity would be, put
out, or get rid of the light of Hymen's torch, or the old
friar, and then I can get rid of the marriage itself
i. e.
remove
all evidence, and who shall say that I am married to
her? To illustrate and enforce this new application of
light, the reviewer refers to a similar figure in Ovid's Met
amorphoses,
[16]
[16]
Book 1, line 484.
where the Sulmonian speaks of Diana's refusal
of Apollo's hand;
Ille velut crimen
tadas
exosa
jugales
.
Here is certainly a singular coincidence of thought, and
the secretary may be correct; at all events, he makes a most
respectable show of argument.
The descent of Sac-speare from the family of the poet of Stratford,
is now too well established to admit of a doubt. The editor of the
National
Gazette has satisfactorily shown, in his Parakalummata
Hamerikana
,
that Shakspeare's youngerb rother,who was enamored of the same
fair eyes, which drew from Will his sweetest sonnet,sick with
disappointment
,
and disgusted with the world, accompanied a band of
Moravian
missionaries on their pious pilgrimage to Kamschatka. Thence
travelling on foot, to the northeasternmost point of Asia, he crossed
Behring's
straits in an Indian canoe, and followed the lakes southward,
until
he fell in with a hunting party of the St. Regis Indians. Being lean,
meagre and apostrophical in his appearance, they readily adopted him as
their prophet; and his half-blood descendants enjoyed that dignity for
many years. The subject of the present note was taken prisoner in one
of the border skirmishes during the late war, and his blood and bearing
soon found for him a Mcenas.
Walsh Par.
Ham. p.
384.
But what says the Italian monk, Claraluce, a contemporary
of Lampados? He strikes out the whole of the soliloquy
after the sixth line, yet she must die, &c., and is positive that
put out the light is only a direction to the stage-manager,
and that it was originally inserted in the margin. And this,
for the reason that a sudden darkness ought to come over the
stage, when any terrible deed is about being enacted by such
a murderous villain as Othello. And he cites,
characteristically
enough, the authority of Job xviii. 5, Yea, the light of
the wicked shall be put out; the spark of his fire shall not
burn.
Another writer, with equal boldness, agrees to the
nullification
of the concluding part of the soliloquy; but thinks that
put out, &c., was part of an old snatch which Othello
began
to sing, to keep his spirits up, and induce a feeling of
composure and indifference, during the commission of his
horrid crime; just as a soldier drinks brandy and gunpowder,
upon the eve of his engagement in battle. And he conjures
up, from the purgatory of deceased and forgotten ballads, this
verse, the last remnant of a precious combination of
sentiment
and simplicity:
Then out spoke Will, that cunning wighte,
Looking all tenderlie,
Economie is a virtue, Sal,
We do not need to see;
For if lovers can say all they would i'th' darke,
It were sinful to waste a whole candle to sparke,
And soe put out the lighte.
Put out, &c.
Put out, &c.
Come let's put out the lighte.
It must be confessed, that all these readings are enforced
by such cogent argument, that it is difficult to choose between
them; for any one of them, separately considered, appears
incontrovertible
.
But after a thorough investigation of the
subject
,
I am convinced that none of them have half so good a
claim to confidence, as a reading of my own, which I shall
presently propound. First, it is my duty, as a faithful
reviewer
,
to enumerate some inferior readings, which, although
not commanding much respect, are entitled to a
recapitulation
.
Put out, &c.and then pull out my wife.
Put outand then pull out my knife.
Put outand thenbut if you bite.
Put outand then to my delight.
Put out this light, and then put out that light.
This is the reading of Mr. Claudius Lucerne, an eminent
literary
tallow chandler, who thinks Othello must have had
six-to-the-pound
in each hand.
Put out the light, and then pull down the wall.
This, as one might readily suppose, is the proposed version
of a matter-of-fact man, like Cobbett. He points, with all
the air of triumph of a discoverer of the truth, to Cynthio's
novels, whence the plot of the play is taken; and where the
story runs, that the Moor killed his spouse, by pulling down
upon her bed, a decayed part of the wall, hoping, the
craven
!
that the coroner's jury would bring in a verdict of
Death by the prolapsion of lath and plaster.
Butter my eyes, but I'll put out the light.
Jam satis
. Since there are so many plausible versions, I
am verecund of the pronunciation of a positive judgment in the
matter. But, as no man should hide the light of his reason
under a bushel, but bring it, even if a farthing candle, to the
illumination, I will break through the thick array of my
modesty, and unfold the only true, genuine and original
reading
,
such as Shakspeare wrote it, and such as Etymos Logos
revealed it to me.
Put out the light, and thenput! into bed.
I approve this arrangement, firstly, because it is most
consonant
with nature. This is sometimes a good rule to go by,
in the settlement of obscure and disputed passages, when the
resolution so made is palpable. [I followed it lately, in one
instance, myself, in translating sculapius, for the college
in Barclay steet.] And what can be more natural and
reasonable
,
in a man worn out with the toils of the day, than to
go to his bed chamber, put out his candle, and repose himself
in the arms of nature's sweet restorer? I never can admit
that Shakspeare intended to make the Moor guilty of so
blood-thirsty
a design, as the vulgate imputes to him; because it
would have been unnatural, and at war with the
all-prevailing
and irresistible organ of go-to-bediviness.
Vol. II.14
Secondly. In answer to the objection that this reading
is inconsistent with the spirit of the play, and the
preconceived
intentions of Othello, it is sufficient to remark, that such
cavils are opposed to the spirit of free inquiry, and that it is
the beauty of this particular line, and not the probability or
consistency of the whole plot, that we are considering;
and that this rule has been the constant rudder of judgment
of all commentators, from the time whereof the memory of
man runneth not to the contrary.
Thirdly and lastly. By a very simple course of
explanation
,
it may be shown that the corrupted reading in common
acceptation, is but a finical version of what Shakspeare wrote.
The alteration of the original text was made by the players
for the sake of euphony, and the swell of figurative
language
;
and it consists in nothing more than the substitution
of out the light for into bed. The difficulty is then
removed
,
the problem is resolved. Into bed means nothing
more or less than out, or out of the light; for what is
is plainer than that when a man gets into bed, and covers
his head over, he is in the dark? Or out the light may
be used by a sort of figure of anticipation, for into bed, since
it was a well known custom among the people in Cyprus
a custom from which William the Conqueror took his idea of
the curfew regulationto extinguish their candles before the
submitting themselves to Morphean influences. Again; the
prepositions out and into were promiscuously used for
each other, by all the respectable writers of the Elizabethean
age. Thus, Cyprian, the younger, in describing the
martyrdom
and sufferings of St. Trollopea, with beautiful pathos
utters those now almost household words, out of the
frying-pan
into the fire. And an acquaintance with etymology will
discover that they are frequently interchanged, to avoid
tautology
.
The word bed may perhaps be called the light,
from the lightness of the feathers of which it is composed.
The only difficulty, then remaining undisposed of, is that
which arises from the construction of the word put. This
I take to be simply, a particle, which here signifies ease,
self-complacency, good nature,
rub-your-hands-togetheriveness
,as
Gall and Spurzheim call it, affability and
amativeness
;
and I account it to be a word of exceeding pith, point
and expression, exclusive and authentic, and most happily
introduced on this occasion. Is this fancy, or is it fact?
Is it not clear as light itself?
How far a little candle sheds its light!
So shine true readings through a misty world.
What, then, remains for me, but to call for your special
plaudits, and remove the light of my countenance? Nothing,
but a few peroratorical comments by way of reflection on
the subject.
NEWSPAPERS.
Quid novi?
What's the news?
Demosthenes
lectured
his acres-spread congregation, once for asking this
question, when Philip of Macedon was on their boundary
line, without opposition, and his countrymen were without
means of defence. H
said he,
?
Is there no Demosthenes in Columbia? Are the orators
voiceless?or corrupt all? Heartless! Is it possible that
we can content ourselves by running about and asking what
is the news? are we readers only, and not doers? Do
we lie in bed and comfortably read, in print, how splendidly
our brother fell, cut with a Floridian tomahawk? Do we
prefer
to read
the account of the atrocities perpetrated by
her Majesty's Most particular Lieutenant Governor of ALL the
Canadas on the suffering chickens of Bill Jones' farm? Do
we choose to sleep and dream, upon the authority of the
printer-devil-children of Dr. Faustus, of the invasion of the
Spaniard and the Camanche at the South-westof the
stealthy
insinuation of the Russ at Columbia River,or the
skulking policy of negotiation of our own selves with
regard
to the boundary line of Maine!
Yes. Yes. Yes.
Who the devil are you! Jack, my dear boy, I'm glad to
see you. You came in quiet, then, and looked over my
shoulderha?
Those are my precise sentiments.
The
I say that we, the people of the United States of America,
are a set of cowards and sneaks.
Moderate, Jack, moderate.
I insist that there is not a spark of soul or pluck left in
the republic. People have got quicksilver running through
their veins instead of blood. I swear
Don't swear, Jack. What do you lay it to?
Lay it to? I lay the whole at the door of the
newspapers
.
Why so, my dear fellow, why so?
Now, said Jack, I shall, like enough, make some
rough and harsh remarks, which, knowing as I do your
attachment
to the Pressand the Press-gang is a big power,
and always stamps the man killing the lionreasons in the
money drawer;
Jack, none of your gammon. Take your finger off your
nose
I say, then, I mean there is not a paper in this
country
whose columns may not be bought. They belong to,
are supported by, and paid for by
Parties
. They are merely
hired agents, like the Brummagem `travellers' dressed up in
clean shirts, and dispatched abroad for customers
for
particular
houses, all of them taking pains to avoid the general good.
They would sacrifice their country to benefit their own
selfish
ambition. Each pretends that he is the man, and that
wisdom will die with his party.
But, Jack, what parties? You surely don't include the
religious papers. Think of the `Deserver.'
Deserver! Why, do you suppose I am capable of
believing
that the Editor of that ably conducted Presbyterian
oracle would record the dying faith and pious decadence from
earth, and ascent to Heaven of a Catholic Priest?
But then take the `Verity Teller,' Jack. What
objections
,
if you are a subject of the Pope, have you to that?
None; none, my friend, but upon the score of its
being a party paper. The Deserver says that their
Deserving
party
will go to Heaven. The Verity Teller tells
them that they lie, and that they'll go to Hell. The
different
members of the crafts meet in the day time, and buy
and sell, and cheat each other, and one goes home at night
and prays for the crushation of Antichrist, and the other goes
to an
earthly
`Father,' and `confesses' that he hath had
dealings
with an Heretic. Both having absolved themselves, by
praying God's curses on each other, they meet again next day,
and trade and sin until the hour of prayer and confession.
14*
Jack, are you sincere in this?
Sincere? Look at their files. Nothing but fire, shot,
bang, blast, attack, storm, cut, slash, and the devil. Hughes
and Breckenridge, Christian and Appollyon all over. But
this isn't to the point. What I meant to say was, that with
all their pious zeal, I can buy both those papers. I can
make the `Deserver' Catholic, and the `Verity Teller'
Presbyterian
to-morrow.
You're a fool.
That's what was said to Columbus and Ben Franklin.
Havn't you lived long enough in this world to learn that
people now-a-days profess principles for money's sake? Are
the editors of either of those papers apostles, living on their
own hooks
Jack, you're blasphemous.
God forbid! I meant nothing about those glorious
Heaven-appointed
,
being fishermenwho worked for love merely,
but intended merely to ask
does anybody preach, teach, write,
or speak in these modern of times without being paid for the
service?
Is not talent a thing to be bought, and wisdom a
commodity in the market? Is it public good that induces
a poor scholar to set up a paper?to stake his all upon a
fount of types? Or is it not the hope of gain, or at least
a livelihood? What writer throws the bread of his own
baking upon the waters of the ocean, trusting, on a falso
credit hope, that it will come back to him buttered, with a
fish fast hold of it?
Stop; stop; you impetuous cynic. I say yes; yes; yes.
It
is
public good that has made many `a poor scholar' write,
and many a benevolent man-angel speak. Think of the
quaker preachers! They get no pay.
None but world applause. Dr. Cox thinks their drafts
on heaven will all be dishonored.
Jack, you are the most incorrigibleChange the
subject
change
the subjectsome other line of newsstages.
Be it so.
What do you think of the magazines?
Most decidedly all for party and profit. Mere
meadow-hens
,
looking out for their families. Picking up is their
vocation. How gloriously they can persuade an ambitious
graduate that it will be to his eternal happiness to be in
their month, like a soft shelled crab!
But, Jack, they must live.
Truly so. But not honorably, nor morally at other men's
expenses. Do they ever hand the plate in the church, to
the pews where the
poor communicants sit?
But the magazine publishers pay their correspondents, don't
they?I don't mean out of mere charity.
When a contributor gets his name `
up
' they do. Let a
writer get
established
and he can write any manner of
nonsense
,
and the discriminating public will cry `beautiful!' and
the proprietors of the magazine will look the respectfully
amiable, and contribute back. But let a man be unknown,
no matter how good his article, and he has the solitary
satisfaction
of seeing himself
in print
.
Well, they are honestimpartial, and free from `Party,'
are they not?
Are you so innocent as to ask that question? Why, one
is mercantile, another law, another mechanical, another
philosophical
,
another moral, another military, another political,
another religious, another anti-masonic, another abolition,
another
Hold up, Jack. Do you mean to say that these all
represent
different parties?
Most distinctly. They all belong to a particular interest.
An independent article in any one of them, acknowledging
the hope of salvation of another, would effectually damn the
bold admitter. The patrons would send in an immediate
discontinuance
.
Why, our friend Harrywho writes, you
know, for several of them,has to select his subject,
accommodate
his sentiments, study his style, and pick his words.
At seven P. M. he will write a sermon for `the Watchman
on the Wall,'at nine `a few remarks on snakes' for the
`Philosophical Observer,'at ten `the last moments of Jane
Shore' for the `Ladies' Maga,'at eleven `Abolition on the
Railroad of Success for `Garrison's Glory,' and then go to
bed like a good carpenter after his day's work.
But, dear Jack, how does this hurt the country? How
can you say that our liberties or virtue are endangered, or the
happiness of the republican family prejudiced by the conflicts
of opinion or taste? Ought we not to have parties to balance
the
Now, that is as silly a proposition as the nursery
ballad
of
`Jack Sprat could eat no fat,
His wife could eat no lean;
And so it was, betwixt them both
They licked the platter clean.'
Do you seriously believe that it is necessary to have `parties'
in the country to save our glorious Constitution? And do
they not keep the country in a constant ferment, setting son
against father, and neighbor against neighbor?
Jack, there must be parties. Eternal watchfulness
Gammon, gammon! You put me in mind of the daily
press.
Well, what of that?
That's what I began on;the vilest, truckling
sycophantic
,
hypocritical, money-begging, proud-swaggering,
empty-headed
,
encyclopedia-thieves
Some exceptions, Jack?
Few, few. They all boast of their exclusive virtue, and
damn their neighbors.
The `Dispatch and Asker' is a good paper?
Meat-axe all over. When I take it up I consider
myself
entering a butcher's knife-shop. Cut, cut, strike, cut, for
our party, is the cry of the `
leader
.' There is not an honest
man in the world but belongs to us. `Extreminate the
rascals
,
and then we'll have a new fight among ourselves,' is all
the talk, and all the patriotism.
What have you to say against the quiet `Columbian?'
Quiet? quiet! Yes, how quietly it honored the dead
wife of General Jackson, for party's sake. A woman
dead!
I won't say a word to you on that head, Jack. I've no
doubt it's sorry for it. Party spirit
Yes, that's the very thing I am telling you of. It was
the same print that came out with a recommendation to every
man to reject his son, every mother to turn her daughter out
of doors, every sweet girl to dismiss her lover, every brother
to strike his brother, every friend to deny his friend, who did
not belong to
his
or her party.
That's rather on the horrid, Jack. What have you got
against the `Evening Rail?'
Party all over. Party, `us,' `we' and public printing.
There is powerful writing there, and some truth, but it is
often askew. The everlasting looking out for `the greatest
good of the greatest number,' leads the editor too much to
magnify Fly Market loafers into the conservators of the
country
,
and minify decent men into bloodsuckers. The best of
the instructive `leaders' are full of cool, deliberate, party
heat. They are paid for.
Well, you are a queer one. Whom will you except?
What do you say to the `Animal Magnetism Advertiser?'
No let up. The bitterest partisanmethodistical and
solemn its partizanship; It would take the Canadas for itself,
by artifice, but write against the true soldiers of the Republic
entering them by bravery.
What against the `Quicksent?'
A mere made thing, baked out of the ashes of two or
three dead prints. It knows barely enough to help to distract
the public comfort by joining in the chorus of `Ruin,' which
the Dispatch leads the air to.
Journal of Merchandize?
There's an exception. I believe that paper is pure. It
is good, at all events, and it tells the story on both sides. If
you have acid in one column, you have soda in the next.
You may mix up Amos Kendall and Daniel Webster, and
have a right good drink.
What do you think of the penny papers?
Some are strong; almost all good; but
their
excellence
arise from their freedom from party thrall. Where they
do
owe
allegiance, they are slaves, and can talk no freer
language
than an English clodhopper. But I am interrupting
you. I only called in to say how d'ye do. What the deuce
was you going to write when I came in?
I can't say, Jack, I forget. You put me out. It was
something about newspapersI was going to praise them,
but you have put a twist into my pen, and belied the craft.
I shall have to do the thing over. The liberty of the press,
the glorious freedom of thought, the
I see the fit is on you yet. Good bye.
Good bye, Jack. But don't be in a hurry. Hold on half
a minute. What do you think of `the Moon?'
It's like all moonsit has its changes. It has its
phases
.
It sometimes runs high, and sometimes runs low. It
professes great morality, talks windy solemnity in its
editorials
,
as though it was learned and serious upon every subject
Newton to-day, Beethoven yesterday, Napoleon to-morrow,
Channing next day, Recorder Riker the day following.
Successive
sermons stamp its editorial columns. But look at its
advertising partcan you find anything more filthy than the
constant notices about `no mercury'`French specific'`no
quackery'`to the ladies,' and so on? I cannot speak the
infamy of the accumulated titles. `Rapes,' `robberies,' `
murders
,'
`coroner's inquests,' and all sorts of police reports, of
the most disgusting detail.
You are pretty much of my sentiments.
I see that you and I agree that all papers belong to
some clique or party. Now, I say that the Moon is a party
paper. It belongs to the no-party-party, and to that class of
people who need secret quack medicines, and lose dogs and
cows, and who like advertisements of drinking-shops, and
can tolerate lectures on temperance. But it will never hurt
the country as the partisan warriors do, and there is really
much talent thrown away upon its leaders. But its columns,
instead of teaching American boys the pride of National
Honor, more effectually call their young eyes to the `Quid
novi' of the Police office and the Five Points.
Why, Jack, you beat all men I ever heard talk. Pray
how does `the Herald' stand in your estimation?
I don't know the coin, my friend. But to return to
general
observations. It is safer than to particularize. The
newsspaper
press throughout the whole Union is by its own
confession
,
and by its mutual proofs against each other, the mere organ
of ambition, selfishness, and humbug. They usurp, it is true,
the places of the ancient orators, and dictate morals and
patriotism to the country. But you do not hear Cicero;
you recognise not the pure flame of Grecian boldness, that
threw itself into the mob, and storm-like, dashed out the fire of
plebeian madness. The difference between our ditors eand
ancient orators is something like that between garden
fireworks
and Heaven's lightning. Would any of the old-times
voice-strikers for liberty have ended his speech with a notice
that Jacobus Corvus
had
a farm for sale at 12 M. at the
capitolterms easy?'wouldn't he have fallen at the feet of
Pompey's statue? or been torn to pieces? Now look at the
successors of the orators! Read their affectation first, and
then look at their proof. We call the particular attention
of our readers to the sale of the splendid building lots at
Frogpond
,
advertised to be sold this day at 12 M., by blinker and
Book, auctioneers. For the same hour you seeWe must
not forego the opportunity to remind our friends! that the
sale of Colonel Bankem's delightfully situated building lots
on Prospect Hill comes off to-day at 12 M. NextIt is
expected that Mr. Preston will address his fellow citizens at
12 M. this day, from the steps of the Astor House. No true
friend of the country should be absent. Citizens who have
got them, are requested to appear in white pantaloons, on
horseback. NextOur readers will bear in mind that
the sale of all the imported blood stock of Creature Comfort,
Esq., is to take place to-day at 12 M., at the Exchange.
The horses will make a fine stud. No true lover of his
country
should be absent. ThenRemember! 12 is the time
Mr. Ascent starts his balloon from Castle Garden. That
invaluable
citizen, Mr. Marsh, the proprietor, has provided
extensive
accommodations, and no friend of industrious
enterprise
should be wanting, for any consideration. Let no one be
absent.
This is a specimen of editorials. Call you it honest?
Independent? Free from party falsehoods and gull-traps?
Are they not all paid for? Who cracked up the miserable
speculations in town lots and wilderness tracts, in the wretched
speculation times, but the newspaper editors? How many
a trusting fool was gulled by the editorial lie of `
We take
pleasure to call the attention of our readers,' &c.?
Which
daily theatre puff shall we now-a-days, out of the six or eight,
believe?
Jack! Jack! you'll get into the papers yourself. They'll
put you in for high treason!
Damn 'em, let 'em do it, and I'll give them more truth.
They're ruining the country. The police ought to stop them.
The Chancellor ought to issue an injunction against them.
They all go against Vice, but they teach its existence, so
that they may have a chance to abuse it, and clarion their
own health, while they pamper, or poison, or create subjects
for new articles. There is such a thing in criminal law as
`
crimen non nominandum;
'but these collectors of rottenness,
paste, as it were, the name upon their forehead, and stand
in the street for curious, innocent purchasersperhaps
virgins
!
If things are not sufficiently `rank and gross in
nature
,
they or their reporterhorrid office! Rag-picker!
Street-sweeper! Kennel-cleaner!must pepper more filth
of prurient imagination into it
Hallo! Hallo! Jack!
Vol. II.15
Where are the fathers of the city who tolerate such
news
papers?Here, take up a number of one of them by chance;
it is the number for August, 13th, 1840. First is a puff of
themselves, and their success. Next a part encyclopedia
and part magazine copied sermon set up as `original matter,'
on the much vexed question whether a countryman ought to
be allowed to charge more than sixpence a-piece for his
chickens now, in consideration of the state of the currency.
Then a sprinkling of more gammon. Thenthe cream of
the paper`Fatal accident'`State prison'`Shall not be
surprised if we before long hear of some act of desperation'
alias
, kill your sentinels, and come to the citythen
`Inquest'on afallen woman`Indians'`Shocking
suicide'
Jack, don't go too far.
My friend I've not gone far enough. If you want
evidence
of the licentiousness and degradation of the press, look
at the police reports in that same paper`Stealing a shawl
a female'`Stealing dressesMaria Stone'`Stealing
money and a watchsome person.' But look at the two
following
,
entitled `Disorderly house,' and `Scenes in Anthony
street!'Great God! are we not bad enough by nature, but
that we need the devil to teach us through the printing-press
how to sin, where to sin, and how many others sin?
Well, what would you have? What the dickens do you
want? Would you go back to old John Lang's time, who
wouldn't let more than half a little finger of editorial go into
the Gazette, because it didn't look like business?
I would. A newspaper is not a place to inculcate
general
literature and morals, or to lay down the laws, or herald
vice. We have books enough, holding the fountain where
we can bend and drink for ourselves wisdom and virtue.
Neither is it a proper grammar of politics. When it becomes
a debator, it is an essayist, bought to write up an opinion,
instead of a
news
paper. Old Lang was right. In place of
reading the bought opinions of party hirelings, who would
write on the other side for sixpence more to-morrow, let men go
home and study the Constitution, and the early history and
splendid debates of their old Congresses and Conventions.
From them they can imbibe an honest and fervent draught
of the freest spirit of freedom, the holiest mounting-foam of
liberty, truth untrammelled, glory
In excelsis
, Jack, keep down lower, or I shall lose sight
of you. You mean to say a man may mis-spend his time in
reading newspapers?
I do. If he reads them all, and pays attention to
one-tenth
of the saints' days, he'll have no time for the duties
of personal life, contract wrong ideas, hurt his health, and
crack his brains. A constant reader of newspapers, instead
of wholesome authority, that speaks without party influence,
is like an idiot boy who would plunge into a green
mantling
cow-pool, in preference to bathing in the ocean.
Jack, you're right. I'll put your sentiments down. I don't
wonder that Cooper is compelled to sue them.
Nor I. Farewell once more.
Good bye.
CATACOUSTICS.
The sensation which we perceive through the organ of hearing is called
sound, such as the sound of a human voice, the sound of a bell, &c. The
science which treats of sound in general is called Acoustics,from
the Greek word for hearing,or phonics,from the Greek word which
means voice, or sound.And most of the other terms which are used in
treating of sound, are derived from the above-mentioned words; such as
Diacoustics,
Catacoustics
, &c.
That
is the philosophy with which Cavello commences his
Chapter IX., Part II., entitledof Sound, or of Acoustics.
I have been led by reflection upon an intercepted letter,
lately embodied in the Spirit, written by some foreign
trollop, touching The cries of New York, to look a little
further into the matter than that shrewd but doubtful specimen
of English ladyship had means or ability to snoop. I am glad
I have done so, for I have found at least one American
peculiarity
that must be defended from foreign abuse. Crlrs
Hook, the Five Points, and all those interesting situations in
the suburbs, which have been planted with innocent-looking
village churches,all spire and no body,put up on ragged
sticks on barren fields marked out with a sign post, and
glorified
with the titles of Avenues A, B, C, and
Promise
Place, and After date Square, and Cashier Row,
and Texas Stroll, and such like;gemmed with a
grog-shop
,
and occasionally honored with a post-office!
Post-Master
save the remark!by some enterprising speculator
upon the capital of his glib and queer tongue;and all the
plausible enterprise of us Yankees to take in friends and
fools with solemn assurances of the silver rivulets that are
always
going to begin
to run from Penobscot to Lake
Ponchartrain
;
and all the other tricks and cheateries of the
Enterprise
part of my people, and all the vulgar vices which
foreign debasement has brought here;these I give and
yield in tribute to any trollop who will aspire to criticism,
and create for herself a character, by abusing them. These
things I surrender. Let deformity illustrate vice. Let
vulgarity
vomit out the proof of its associations.
But no trollop must abuse the Cats of my native city, either
by direct libel or by sarcastic inuendo. The tiger spirit
possesses
me on this subject, and I scream for cats.
I am for
cat-acoustics
, only.I have heard of cock-crowing.
I have read about the early lark at matin dawn, striking his
head against the top of the cage, and of the robin's silver
whistle, playing upon wires, and the wren's shrill joyfulness,
uplifted from some straggling smoke-dried poplar, and of many
other of the varieties of the creaking, piercing, fifery
performances
of our most cherished city of
Neo Eboracensis
. I
have heard a band of music. I went to a
Roar
-atorio,or
Oratorio as they call it,once, at the Tabernacle. I have
heard a woman sing
Oft in the stilly night
. My next-door
neighbor is a Frenchman who has an educated parrot that
talks like a judge, who decides by instinct before he hears
the argument, and prates and anticipates, and cries his own
praises incessantly,
Pretty Poll! Pretty Poll!
in constant
and earnest reiteration, interrupted only when he stops to
drinkfor he is a marvelous member of the temperance
society
.
I have been to a Methodist Camp Meeting. I have
been high, and have sung myself. Whether I
heard
myself
,
de hoc non
. Probably more
Hoc
than non.
Over the way, and opposite to me, two little infants are
learning
Isle of beauty, fare the well
, from a spinster teacher;
who, when she gets through her instructive department, goes
15*
into the amusing,like farce after tragedy,and screams
una voce poco
, in such a way, that your enraptured
judgment
cries out
fa!
before she has poked her
voce
fully
into you. In fact, I have the advantage of great musical
experience
,
even from the booming thunder of a cannon, down
to the maiden squeal of a mouse. I am a musician. I affect
not Hayden. I love not Handel. They have sublimity, but
no dramatic action in their stately glories. They march in
column of attack. Where they strike, they do terrible
execution
,
but they preserve too close a column.
To keep up the military phraseology, they don't
display
and
turn their enemy's flanks
. They break down the walls of
your ears, and enter conquerors, but don't cut you up and smash
you. They achieve a solemn victory, and stop. Then again,
Bishop, and all that class of Missnancyists are whining babies.
They are competent to set Barbauld's poems, or Tom Moore
Little's Hymns, down into some select public-garden
minstrelsy
,
but they will never grow up into the maturity of
musicians
.
Other people I have heard, and whose music I know,
and upon whom I set a proper value; but of all the
quadrupedal
,
feathery, or two-footed creation, man or inhuman,
woman
or fallen , next after paying a proper reverence to
the living action of Von Weber's engravings, stamped by the
moonlight from the reflection of the trees and rough ravines of
the Hartz mountains, by his own Daguerreotype, I go for the
Mew-sic
of
Felis
I am for
Cat-acoustics
.
Here is my gauntlet. Take it up who dare. Answer my
cat-echism.
Music is a running thrill that rushes over you with a
sensation
of almost choaking deliciousness; like a sudden
ocean-wave
on a smooth gravelly beach; isn't it? Its changes are
like the smiles and frowns of a good girltwenty-five years
old;or the quick alternations of the politics of the spirits of
the air, who, one moment, vote for Cloud, and next,
Lightning
,
and next, Rain, and then, Blue Sky; ar'n't they?
Music
is change, race, flight, fight, mixed love and anger, the
tear of sentiment, the gush of passionate outbreak, and
several
other things; is'nt it? Is there any music in dum,
dum, dum, dum, dum, dum? Apollo forbid! Such a
performance
would be worse than a silent Quaker meeting, or a
Scotch bagpipe. But put
d
on the top of the house, where
he can have
the air
, and
u
not
you
, my dearin the front
bed-chamber in the second story, and
m
in the cellar, and
then let the representatives of sound run up and down. M
will bring with him blasts from Hell, and D drop into
the composition, airs from Heaven, while U will do the
earthly part of the business, and the appoggiature ladder will
multiply its rungs, and be peopled with strange but sweet
voices borne to you upon the velocipede above referred to,
aud so you'll go to glory. Now what musical instrument
made of tongue, teeth, thorax, or wire and ivory, can boast a
scale of notes, from the profound of mad rage to the exhausted
argute of pathos equal to the shrill delight of the feline gamut?
I drink as a garden drinks dew, the native melodies of a cat.
A well-voiced Tom-cat is your true musician of nature. He
is Diana's commissioned serenader. History books say that
the wild or mountain-cat is borne in coats-of-arms as the
emblem of liberty, vigilence, and forecast. Our city cat has
all these honors with the addition of a classical education,
cultivated
taste, and knowledge of the world. Your peasantry
mountain-ridger does very well in the way of his vocation.
He screams out fourth fiddle with very good effect. But it
takes one of our cultivated urban Toms to fife, fiddle, bassoon,
and hurdy-gurdy all together.
The Romans gave their domestic tigers three names; to
wit, Felis, Catus, and Catulus. These were probably,
different
tribes, using different styles of melody. Felis was
the pre
furred
name, however, and lapped the most plentiful
milk of favor. A good mouser was called Muricida. But
to give the
cat
alogue of names might put me in the same
cat
egory with a prosing peasant. That
cat
astrophe I beg leave
to avoid, and so go on with my story. Permit me that
felis
ity.
Some people like the voice of a dog. Not I.
The dog bays the moon, and howls out sickness, thirst, and
madness, but puss pours out wild and melancholy love-notes
in tender, healthful adagio and maestoso. Does he succeed
in calling his ladye-love to the old trysting-place so many a
night hallowed by fierce and gentle dalliance;what
soul-piercing
epithalamics fill with poetic fury the ear of the
sentimental
watchman, snoozing hard by! How many a
feverish
tongue in the chosen happy neigborhood swears out in
rapture at the paradisical concert. The Garcia never sung
as a cat can sing.
Blessed air! Cavallo says it is the vehicle of sound.
So it is. And what hero can better stride that velocipede
than the voice of a cat?
The mariner's welcome of the word
Catspaw
, comes
upon the cloudy cry of distant land-cats, and his sail and soul
vibrate together with the greatful impulse of the breeze. He
runs to his
cat-heads
, and heaves up his anchor, and
claws
off to the deep rumbling ocean. It is a singular fact that the
word cat is as necessary a term of description in music,
as any particle is to a particular class of words in prose
orthography
.
This is a well-deserved tribute to the musical
genius of that interesting animal. Cat in acoustics is what
pro, con, ad &c., are in grammar. The music of the
rushing torrent of waters at Niagara cannot be described but
as a
cat
-aract. The Paganinies of the world draw their bows
upon
cat
gut. Poets sleep upon
cat
tails to get inspiration. If
three musicians go home drunk of a moonlight night, they are
sure to entertain the town with a cat-ch.
The
courier-avant
critics of the opera, who decide for the
people beforehand, join the orchestra with
cat
calls. The
printer's devils and general loafers
cat
erwaul. Shakspeare's
Twelfth Night was acted in that way on Mrs. Wood's last
night at the Park, when old Hays came in and cried out, like
a true police-officer, in the language of Maria
What a
cat
erwauling do you keep here? If my lady
the Mayorhave not called up her steward, Malvolio,the
captain of the watch,and bid him turn you out of doors,
never trust me.
Cat
skill mountain is full of the lowing of
cat
tle. The
penitentiary
cat
acombs are tragic with the notes of despair.
Every ship is vocal with the cat-o'-nine-tails. Kit is a
small fiddle. Every body can sing that pathetic old
English
ballad entitled Dido and neas, the burden of which
is
Kitty kit
dink-a-Dido. I could go on, but the
illustrations
I have given are sufficient for my
purr
pose.
Catacoustics is defined to be the echo or air-copied
reflection
of the offspring of the sonorous body which utters some
new-born melody. How truly apposite is the name when
applied to our city cats! How plentiful are all the needful
instruments
of reproduction! Let some battle-worn grimalkin
pour out a solitary ditty upon your fence at midnight, and the
adjacent walls of the block will catch up the glorious essence
of sound, and fling it back and about like the orgies of the
most classical wizards. You will dream of Der Freyschutz,
and think you hear a spirit. But if you want to be lapped in
Elysium, listen to a Cat Concert. To get one up, only tell
your cook to leave the dinner remnants on the grass plot,
instead
of handing them, according to law, to the swill-man.
Let it be done on some moonlight night, so that there will be
a chance for help to the effect, from the soaring stretch of
some late-watching she-eagleevery block furnishes a
proper
quotawho sits by her window, pounding her piano
no; forteand goes F in the sixty-sixth ledger line,
sostenato
,
for a quarter of an hour without breathing. That helps
the harmony powerfully. If you can get a man with a hand
organ to grind at your front door while the performance is
going on, and an amateur of foreign airs to saw his guitar
and voice to the native graces over the way, at the same
time, your appointments will be completeyou are happy
very happy.
Such are the
New
York festivals. Is it needful to describe
them? Why do I ask? Who can describe the effect
produced
by the chorus of sixty cats, aided by all the musical
talent of the ward!
Reader thou hast been at such a concert. Thou hast not?
Hence then, thou knowest naught. First, however, give me
a thousand dollars for teaching thee a new pleasure. Pay
me the moneys, invite your cats, and call me a good musical
cat
erer.
P. S. If you can throw in a small boy who sings Methodist
Hymn tunes
dolorotissima voce
, like the howl of a mad dog, it
will put into your conglomerate work, the idea of Death's
head on a tombstone. Put alongside of him a young
gentleman
,
who squeals with his sweetheart, harmonious why-e-a,
why-e-awhew, e, a, a, a, a, a, ah!
a, ah! ah!
a, a,
a,
ah! ah!
a, ah!
aha!
and the cats will be encouraged by the competition. Cry
Fire! and Watch yourself. Pay the money before
specified
to the Spirit, for I have a notion that he's short of
funds to feed his
cat
tle-laborers, and such. This is the end
of the
cat
alogue. Now, dearest
Kate
, I am free, butfor
thee.
THE HON. MISS SAUSSAGE'S
MARRIAGE
.
[Reported expressly
Not
for
The
Wedding
Observer
, but for
The
Spirit of the Times
.]
The
ceremony of the Hon.
Miss Saussage's
marriage
took place on the 10th instant at the chapel of St.
Imitante
.
This distinguished ladywhose descent and
character
are so familiar to the whole Christian Marketing world,
so familiarly known as a distinguished representative of the
Porkine race of nobility, who take their heraldic devices from
the record kept of the
ordines
who went into Noah's ark, and
who are so remarkable for the successful warfare which
they have kept up with the Jews, has actually allowed
herself
to be stuffed into the lips and throat of Prince
Albertross
,
the popular and majestic owner of the splendid sand
mansion, and at least one half a quarter of an acre of
Saline ground, called, known, and designated upon the map as
Coney Island Point.
The officers of the household of the fair bride began to
arrive at Fulton Market, at one quarter before six o'clock,
A. M.looking very sleepy and very hungry. The
Alderman
of the 18th Ward, the Head Justice of the Police Office,
the Lord Chamberlain of the Marine Court, Archbishop Shad,
his Grace the Duke of Mackerel, the Duke of Rigmarole,
his Honor Daniel O'Lobster, the High Constable, Prince
Philorugglesius, Chancellor Blackhawk, Lord
What-a-licking
,
Sir Loin, Sir Beefsteak, Sir Cutlet, Sir Calveshead, the
Lords in Waiting, the Ladies in Waiting, Maids of Honor
made
to see every thing done
Honor
brightBedchamber
women we shall have to send to England to find out what
they were intended forGentlemen-Rushers, Loafers,
Bearon-s
,
Counts, No-ac-counts, and all the rest of the invited
part of heaven-created nobility, assembled at precisely six.
The Ladies of Miss Saussage's suite were summoned by
the Master of the horses that were to drag them, at about
one-quarter past six. We say
about
, because we are in
extreme
doubt in reference to the seconds, although we have
made the most painful exertions to arrive at the precise
moment
.
The Ladies all jumped upon the carts with extreme
grace, amid the enthusiastic plaudits of the assembled
multitude
,
which had now lined the streets, and rendered the
progress
of the carts and their interesting contents difficult, if not
dangerous. Mrs.
O'Blessington
was particularly remarked
for the fulness of her bust, and the liveliness of her action,
and the delicious freedom of the favors which she bowed to
the common people.
At half past six the suit of the happy
Albertross
mounted
their carts under a heavy discharge of two pistols, and the
roll of a bass drum. Notice was immediately afterwards
given to the happy bridegroom, that it was time for him to
begin to get his heart into the proper state of palpitation, and
to prepare for family duty.
The Royal Locofoco Bridegroom immediately quitted the
retiring room of the fish-stall, where he had been feverishly
reposing, and passed through the market in the uniform of a
private militia corporal, with plate and feather. We took
notice, with great pleasure, that he showed his American
contempt for orders, by wearing his pantaloons in great
disorder
, and that his stockings were bound by no
garters
,
He wore the insignia of a First High Priest of the order
of
night-hood
, and the star of the order of
Bosom Comesir
.
The alderman of the 18th Ward was decorated with a stick
mounted with a piece of
real-gilt
. The head Justice appeared
in his usual official robeshaving, out of his modesty and
meekness, long since adopted, and steadfastly held fast to, the
example of culprits whom he has convertedan apparel
consisting
of a great-coat that had been through the hands of
seven pawnbrokers, for improvement, highly embellished with
cuts
and
engravings
, and splendidly furnished with
paint
ings,
both of oil and waterwe think we might safely addgin.
The grand Deputy Constabulator of the Police was dressed in
a gorgeous suit of no
fools cap
tion paper, on which were
beautifully
stamped the sections of the Revised Statutes of the
State of New York relating to
Hush Money
. His Sea-green
Vol. II.16
Highness Archbishop Shad, was simply cladbeing a
Christian
and the head of the Churchin his pontifical scales of
silver
,
his salary being small.The only ornament we noticed
about his immaculate and sinless Glory, was a plain belt of
diamonds
,
which his own apostolic incorruptibility had paid for
out of the process of the pleasant tribute of his tythes, added to
the donations of pious old women, and the tears of small
children
,
whom his eloquence and proud description of the stars in
Heaven had caused to cry. The Duke of Mackerel was
arrayed
in a superb dress of
net
work, brought from
Fish-her-land
,
expressly for this purpose. The Hon. Dan. O'Lobster
appeared in the dress of a water-Field Marshall, red and
black, with claws, each with a penny
passant
,
tongue-armed
and
ling
ued, with teeth azure, a duplinected portrait of
Erin
nys and Cataline being painted upon his patriotic back.
But enough. Time wastes, and we are anxious to give
the first intelligence. We wish to be, as usual in advance of
all the other papers. We have no moment left to tell the
color of the ladies' frocks, and petticoats, and chemisettes;
we can barely say that they all showed their noble blood,
particularly
the butcher's wives, in and out. There was no
mistaking
them for anything but womenrepublican queens
and while it may be said that they do not belong to English
no-a-bility
, we are sure, from the tremendous and exulting
upshoutings of the crowd as they successively made their
appearance, that they are set down in the hearts of all
people who agree with them as individuals of the greatest
Ability
.
The procession was formed at precisely one minute and
a quarter after seven. The prince rode in a wheelbarrow,
drawn by two mules, each led by the head by a New Orleans
negro. It was remarked that as the bridegroom got into the
barrow, he was very pale, and he showed his characteristic
humanity and urbanity by condescendingly asking one of the
negroes if he was sure the mules' ears were on tight. On
imbibing a gin cocktail, brought to him by an equerry, who was
coming from Holt's-hotel-palace with a load of wood, the
Prince seemed to be much relieved, and he sat up straight,
just like any common man. He held the glass in his own
hands, and drank with his own mouth. Nothing seemed to
disturb the happy serenity of his countenance, although we
regret to say that there was a slight tumor on his nose, and
the fading remains of a scratch across his eyebrowboth,
however, trophies of his early piety, and valor in battle.
The procession now moved towards the Fulton Ferry,
preceded
by a squadron of Lynchers. The Directors of that
valuable Ferry, with their natural and praiseworthy spirit of
accomodation, had taken early pains to stop the flood tide
from coming in, and had banked out the river across, from
side to side, by ramparts and bastions of Graham bread
lapis durus
so as to make a splendid crossing place over
which the company might go without wetting a single hub of
their wheels. The bottom was hard, and beautifully
variegated
with the bones of different dead fish, men, &c. It
was happily observed by the Prince that the floor was truly
Mosaic
. This delightful sally, on being communicated to the
gentlemen and ladies on the carts, produced such a roar of
laughter that the Ferry-master himself felt bound to send a little
boy to the Prince, to solicit him to stop his wit, or else the
cortege
would laugh down the abutments of the river, and get
the whole party
foaming
. The Prince replied with his usual
good nature, that he agreed that
Attic salt
was better than
East River
salt, and in the most affable manner desired the
lad to say to his employer he would not let the party get into
liquor of any kind by means of his own invitation, or
compalsion
,
until they arrived at Brooklyn Heights, where the
marriage
was to be solemnized. We are happy to add that the
Ferry-master expressed great gratification on the receipt of
this pleasing intelligence, and dispatched an answer to Prince
Albertross by a clam-boy, who had just sold out, full of
meek acknowledgment of the gracious condescension of the
Prince. The happy train then passed over in the following
order
First Cart;
Two Gentlemen RushersJanitor of St.
Catharine-slip CollegeGroom of the Centreville Course.
Second Cart;
Equerry in waiting, Hon. Your
Grandfather
Two
Pages of Honor, with indexes on their faces
Groom in waiting, holding a brush and a horse-towel.
Third Cart;
Clerk of the marketHigh Constable
Superintendent of Streetsthe Hon. Aleck Niger, President
of the Court of DoverClam-boy in waiting.
Fourth Cart;
Bedchamber women in waiting, in a
dreadful
hurryCaptain of the
Ewe-man
Guard, Earl Ram
Master
of the Buckhounds
, Captain Florida
Treasurer of the
Household
, Lord Swartwout.
Fifth Cart;
Maid of Honor in waitingDuchess of
Pretension's
Lady in waiting, Lady Susan DountousGold
Stick, Lord AstorLord in waiting, Viscount Poverty
Devil a-waiting, Lord Sinner.
Sixth Cart;
Lady of the Chamber furniture in waiting,
Hon. Miss EmptyMaster of the Horses and Mules, Lord
OstlerLord Steward, Earl of Abyssinia, Lord
Chamberlain
,
the Earl of Hugbridget.
Seventh Cart
Miss Saussage
all alone by herself, it
being
considered the most impressive style of doing the thing
to ride her separate and apart, not only from her husband, but
even from her mother and intimate friends. This superiority
of taste and more delicate refinement was generally remarked
as being highly to the advantage of American propriety, and
far exceeding that of the fashion prevailing in some foreign
parts.
Eighth Cart
Albertross
in his wheel barrow, brought
up the rear, in the manner above described.
The party arrived at Brooklyn Heights, at three minutes
and fifty-nine seconds and one quarter after eight o'clock, and
soon put up a magnificent pavilion of oiled-cloth, under the
shade of a most thalamical looking grove of pines, which had
been for some time past under cultivation for the purpose.
The solemn ceremonies proceeded without the slightest delay.
The bridegroom after affectionately
kissing the hand!
of the
mother of his betrothed, so audibly that some of the ladies
present actually fainted, led the sweet Miss Saussage to a
rock where Archbishop Shad was standing, book in hand to
read the couple into glory. We are pleased to repeat the
observation
common in every person's mouth, that he did it most
efficaciously;not a word of the service was omitted. In
addressing the members of this new partnership of flesh, he
even called them by their
Christian
names
Molusca
and
Albertross
. The bridegroom endowed the bride with all his
worldly goods, [the inventory of which is at present mislaid]
the vows were spokenallegiancefidelitylovetruth
honor
obedience!
necessitynaturenurses, and all the
other pathetic and thrilling incidents of a
real love match
were
mixed up together, and overwhelmed us so that we hastily
retired with a sort of jealous grief to leave the tied couple
together.
We conclude our hasty report by adding that we are
assured
by the highest authority that the bridegroom's linen was
16*
made by a highly distinguished manufacturing house in the
county of Connaught, and that he has no corns. At the time
we left the solemn process of annexation, it was confidently
believed that the happy parties would actually go to bed
together
at night. The wedding cake was a monster of beauty,
being made by that distinguished
cuisinier
Thomas Downing,
Esq., of Broad Street. It was manufactured out of three
hundred of the best salted codfish, compounded with five
hundred
bushels of potatoes from the farm of Sir Skin Kidney,
and fifteen kegs of Goshen butter. Further particulars in our
next.
P. S. We omitted to mention that on the next morning the
republican Queen Molusca and the happy Albertross were
observed sitting upon the dock below the berth occupied by
the Providence steamboats, looking cool, fresh, and vigorous,
and reading
the last number of the Spirit of the Times.
VIEW OF NEW YORK FROM BEDLOW'S
ISLAND.
If
any man would be melancholy and patriotic, let him
take a seat, of a sunny afternoon, upon the old ramparts of
Bedlow's Island, and gaze and mediate. Not that
melancholy
and amorpatri are natural associates, visiting people
with their spirit, in company; may we never laugh again on
the fourth of July if we intended to say much a thing. But
we are bold to declare, that no gentleman of reasonable taste
and tenderness of heart, can lean against that solitary fort,
and drink in the ocean air playing around it, and lose his eyes
in the blue sky above it, without being lulled into
unquestionable
pensiveness. We are further confident to assert that no
scene-hunting American can look upon the panorama that
encircles
him, when he stops the sweep of his oar and backs
water ten yards off from that island, and not swell with pride
that this is his bay, and that is his city, and that his country
is the most beautiful, and the freest, and the happiest in the
world. Try it. Ye, whose dyspeptic grief paints
everything
in mournful colors, take an oar in your hand on the first
April day when the sweet south-west shall gently blow in the
face of Sol. Try it.
That the artist who painted the picture which draws out
this commentary, felt the power of the scene when he sketched
it, his success well warrants us to believe. One might get
the bay, and harbor, and suburbs of New York by heart, by
studying this engraving. First, on your north lies Gibbet
Islandbarren rocksacred to the rope of the hangman.
The smoke of a steamboat-pipe, to the west, indicates the
watery turnpike which Duch frows of English Neighborhood
travel over, bringing grateful offerings in spring time, fresh
eggs and horse-radish, to Washington-market. Next Paulus
Hook stands revealed, of which nothing better can be said
than that it was whilom the country-seat of the honorable,
wise and prudent William Kieft, director-general of New
Netherland, and that he sold it in May, 1638, to Abraham
Planck, for four hundred and fifty guilders. Abraham leased
it to Gerrit Derkson for a tobacco plantation. But the estate
is now out of the family. The glory of the Dutch is departed!
Further on, we catch a glimpse of the tall cliffs of
Weehawken
;
Weehawken, glorious in the sublime gloom of
mountain crags and solemn treeswet with the blood of
Hamiltonhonored in the verse of Halleck. The Palisades
next faintly show their ragged precipices, and by their side
runs the river of rivers, bearing to his far source the luxuries
and comforts of foreign commerce. How beautifully distinct
is that scarcely visible fleet of sloops, fading, as it were,
gradually
away, until they seem to be only the white wings of
floating sea-fowl, hovering over schools of
mummy-chubs
, and
dipping up the scholars for their dinners. Turn, now,
north-east
.
There is your American London. There is your city
of five-hundred oyster-shops. This is the emporium of
steamboats
and liberty poles. There is the heart of politics,
commerce
,
piety, and all manner of iniquity. But who is not
proud of this city? Who can look upon its lofty spires, its
forests of masts piercing the sky, its tribute-bearing
sea-servants
crossing its bay and traversing the world, to add to its
wealth and honor,
Nor feel the prouder of his native land?
What is more beautiful than the sunny waters of the East
River, as they run by the frowning castle on Governor's
Islandcastle more terrible upon paper than in its crumbling,
rotten stone! Follow it up toward the Sound. Can you
believe
that such a pleasant stream is the road to Hell-gate?
Here sentimental gentlemen may moralize a little. Cross to
Brooklyn, and your eye rests upon a young queen, beginning
to be a sister city. With our little sister we will shut our
eyes. We will contemplate the picture no more. We have
seen glory enough.
There is only one other of the several cities that gem our
bay, which we miss from the delineation before us. Does
not the reader's spirit sigh with ours, when we tearfully
whisper,
Communipaw!
But that city is behind us, reader,
and shares the sublimity of invisibility with the Narrows and
the ocean. But there, industriously toiling in that boat, are the
representatives of the ancient Dutch fish emporium. Yes,
doubtless
,
those gentleman are the members from Communipaw.
You might know it from the characteristic grasp of the
oyster-tongs
in the hands of the one, and from the sable
complexion
of the other; only there is a cast of mournful thought
upon the brow of the last, and he does not grin and show his
teeth, as hath been the fashion of Communipaw negroes from
the time whereof the memory of man knoweth not, etc.
Perhaps
he hath had bad luck. Delightful task! as the poet
says, to scrape and poke all day, that Downing's reputation
as an oyster-caterer may be honored, and the rakers and
scrapers in adjoining Wall-street be made fat! We pause
for the sake of admiration.
Two hundred years ago! That was not much in the times
of the patriachs. It is nothing absolutely wonderful now
only the length of life of two old people. And yet in those
two hundred years what changes have taken place! The
wilderness has become a city! Nations have been
extirpated
!
Nothing has remained but the sea, and the
everlasting
air. The sea still laves the shore, but it is a shore
peopled
with dock-rats, instead of being overhung with foliage
and flowers. The air still plays upon the island of
Manhattan
;
but, instead of the perfume of roses and sweet fruits,
caught up in green lanes and pleasant groves, it is pregnant
with pepper and snuff in South-street, and driving limestone
dust in Broadway. All, all is changed. It is worse than
was to Rip Van Winkle the transformation of jolly King
George's rubicund face into the buff and blue of General
Washington. Only one resemblance in the physico-moral
world remains. Two hundred years ago the savages would
have scalped you; the modern savages of Gotham only
shave you.
Two hundred years hence! O prophecy! we cannot bear
to listen to thee. We will only dare to hope that we may
live to see the year 2000, and that our lots on One
hundredth-street
may then be worth principal and interest.
THE RIGHT USE OF SILVER.
[From the New York Commercial Advertiser, April 1, 1837.]
Our
sheet is not half large enough to contain all that we should
like to put in it every day, and were it twice as large as it is,
still we should have to struggle daily with the inconveniences
of too narrow limitsdesires expanding, as in most other
matters
,
with the means of giving them indulgence. Therefore
the appropriation of a column to any one subject, is at all times
a trial of our virtue. But we would rather exclude a column
of our own choicest handiwork, than omit the subjoined
report
of certain doings at Hempstead, on Saturday the 25th
ultimo; and the rather for it has not been forced upon us by
a request for publication, but fallen accidentally into our hands,
without even a hint of its existence, or of the proceedings
which it describes. We copy it from the Long Island Star,
in which we discovered it yesterday by the merest chance,
while looking over the outside columns. The presentation
address is one of the happiest we have ever read, and the
reply perfectexactly what might have been expected from
the lips of the brave old man who uttered it.
On Saturday last a peculiarly interesting scene was
presented
at Hempstead, in Queens county. A committee of
gentlemen from the fifth ward, New York, appointed a
meeting
with Raynor R. Smith, at the Hotel of Mr. Oliver
Conklin
for the purpose of presenting him a token of regard from
the citizens of that ward.
At four o'clock in the afternoon, the gentlemen from New
York arrived, and the presentation took place in the presence
of a number of people. The hardy mariner received the
compliments bestowed upon him with much modesty, and
after the public ceremonies were over, withdrew into a
private room with a few friends, where hilarity warmed
into confidence, and he was led to recount a number of
the hair-breadth scapes which form part of the business
of the life of a wrecker at Rockaway. The mode in which
he related the rescue of Capt. Nathan Holdredge,the
individual referred to in the address belowfrom the jaws of
death, made a vivid impression upon all present. Nature and
truth gave power of language beyond the refinements of the
pen.
After a cheerful interview of two or three hours, the
company
separated with warm expressions of mutual regard
We give below the address of William P. Hawes,
Esq., on presenting the cup, together with Mr. Smith's
reply.
Address of W. P. Hawes
.
Mr. Raynor R. Smith
.We are a committee, appointed by
the citizens of the fifth ward of the city of New York, to
discharge
the difficult task of expressing to you their admiration of
your chivalrous attempt to rescue the passengers and crew of
the barque Mexico, lately stranded on the adjacent beach,
and to ask your acceptance of a trifling token of their
regard
for your intrepidity. You, sir, cannot have forgotten
the terrors of that distressful wreck, nor is it possible for us
not to remember, how nobly you and your gallant associates
adorned humanity, and how well you redeemed our coast
from the ignominy of inhospitality. Having waited, in vain,
for the recognition of your services in a more general and
distinguished manner, we have felt that we owe it to our
cityto the credit of our countryso far as in our power
lies, to express to you the sentiments we entertain of your
perilous adventure. We cannot forget the morning of that
eventful day, when the weary Mexico, with an insufficient
and mutinous crew, doomed to unavoidable destruction, poured
out her signal guns of distress among the breakers of Long
Islandwhen mothers and sisters, and children and rough
sailors stretched imploring hands to the shore, and screamed
unavailing prayers to Him who rules the storm; when, as
if to turn into mockery the attempt to save the predestined
ship, He gave violence to the winds and fury to the waves,
and builded between the vessel and the shore a wall of
floating ice, which scarce even hope itself could struggle to
surmount. Who that saw, or has heard, can ever forget
the sceneThe lingering death of a hundred martyrs to
cold, and hunger, and hope disappointedfreezing in the
sight of comfortable hearthsstarving in the view of
abundance
despairing
in the midst of promise! I cannot attempt
to paint a description of that day and night of horror!
Enclosed with all the demons of the main,
They viewed the adjacent shore, but viewed in vain;
Such torments in the drear abode of Hell.
Where sad despair laments with rueful yell,
Such torments agonize the damned breast,
While fancy views the mansions of the blest;
For Heaven's sweet help their suppliant cries implore,
But Heaven relentless deigns to help no more.
It was amid the terrors of such a scene, when the boldest
and the skilfullest stood upon the beach in doubt, and
dismay
,
and awe, that risking everything but honor, and the praise
of the humane, your sole adventurous skiff struggled through
the resisting ice, and climbed the overwhelming mountains
of surf, and sought to bring salvation to the perishing wretches
who ought to have expected rather to receive you as a
fellow
sufferer, rather than to welcome you as a saviour.
What Heaven denied to their prayers, it seemed willing
to grant to your courage. Eight souls live to pray for the
future reward of your exertions. The rest cold death claimed
for his portion. Had it been possible that they might have
been saved, had it been permitted that another one should
be rescued, we know that you were the brave deliverer who
would have plunged into the gulph for his redemption. The
city knows the factthe commercial and christian world
applaud
the heroism of your endeavors.
Such conduct has in other countries, gained for less daring
heroes the reward of civic crowns and national honors. He
who saved the life of a Roman was honored with a seat
next to the senate, and public assemblies when he entered,
rose to do him reverence. These rewards we cannot give
you. But such as your fellow countrymen can give, of
gratitude
to one who has rendered honor to the state, such we
bestow. These we yieldthese we bring in tribute. That
your children, and the children of your brave boys, may not
complain that Americans cannot appreciate acts of devotion,
and danger, and that your distant posterity may have preserved
among them the glorious example of their ancestor, we have
Vol. II.17
caused a skilful artist to engrave upon silver a faint sketch
of your achievement. Upon this cup, which I now tender
for your acceptance, is embossed the story of the Mexico,
and the glory of Raynor R. Smith. It is but a sketch, for
the labors of the artist, however successful, can imitate only
the prominent features of the scene. Here, it is true, lies
the ill fated vessel groaning in the deep sandthe freezing
water rushing through her broken timbers, and over her
shattered spars, and her shrouds swinging with
hope-abandoned
wretches. Here has the graver pictured your
wished-for
boat, and we can see the steady helm, and the strong
nerved sinewy pull of the oars that bear her through the
surge. But the howling stormthe viewless wind bearing
upon its wings the chill of deaththe cries of the victims
your own encouraging shout of comfort, giving strength
and confidence to your crewwhat mortal could engrave
them? Imagination must supply what human art cannot
pretend to depict.
In tendering to you, sir, this token of our regard, we do
not expect greatly to add to your honor, nor to increase
the esteem in which you must be held by every man
who appreciates virtuous heroism. It is, perhaps, more as
a relief to our own hearts, than as a sufficient tribute to
your merits, that we bring our offering. Justice to ourselves
requires us, nevertheless, to say it is not a mere impulse,
not an emotion springing from the first impression produced
by the performance of a good action, that has prompted this
expression of our feelings. This memorial has been
considered
.
The worthiness of your conduct has been weighed.
It is from deliberate justice, as well as from glowing
admiration
,
that our tribute springs.
We cannot forbear upon this occasion, to add an
expression
of our feeling toward your associates in the enterprise
which we celebrate, and to render a just acknowledgment
to the humanity and kindness of the people of Hempstead.
In many foreign lands, such hospitalities to the saved, and
such pious solemnities to the lost, would never have been
rendered. The sailor poet of old England, from whose
experience
I have already quoted, speaks of
A lawless brood,
On England's vile inhuman shores who stand,
The foul reproach and scandal of the land,
To rob the wanderer wrecked upon the strand.
It is a subject of painful regret that even some parts of our
own shores have not been free from the barbarities of the
Picaroon. But the coast of Long Island is happily purged
from the disgrace. The home-seeking packet ship. and the
storm-beaten merchantman, hereafter looking upon the hills
of Long Island, will bear in comfortable remembrance as they
bear away from its lee shore, that should all human
endeavors
fail, and they be driven upon the strand, you and your
good example live here, and the Long Islanders are
charitable
and kind. The merchants of the great commercial
emporium
may perhaps have cause to attribute it to the humanity
of the inhabitants of the sea side, more than to the activity of
our pilots, that commerce shall continue to spread her
multitudinous
sails toward the harbor of New York.
Permit me, now, in conclusion, to express the gratification
which I personally feel in being the organ of expression of
the sentiments of our constituents. None can know better
than I know, how well this tribute is bestowed. I have had
the enjoyment of your acquaintance for many years and have
witnessed more than one instance of your skill, and courage.
I have partaken of your hospitality in the islands of the sea,
and have had good occasion to commend the staunchness of
your surf boat. But there lives a worthy citizen who will
commend, more than I know how to do, the intrepidity which
is the theme of our present praise. Years since, at the
imminent
peril of your own life, you rescued Captain Nathan
Holdredge from the surf, and recalled him from the jaws of
death back to grateful life For him and for all the other
citizens whom you have saved to the republic, we thank you.
And we pray that your valuable life may long be spared, if
not to act in future cases of distress, to teach and encourage
your sons and grandsons how to win esteem on earth, and a
worthy welcome into Heaven.
REPLY OF RAYNOR R. SMITH.
Gentlemen
I thank you, I sincerely thank you for your
gift. In return for it I can only say that should a similar
wreck or any other wreck ever again occur on our shores, I
shall endeavor to show that I deserve it. I shall preserve
your gift. I shall value it above all priceit shall remain
with me while I live, and when I die it shall not go out of my
family, if I can help it.
DESCRIPTION OF THE CUP.
The cup bears on the one side a device of the ship Mexico
imbedded in the sand, with the waves breaking over her.
Her hapless crew is seen stretching out their imploring
hands. A boat is making its way to them. A few figures
stand upon the beach, surrounded by masses of ice, which
show the severity of the season, and the peril of the
undertaking
.
The reverse side bears the following inscription:
REWARD OF MERIT.
Presented to Raynor R. Smith, of Hempstead South, L. I.
by a number of his fellow citizens of the Fifth Ward, as a
token of regard for his noble daring, performed at the peril of
his life, in saving the eight persons from the wreck of the
fated
Ship Mexico
, on the morning of January 2d, 1837.
NEW YORK.
Committee
.Joseph Meeks, John Horspool, Lawrence
Ackerman, William Kelley, Benjamin Ringgold, William P.
Hawes.
CASTLE GARDEN.
The
time is now, when middle aged citizens say to their
wives and daughters, as they stand twenty-five yards this side
of the gate-way opening to the castle bridge, I remember
the time when this was the west barrier of the battery, and
from here, and close along the old flag-staff house, famous
for oranges and peanuts, down to the old long wharf, at
Whitehall, ran a frail, trembling fence, of white painted pine.
Here, on the north side of the bridge, indulged boystoo
happyand weary cashiers and clerks, when the tide served,
threw out their heavy-sinkered lines for bass and weak fish,
and drew rich suppers from the propitious Hudson, then
unvexed
by steamboats. Here on the left, were the ferry stairs.
Many a man of us was a boy then, and, on Saturday
afternoon's
vacation, excused his return after sundown, by a string
of begauls, and occasional blackfish, caught from the steps of
that ancient ferry. But it is all gone now. The ferry and the
fish have departed.
We have heard and seen such good citizens sigh, and shake
17*
their heads in melancholy. Such is the inevitable bitterness
of population and improvement. But how will it be ten, or
five years hence? The world, especially the First Ward of
it, does not lie still. Here we have had forts and breast works
pulled down and levelled, and the
battery
turned into a
pleasure
ground, and the river encroached upon, and old Hudson
actually submitting to King Canute's law, and a war castle put
up, and then turned into a hall of music and fireworks, and
every thing changedall, all in a believable time.
Must we expect no more change?
Reader, get that piece of silver changed at the very
enticing
banking house, at the arch way, and get one of Marsh's
tickets instead, and then cross the bridge with me, and see.
How swiftly rushes flood-tide beneath the arches of these
piers! How comfortable the sensation of safety from the
whirlpools beneath your feet, as you lean over the railing, and
look into the black water? Yet a decree has gone forth that
all this shall be changed. Time, as well as heavy horse, and
light footed maidens, has galloped over this bridge, and has
shaken the stones, and loosened the iron, and rotted the
woodwork
.
The worshipful Mayor and Council, not to be behind
time, are devising how soon the water shall be dammed out
and the castle and the bridge be both demolished; and the
lovers of the sublime and beautiful in Wall street and
Exchange
place are feasting their imaginations with goodly rows
of store-houses fringing the river side, and already seem to
hear instead of Marsh's orchestra raising a Pan to the Gods,
the deep
yoheho
of niggers hoisting skins and indigo to the
fourth story!
Every man, woman, and child that does not now and then
take a walk on the battery and then cross the bridge, and
enter
the fort-garden, and mount to the topmost promenade on
the walls, and purify his soul in the winds that are
permanently
engaged for the establishment, will lament ere long
the
change
which will bring destruction to the pleasures which
are now afternoonly enjoyed by the Deputy
Inspector of the First Ward
.
CASTLE GARDEN.
[From the New York Times of October 28, 1834.]
My dear, good Times
That was a sinister sort of waggish
suggestion of yours, to the Commercial the other day; that it
was not doing even-handed justice, to stick a motto along side
of Seward's name, and leave Stillwelltho interesting
Mr. Stillwellallalone in his glory. The Colonel
might have answered you, and showed his learning, if he had
a mind, and had, moreover, read Beaumont and Fletcher.
How he might have swamped you with his quotation from
The false One. How he might have glorified himself, and
his candidate, by halo-ing it around the
Lieutenant-Governor's
patronymic!
Not a man, Antony,
That were to show our fears and dim our greatness:
NoTis enough! MY NAMES ASHORE!
Csar.
But the Colonel knows more about Anti-Masonry, and
Militia
tactics, than he does about joking, and dead poets; and so
he thanked you kindly for the hint, and stuck in an extract
from a letter
said to have been
written by Stillwell, which
contained the interesting information that certain things
were
going to be done
, which
had been done already
. The
author of that document, and the time of its composition, have
not yet
been discovered. There the extract stands, though,
and the ColonelI supposemade the best selection that his
reading, and the source of collation, could provide. Now,
every body knows that Stillwell did not concoct, or get up,
that idea. No man in his senses can believe it.
Stop thief, stop thief, is sounded in the streets, and a
bold faced larcener feels the fingers of a sturdy democrat in
his neck. Pilfered citizens come up and claim their apparel,
with which the rascal has adorned himself. He is stripped
restitution is made, though justice not yet donehis jewels,
watch, rings, coat, hat, boots, jacketall, all are claimed and
identified, and delivered to their proper owners. Nothing
remains
but his pantaloons and shirt. Will the presumption be
that these are original? Should he happen to have a horse
with him, will any man doubt that he has committed a
plagiarism
upon that interesting animal? The Col. must take
and feel the force of this allegory. If he does not, I pray you,
elucidate, indoctrinate him. Tell him, moreover, that the
sentiment which he has selected, is not apposite, nor
appropriate
,
and give him the following to select from. These are
respectable, honest, genuine quotations. Since Stillwell must
have a motto, let him have one that is somewhat relative to
his character and talent.
A FRIEND OF MODEST MERIT.
CASTLE GARDEN.
Quid domini facient,
audent cum talia fures!
Virg. Ecl
. 3. 16.
It is a greater offence to steal men's labors, than their
clothes.
Synesius
.
The character of men may be known from the company
they keep. The receiver is as bad as the thief.
Burton's Anat. Melancholy
.
Step that manstop that man!
The Literary Larcener
.
There was one old gentleman in a claret colored coat,
with a lean, pale, solemn expression of countenance, who had
all the appearance of a broken down lawyer making a brief
for a speech at a club meeting. After considering him
attentively
,
I recognized in him a diligent getter up of
miscellaneous
works and political tracts, that bustled very well off
with the trade. I was curious to see how he manufactured
his wares. He made more stir and show of business than
any one of the others; dipping into various books, fluttering
over the leaves of manuscripts, taking a morsel out of one, a
morsel out of another, line upon line, precept upon precept,
here a little and there a little. The contents of his book
seemed to be as heterogeneous as those of the witches
cauldron
in Macbeth. It was here a finger, and there a thumb,
toe of frog and blind worm's sting, with his own gossip poured
in like baboon's blood to make the medley slab and good.
Sketch Book
.
If the boy steal adroitly, give him credit; but, if he be
detected in a plagiarism, lick him.
Lycurgus
.
When I see a barrister defending and eulogizing a
palpable
criminal, I cannot help asking my brethren on the bench,
whether his license had not better be taken away.
Lord
Mansfield's charge to the jury in Filchet's case
.
Ton d' apameibomenos prosephe cryown thatu stoleit.
Homer's Iliad
Bring me no more reports.
Richard 3d
.
Blitzer vongallowshoots tutite foghris footerno.
Schleigzel
.
Pere caballero, ymd debe saber que aunque un tacano no
es un ladron, la diferencia entre un tacano quien recibe sin
pagar los bienes robados de su vecindad, y un ladron quien
los roba es diferencia de poco momento.
Lazarillo de Tormes
.
Y por eso se llama el hombre quien roba con talento, en
nuestro Castellano
El Robador Experimentado
, en
Frances
Le Voleur Parfait
, en Italiano,
Il Ladro Astuto
, y en
Ingles
Steal-well
.
Quevedo El Gran Tacano
.
E giusto il vostro sdegno
Qui vi sono de ladriExaminiamo
Processiamo.
La Gazza Ladra
.
Ah birba, birba
Ecco la sul ponte, oh se potessi
Arrampicarmi.
La Gazza Ladra
.
Vous m'accusez d'etre voleurVous me condamnez, et
peut tre je serai pendu, et qu'est ce que j'ai fait? I'avais
besoin d' un chapeau, et j'ai mis mes mains sur le chapeau de
mon voisin, un chapeau dont il n'avait pas besoin, et pour
lequel il a donne peut tre deux piastres. Et mon trs
honorable
juge, vous avez vole les ides de vos amis; vous avez
publie des livres dans lesquels, il n'y est pas une ide originale,
pas meme une expression qui n'appartient pas a vos amis
Mais c'est un emprunt avec vous, et moi je suis voleur selon
vos regles de justice. Oh juge sage, eclair, honorable.
Causes Celebres
vol 35, p. 79.
Wyauarchysox haughhiho gibletxg worryworrywo.
Black Hawk's Address to General Atkinson
.
Hong hien long grit fuz! hong, hang, hung.
Confuctus
.
Who steals my brains, steals trash.
Longworth
.
The receivers of property embezzled, knowingly, are
subject to the same punishment as the thief.
Revised Statutes
.
And be it further enacted, that in all cases of theft,
larceny
,
or robbery, which shall come before the court of errors
aforesaid, for trial, judgment, or direction, and the members of
the said court shall be divided thereon; the defendant shall
not be sent either to Auburn or Sing Sing, unless the Lieut.
Governor, presiding in said court, shall under seal, certify that
he does not know a case of a man untried, who in the eye of
God, and of common morality, is a worse thief than the
prisoner
at the bar.
do
.
P. S. I asked my lawyer to give me some authorities
touching
the liability of people who endorse their friends
reputation
,
but he would not do it. Pshaw! said he, the
endorser
is equally liable with the drawer. If, when a man has
found his visitor to be a rogue, he does not kick him out of
doors, his
honest
friends will quit his house, and cut him.
A FRIEND, &C.
CASTLE GARDEN.
[From the New York Times of November 10, 1834.]
Messrs. Editors
.If I remember rightly, the wigs
promised to give it up, if they lost this electionthis one, at
which they had the majority of the inspectors, and all the
lamplighters on their side. Now, will they do it? Will
they submit to the expression of the will of the majority?
Or will they follow their
ignis fatuus
leader, and be tumbled
again into the swamps and bogs of bad temper and lost bets?
Some of them will not, I know. In fact, I believe that the
majority of the opposition in this city, are sensible of the
blind captivity into which they have been led by their
editorial
prophet. But Hark! the trumpet is blown! the tocsin
is sounded! to the rescue! is the cry! war to the knife!
says the Courier of Saturday. Let us rally, and organize,
draw the line between us and the democrats, distinctly; let
us employ no man, love no woman, own no friend, who thinks
not with us; nor counsel, nor cure, nor feed, nor clothe, nor
buy from, nor speak to any individual, high or low, rich or
poor, kinsman or stranger, whoever he may be, unless he
throws up his hat and hurras for wiggery. That is the
substance of it. Look at the manifestothe fiatthe
imperial
decree. With what a pompous consequence, the dictator
issues his this
must
be done, and that
must
be done.
However, there is no use of quarrelling about these things.
Rather let us laugh at them, and show their utter absurdity.
With this view I have been tumbling over the first book of
Paradise Lost. That is a book, by the bye, which they
who mean to take courage from despair, ought to read,
The Courier has drawn from it already.
What though the field be lost?
All is not lost,
the unconquerable will
And study of revenge, immortal hate
And courage never to submit, or yield
,
Or what is else not to be overcome.
That was what Satan said to his next door neighbor when
he turned over upon his aching side, in the current of hot
stuff, into which he and his followers had been lately plunged,
after being defeated in a hard fought battle. What a
prototype
of the general-in-chief of the wigs. Never give it
up, he cries. Fight for spite's sake, and hate and revenge.
Banish them from your families, and friendships, hold no
communion with them, proscribe them as outlaws.And then
he reasons. How
devilish
plausible!
Since, through experience of the great event,
In arms not worse, in foresight much advanced
We may, with more successful hope, resolve
To wage by force, or guile, eternal war,
Irreconcilable to our grand foe,
Who now triumphs, and in the excess of joy
Sole reigning, holds the tyranny of Heaven.
So spake the apostate angel, though in pain,
Vaunting aloud, but racked with deep despair.
And so speaks, and vaunts the apostate dictator of the
wigs. We are, says he, in arms not worse; that is to
say, we've got all the talent and decency on our side, and the
control of the city treasury;in foresight much advanced;
that is to say, we know, now, that we cannot reckon upon
our own honesty. There have been traitors among usBut
let Milton speak. In the following extract, one would think
he was describing a tribulation meeting at Masonic Hall.
All these, and more came flocking, but with looks
Downcast, and dark, yet such wherein appeared
Obscure some glimpse of joy, to have found their chief
Not in despair, to have found themselves not lost
In loss itself, which on his countenance cast
Like doubtful hue; but he, his wonted pride
Soon recollecting, with high words, that bore
Semblance of worth, not substance, gently raised
Their fainting courage, and dispelled their fears.
I beg to be understood, as quoting these passages with no
intentional irreverence, with no spirit of exultation over, or
taunt against the many respectable well meaning individuals
that compose the main body of the wigs. I have made the
quotations only to illustrate the devilish spirit of the counsel
which the Courier gives to his defeated followers.
Since my hand is in, I'll give a few more illustrations.
Vol. II.18
The despirited legions, are at the call of their leader, met in
Pandemonium. Satan
loquitur
.
And that strife
Was not inglorious, though the event was dire,
As this place testifies, and this dire change
Hateful to utter.
In the same spirit the Courier would say, we fought hard
and did all that we could, although we got beat; as the
people
we
have paid for steamboats, and frigates, and eagles,
and liberty poles, and beerwill all testify, and also `this dire
change
,' or cash, which we have got to hand over in payment
of our bets.
But what power of mind
Foreseeing or presaging, from the depth
Of knowledge past or present, could have feared
How such united force of Gods, how such
As stood like these could ever know repulse!
Just so reasons the Courier. The wigs have been taught
to believe that they were the only wise and powerful
people
in the country. They believed in their invincibility.
Great reactions, they were told were going on in their
favor, every where. Men were breaking off by whole acres
from the democratic ranks. All Hl was moved to get up
an excitementand how could such as stood like these,
the great, the rich, the eloquent, the learned, and the cunning,
get beat by Democrats. The style of reasoning is the same.
There is a congenial sympathy between the two minds that
is indeed most admirable. But Satan continues,
For who can yet believe, tho' after loss,
That all these puissant legions, whose exile
Hath emptied Heaven, shall fail to reascend
Self-raised, and repossess their native seat.
Emptied Heaven
.Arrogant vanity! So the Courier
talked when half a dozen lawyers joined his standard. And
mark the desperate presumption, which in the midst of rout
and discomfiture, aspires to future victories!
For me, be witness all ye host of Heaven,
If counsels different, or dangers shunned
By me, have lost our hopes.
Courier again
. Who believes that its shut up shop
resolution
or any other of its counsels, were different, or
disgusting
to its party? And as to shunning danger, look at
the bristling steel that invites the hired bullies to pay a visit
to the office!
After Satan had expressed his sentiments, then the other
leaders suggested their views as to the mode of carrying on
the war. I will conclude with a short extract from the
speech of each. Your readers can make the application.
Mammon addressed the meeting at length.
Mammon, the least erected spirit that fell
From Heaven, for e'en in Heaven his looks and thoughts
Were always downward bent.
He was for backing out entirely, and the substance of his
advice was,
Let us rather seek
Our own good from ourselves, and from our own,
Live to ourselves
.
Moloch
My sentence is for open war, of wiles
More unexpert, I boast not; them let those
Contrive, who need, or when they need not, use.
Belial
I should be much for open war, O Peers,
As not behind in hate, if what was urged,
Main reason to persuade immediate war,
Did not dissuade me most, and seem to cast
Ominous conjecture on the whole success.
Beelzebub
.
Some advantageous act may be achieved,
By sudden onset either with hellfire,
To waste the whole creation, or possess
All as our own, and drive, as we were driven,
The puny habitants, OR IF NOT DRIVE,
Seduce them to our party
.
So counselled the fallen spirits, when they met to
reorganize
,
in Pandemonium, as Milton, drawing from his
knowledge of bad hearts, powerfully imagines. Turn the
Courier's article of Saturday into blank verse, and you might
add it on to either of the speeches made at that meeting, and
no one could doubt its devilish origin.
18*
POETICAL PARODIES.
WATER.
AN ODE DEDICATED TO THE TEMPERANCE SOCIETY.
Water is the best of elements.
Well
sung, and truly, thou old bird of Jove,
A proverb hast thou wove, for all good people;
Arthur and I around the world might rove,
From high Acropolis to St. Paul's steeple,
Nor find such well epitomized sobriety,
To paint upon the flag of our society.
Hoc signo vinces, Hale, unfurl the banner;
Let it flaunt up, and flout the gin-swoln clouds;
Shout now, a long, and clear, and bold Hosannah,
And herald life to the pale, Styx-like crowds,
Of Five-points wretches, dying! by the Mass!
Of the best of liquors, at three cents per glass!
Not death, but life our bloodless triumphs yield,
Crowned with the joy of souls redeemed from slavery;
But could we tempt the old jailor to the field,
There were a desperate fight for brother Avery
Gods! how he'd stamp his heel into his head,
And crush, even when the monster was stone dead;
The dragon thief, that steals away men's brains;
Good Lot first cursed him, and vine-desser Noah;
The brothel's god, e'er since, confessed he reigns,
Leading the nightly Bacchanalian roar.
Dread devil! hear him chuckling at the banquet,
Say, wilt thou not a single gentleman quit?
The glasses sparkle on the board, and song,
And merry joke, and jest they wanton banter;
And he is there. See, see him push along
With busy speed, the just refilled decanter;
Drink, drink boys, drink, and drown grim Care, and
Sorrow,
Be drunk to night, and sober on the morrow.
The clock strikes three. The gentle breath of morning
Fans the hot cheek of a zig-zag street walker;
Why is that mud his spattered coat adorning?
What dialect affects our late glib talker?
Strange! vest unbuttonedpockets turned outside
Hat pyramidicalsoiled cravat untied!
These be thy half cooked dinners, old Constrictor,
Thy victims, ready buttered with saliva,
Soon to be mashed and munched, as in the picture
Of fated Laocoonpained, fruitless striver;
Have pity! wretch! Gloat not so on thy ration,
Or moderate, at least, thy tight
squassation
.
O, for the early days, that knew not art!
When, at the well, Bethuel's gentle daughter
Confessed her love, and pledged her virgin heart,
In a pure bowl of dimpling-cold spring water.
Drink, drink my Lord, the maiden to the
camel-driver
said,
But not a drop she gave him that could get into his head.
And thou, Castalia, where is now thy fount,
Whose chrystal, erst, threw back young Poets' faces,
Up, on the top of the Parnassian mount,
The Muses' home, the loved haunt of the Graces?
Is't true that Adrian filled thee up with stones?
The drunken Vandal! Curses on his bones!
Home of my fathers! can I e'er forget
The pearly gem, set in thy sloping hill?
The heated willows bending down, to wet
Their fanning branches in the pebbled rill?
The swallow, o'er the mirror skimmingdipping
And now and then a stray mosquito nipping?
Oh water, wave, spring, rivulet, well, stream!
When art thou most the idol of my praise?
Still art thou Castaly.In sooth, I deem
Even Woodworth might a decent stanza raise,
Inspired by thee;yes, yes;I'll wage a ducat,
Even he might feel the God, and sing some rotten bucket.
The diamond dripping from the brimming bowl,
The clear, deep streamlet, kissing its green sides,
The swelling river's proud and lordly roll,
Old ocean's bosom. and his rushing tides,
Rich sources are of holy contemplation;
Diviner, boasted not the famed old Roman nation.
Come; enter this green lane; the sun is hot;
Here shielded, thank the closely dove-tailed trees;
Stoop, stoop, and drinkthis is Egeria's grot.
Fall, man, upon thy bended hands, and knees,
And cool thy lip, and bless this happy minute
Staywilt thou have a little brandy in it?
No! poison not the wholesome living streams,
Nor turn their waves, into the dead Red Sea,
Putrid with Pharoah's army; where, it seems,
No bird may live, nor shrub or floweret be;
Where the chance pilgrim, thinks it providential,
If he survive the brazen sky, and simoon pestilential.
Oblivious are years, since Bacchus, flushed
With Chian, urged the lion-mated Tiger,
Impetuous; and on to triumph rushed,
From farthest Ind to heavy rolling Niger;
With syren, music, madness, thyrsus, cymbal,
Satyr, and Faun, Silenus, Pan, and vine wreathed pipe
and timbrel,
A drunken multitude. But times are changed;
The insolvent God here claims no sacred shrines;
Save, where by grateful Aldermen, are ranged
Long promised shambles, to retail high wines.
O! provident regard for cheap fruition!
Erin-nys
staggering, thanks ye for the licensed imbibition.
Save, that in yonder secret Alms-house cellar,
The rusty key turns seldom, on that rare
Old private stockfrom Lynch'ssoft, and mellow,
Peters can tell how long it ripened there.
The rest of us all sip our thin Burgundy,
Abuse the booths, and preach reform, the coming anno
mundi.
BANK MELODYNo. I.
A lament of a wig temperance man on being invited to the corporation
dinner on the 4th of July.
The
gushing wine is calling me,
With its merry, gleesome flow;
And our party all are hauling me,
Where bright their glasses glow;
I may not go, I must not go,
Where punch, pale ale, and sherry flow;
Where flutenists and flowers blow;
I must stay here with my wife and daughter,
And sip the insipid Knapp's spring water;
Oh! heavy life, wear on, wear on;
That vow for me has the business done!
The sharp-set carver, through the round
Goes cutting, with its hungry sound;
And over the blade spiced gravies flow
Into the steamy dish below;
And fast and full the soup plates go
To Bull, Fred. Talmadge, and Munro;
And all the way
They murmuring say
Oh, fool! why thou art far away?
Come up to the City Hall to-day,
And with us the figure go.
I may not go, I may not go,
Where brilliant Hock's green waters run
All glided with reflected fun;
Where leaps Champagne, from the bottle, below,
Into a whirl of boiling snow,
And the rabble gape as they see it go;
I must stay here
In prison drear;
Oh! heavy life, wear on, wear on;
Would God that thou wert done!
The fat head cook, good wig, goes by,
Arranging syllabub and viand,
And Sambo Ganymedes swift fly,
To help good fellows as get dry, and
Madeira makes them all rejoice,
And even old Hays with gentle voice,
Calls me away,
With the wigs to stay,
To keep the day
Which the Democrats say
Is their own blessed anniversary.
I may not goI may not go,
Where the sweet winds over fresh salmon blow;
Vol. II.19
Where the spicy pregnant clouds float by
The original Stillwell's dreamy eye;
Nor where the soup, warm, rich, and black,
Runs gurgling 'mid the busy clack,
Like a sweet bird singing upon a hill,
To the splashing wheel of the village mill
I must stay here,
With my wedded dear,
And munch roast clams like Cotton Mather,
And keep my vow to our good King Arthur.
O could I go, unknown, unseen,
And rapturous dip in the deep tureen,
And be the boy I would have been,
But for that cursed vow!
Charles King and Root, and I and Noah,
Would make the old
[17]
[17]
Vide the American of 1824.
Sessions ceiling roar,
And Kg get Rt upon the floor,
As drunk as David's sow.
BANK MELODYNo. II.
Air
Fallen is thy throne.
Fallen
is thy throne, O Nicholas!
Silence is o'er thy Bank,
No more thy discounts tickle us,
Thy lawyers all are lank.
Where are the boys that hanker,
For notes approved and done,
Who vote for the old banker,
Whenever they're hard run.
Clay! thou did'st love Nick Biddle,
Once he was all thine own;
Thy harp, thy flute, thy fiddle
Which thou did'st play upon;
Till Jackson came and blighted
Thy long loved olive tree,
And the Banking House was lighted,
For other kings than thee.
Then sunk the sun of Nicholas,
Then set his Evening Star,
And got into a pickle as
Bad as Duane's papa,
When wrapped in wrath and wonder,
He frowned upon his son,
And lectured him like thunder
For what he had not done.
BANK MELODYNo. III.
Air
.Said a smile to a tear.
Said Noah to Stone,
When the meeting was done,
And his heart bounded light as a feather,
While sipping his beer,
In sooth, it is queer
That we should be both here together.
I come here to thank
My good mistress, the bank,
For teaching me sound aristocracy.
And I, said the Colonel,
To curse the infernal
Old demon of Jackson democracy.
O, ho! chuckled Noah,
Dear Stone say no more,
We are twins; an't it wonderful funny?
And how glorious the cause,
Which support from us draws
And fills both our pockets with money!
BANK MELODYNo. IV.
Air
.Farewell! but whenever you welcome the hour.
[To be sung by Mr. H-x-e, after the Election.]
Farewell
! but whenever you think of the hour
That gave to old Tammany honor and power,
Then think of the discounts, which we have had too,
And the loans, dearest Webster, we've made Clay, and you,
Our
debts will press heavy! no hope will remain!
And Nick will surrender his office with pain!
But he ne'er will forget the free discounts, that threw
Their enchantments, my Webb, around Noah, and you.
Let fate do her worst! we have laid up enough;
Our hay is all made, and the storm may blow rough,
We care not; why should we? we've had out our fun,
And never again can they say we're hard run.
Long, long may our hearts with such comforts be stored,
Like pockets wherein jingling coin has been poured.
You may break, you may ruin the Bank, if you will,
But the notes and the specie, will hang round us still.
19*
BANK MELODYNo. V.
Air
.John Anderson, my jo, John.
Nick
Biddle, O! my auld Nick,
When we were first acquent,
The Bank had full five years to run,
The fees were freely lent;
But now the Bank is winding up,
The cash don't come so thick
But blessings on your silver pow,
Nick Biddle, my auld Nick!
Nick Biddle, O! my auld Nick,
We've had our fun thegither,
Money
and canty days, Nick,
We've spent wi' ane anither;
Now we maun totter down, Nick
,
But hand in hand we'll stick,
And growl thegither at the foot,
Nick Biddle, oh! my Nick.
BANK MELODYNo. VI.
GULIAN'S FEAST.
Fill the goblet again; for I never before
Felt the joy, that now kindles my heart to its core;
Let us drink:who would not? since through life's varied round,
In the goblet alone,
no deception is found
.
Byron
.
'T WAS at the Castle feast, of beer, and fun,
That great Verplanck had won.
High on a stage of cedar,
Sat the elected leader,
Beneath a tow cloth canopy, to ward the sun;
A shining steeple;
A moral weathercock, above the gaping people.
Phil Hne, and Webb, and Glentworth stood around,
Their skulls, with wigs, and scalps, and scratches
bound:
So should success in politics be crowned.
The new appointed street inspectors,
Mix'd, hob-a-nob, with bank directors;
While smirking, honest Mr. Bull
Of pleasure filled the chalice full.
Happy, happy, happy Mayor?
None but the wigs,
None but the wigs,
None but the wigs surround thy chair!
Joe Hoxie mid the throng,
High pitch'd his tuneful voice,
And warbled many a song,
Appropriate, and choice.
The trembling notes, like Nick's pervade the land,
And win for Joe the vote of many a hand.
He sung Kentucky's trump-card son,
Who, tonguey, went to Washington;
Such is the power of mighty gold
On lawyers getting old!
A Senator's grave form belied the attorney;
Sublime, on rail road cars, he took his journey,
When first he woed the beauteous Bank,
And lowly bending, knelt to thank
The generous hand that
images
had sent him,
Sovereigns
that reign o'er all the world had lent him!
The listening wigs look on with kindling eye;
Hurra for Clay! hurrah! hurrah! they cry:
The day is ours! Verplanck and Victory!
With tickled ears
The chairman hears,
And drinks the sound
That floats around,
As if it were the music of the spheres.
The praise of Webster next,
Joe pitched on for his text,
The god-like man is hovering here!
A foaming bumper now of beer!
Hand around the mugs there, Stillwell,
See that all the wig boys fill well.
Again! again! fillfill!
Nick Biddle pays the bill.
'T was honest Wester's patriotic voice
Approved it vile, and wicked to rejoice
At the victories won by soldier and tar,
In a shameful immoral war.
Warmed by the song, Verplanck grew vain,
Fought all the election o'er again,
And thrice he proved that loss of votes, was most
undoubted
gain.
Joe marked the Wig Mayor getting high;
His threatening arm, his bloodshot eye;
And prudently, therefore, changed the tune,
To the mournful air of Bonnie Doon.
He sang John Quincy great and learned!
By too severe a fate
Fallen! fallen! fallen! fallen!
Fallen from his high estate,
By fickle fortune spurned!
Gone his light houses in the skies,
He pleads distress, and groans and sighs.
Nor e'en a barren, solitary hope has,
Nor boasts his once loved Ebony and Topaz.
Enoughforbear,
Sung out the Mayor,
Getting into a huff;
We had quite enough
Of that sorrowful stuff,
Give us something funny, like `Barney Brallaghan,'
I've called for that onceshall I have, sir, to call
again?
Joe liked not this wipe,
But he pitched his pipe,
Like a dutiful wig, to the praise of beer,
And comfort poured on the wig Mayor's ear;
'T was but a kindred spirit to beget,
For heavy sorrow always loves a wet.
Jews harp like, in Yankee measures,
Soon he twanged his soul to pleasures.
Office he sung, is, toil, and trouble,
Honor but an empty bubble
Soon the official term is out,
And then you're back with the rabble rout.
If in office there's no comfort,
Kill your care, by taking rum for't!
There the bottle stands, beside thee,
Take the goods the Gods provide thee.
The listening clerks encore and cry bravo,
Well sung, hurrah! bravo! hurrah for Joe!
The Mayor unable to resist,
Took the decanter in his fist,
And pulled and breathed, pulled and breathed,
Pulled and breathed, and pulled again:
At length, when he had got enough of liquor, he
Fell prostrate on the stage, and tumbling cursed
old Hickory!
Now at him, Joe, again!
Scream it you cripple, with a savage strain!
Tell him the Bank is broke;the Bank!
Nick Biddle's burst! awake Verplanck!
Hark! Hark!The horrid sound
Has raised up his head,
As awaked from the dead,
And amazed he stares around!
To the Arsenal! red Fisher cries
See Erinnys arise!
No wig does she wear,
But her natural hair,
Blast her eyes!
Behold a ghastly band
With shillalah each in hand!
These are Irish ghosts that fell by the dirks
Of the valiant Merchant' clerks!
Be ready to fly
If they catch your eye;
Behold! how they brandish their clubs on high,
How they point to the old sixth ward,
And the bristling arsenal yard!
They come! They come! the spirit crew
Stop singing, Joe!what the Devil shall we do!
I'm off, said the Mayor, if wrong I ask pardon;
And so broke up the feast at Castle Garden.
BANK MELODYNo. VII.
AN ODE TO YOUNG NICK.
Quo, inter syngrapha,
Premis, insoluta
Cyp. Torrent. Carm. XXII
.
[18]
[18]
Cyprianus Torrentius, was a lyric poet of great merit, though little
noticed, who flourished about 200, A. C. His works are all lost except the
Ode, of which the above is a literal translation. This is fortunately
preserved
in the treatise of Tertullianus de Lyricis, written shortly after
his conversion to christiany. The commencement of it may be found in
St. Jerome's famous letter to Tertullian, where it is quoted with
ecomiastic
comment. Bryant has transferred the thought and style of the poem
to his Ode to a Water Fowl, without giving credit to the original.
This was, no doubt, an accidental omission, or else, perhaps, it is another
proof of the truth of the old maxim, that good poets hire out their souls
to the same sort of tenants.
Whither, midst falling due
And unpaid notes of Webster, Sprague, and Clay,
Far, through thy subject states, dost thou pursue
Thy autocratic way?
Vainly, the pauper's prayers
Borne on the winds unsavory arise;
What matter is it how the rascal fares?
No; laugh, and dn his eyes.
See'st thou the palace proud,
And princely towers frowning on the lea,
And Mammon throned, with serfs, a lowly crowd,
Bending the trembling knee?
There is a power, whose care,
Blood-bought, upholds thee tyrant of the land,
And he has tamed, O Nick! the prince of air
Behemoth, to thy hand.
Long years, thy rod hath ruled
The meagre fortunes of the rabble rout,
And still thy ingrate enemies are fooled,
Although thy lease is out.
But soon that reign shall cease;
Soon shall thy paper sceptre pass away,
Soon shalt thou hear the cry, I'll have my lease,
And bond, and curse the day.
BANK MELODYNo. VIII.
Ye
seamen of Columbia
That guard our native seas,
Whose flag has braved, and triumphed in
The battle and the breeze!
Your own good
Standard
now run up
To match another foe!
And roll to the poll
While the stormy tempests blow;
While the battle rages loud and long
And the stormy tempests blow!
Vol. II.20
The spirits of your fathers
Are calling you to rise!
Your country's ship thumps on a
Bank
,
And loud your captain cries!
The shade of gallant Lawrence, men,
Will make each bosom glow;
As you roll to the poll
While Nick Biddle's lawyers blow,
While the battle rages loud and long,
And old Nick's lawyers blow.
Columbia needs no monarch,
No
banks
along her coast;
She owns no pampered money king,
For freedom is her boast?
For Lawrence
, then, blue jackets all,
Against the Bank we'll row,
And they'll roar, on the shore,
When they see Nick puff and blow;
While the battle rages loud and long
And the stormy tempests blow.
The stars and stripes of freedom
Shall yet terriffic float
Your standard sheet shall stream until
You've sunk Nick Biddle's boat.
Then, then, ye ocean-voters
Our song and feast shall flow
To the fame of your name,
When old Nick has ceased to blow
When the Tory cry is heard no more,
And the bank has ceased to blow.
BANK MELODYNo. IX.
BURIAL OF THE RIGHT HON. MRS. BANK.
Not
a speech was heard, not a Lawyer's tongue,
As we raised the shrunk corse to our shoulders;
Not a stave of distress, not a melody sung
O'er the ditch where the old lady moulders.
We buried her privately, late at night,
In a lone bye place; Major Downing
Vow'd by jings, that he never yet see such a sight,
And he called it a judgment crownen.
No heaped up mound, nor vault we tricked;
But splash! in the water we pitched her,
And she raised up her head, and grunted, and kicked,
As if the old boy had bewitched her.
Hal Clay said a prayer; it was rather brief;
He was so overcome with sorrow;
And we all more or less, had a touch of grief,
For we knew what would come on the morrow.
We knewas we laid the old woman down,
For the mummies and eels to feed on
That her goods and effects were to go to the town,
As had early in life been agreed on.
We knew that we all had to settle our loans,
That the time had gone by for renewal,
That the Demos would laugh at our sighs and groans,
And the sheriff be callous and cruel.
We had just got done, and we stood in the damp,
And were talking about absconding;
When we heard the deputy tipstaff's tramp,
And the marshal's voice resounding.
Quicker than lightning, we all cleared out,
And we cursed every Troglodyte Tory;
Not a line did
we
write, not a speech did we spout.
But we left her all alone with her glory.
END OF VOL. II.